Era Lock
Date: 10,538 BBY — Late Mandalorian Wars / cusp of Jedi–Sith War. Darth Vitiate’s rise within the Old Republic Sith  Empire has begun. The Galactic Republic exists but is strained at the fringes. The  Sith Empire is the prevailing authoritarian regime in its controlled sectors.
DO NOT use characters, factions, ships, planets, technology, or events from the film eras, the Clone Wars, the Palpatine/Vader Galactic Sith Empire, Rebel Alliance, or New Republic. Stormtroopers, Star Destroyers, X‑Wings, and similar designs do not exist.
Any “ Empire” refers to the Sith Empire of this period. Any  “Imperial” means Sith Imperial, led by the Dark Council and influenced by Darth Vitiate.
Tone and design aesthetic must match the KOTOR/SWTOR Old Republic era — war‑torn, culturally diverse, ancient Force traditions, powerful Sith lineages, Mandalorian raids, and emerging galactic conflict.
When unsure, consult Old Republic Legends material or analogous designs fitting this setting.


Story So Far — Retconned for 10,538 BBY (Late Mandalorian Wars, cusp of the Jedi–Sith War)

Session 1: Awakening in the Void
You awaken in the cryo-vaults of the Vehemence, a Sith Imperial black‑ops research dreadnought adrift in a war‑scarred sector along the frontier. The ancient stasis chambers are silent save for malfunctioning droids clattering through corrupted quarantine protocols.
You are Human, Force‑sensitive but untrained, with a silvered tongue and an instinctive awareness of danger through the Force. Armed quickly with a conduit pipe, a Sith Imperial blaster, a high‑clearance ident‑sigil keycard, and a reinforced life‑support suit with dwindling power, you set out through rune‑etched corridors toward survival.
Fragmented Sith data‑crystals reveal the vessel’s doom: a breach in an occult containment vault has loosed a “sentient, incorporeal predator” — an experiment of Sith alchemy and forbidden Force mastery designed to consume the very essence of life. Guided by an overpowering vision, you turn from the lifeless bridge toward the hangar decks — the only true path to escape.

Session 2: Descent and Survival
Crossing the Vehemence’s cryogen‑collapsed cargo vaults, you face the hazards of deep freeze and the psychic pressure of the predator’s hunt. Here dwell twisted tuk’ata war‑hounds, Sith‑bred through cybernetic augmentation and armored in archaic plating.
Your perception gifts you a tactical edge — discovering the lead beast’s exposed control conduit. You dispatch it through calculated ambush, even using a detonated blaster energy cell as a lure to mislead the predator.
You ride failing grav‑lifts and arcane machinery downward, coaxing life from the ship’s stubborn systems through a mix of mechanical skill and raw, uncontrolled bursts of Force energy. With each surge, you feel your connection to the Force strengthening — and straining.

Session 3: The Hangar and the Pact
Hangar Bay Seven: a graveyard of shattered droids, ritual‑marked cargo, and the weathered frame of a Fury‑class Sith interceptor — a wedge‑winged starcraft unique to this era’s Imperial fleets.
A lone Sith acolyte, battle‑shaken and clutching a training saber, challenges you. The power dynamic is tense — her fear and recent trauma set against your determination. An accord is struck: she will fly if her command is respected.
The way out is blocked by ancient docking clamps; their manual release lies high on a gantry above the kill‑zone floor.

Session 4: Escape Under Fire
The predator closes in, its hunger bleeding into your thoughts. Braving the gantry, you override the clamps, the deck juddering under its psychic assault. You steady the collapsing structure with a desperate surge of Force power, buying moments to finish the release.
As the entity bursts through the hangar shielding, you make a Force‑guided leap to the interceptor’s hull. The acolyte launches the Fury into hard‑burn escape, leaving the cursed Vehemence to its specters.

Session 5: Bargaining for Survival
With your leg wound worsening and suit power dropping below forty percent, you confront the acolyte. She calls you a liability. You counter with calm pragmatism — framing yourself as an investment in survival. Intrigued, she directs you to the medbay.
A scan reveals the truth: the wound is laced with dark side corruption, a necrotic energy that bacta salves can slow but not cure. The medbay archives, unlocked with your keycard, list two remedies: limb sacrifice, or rare Force‑borne purification.
Trusting your instincts, you attempt the impossible — focusing inward and driving the cold darkness out with raw, untrained light. The agony nearly breaks you, but you succeed. The acolyte senses the flare of light and, now certain of your potential, offers new terms: apprenticeship under her tutelage in the Sith arts.

Session 6: The First Lesson
Your trial comes swiftly. The Fury’s navicomputer, still tied to Sith military networks, must be purged before a jump to safety. She orders you to do it the Sith way — not unlocking, but breaking.
You draw on memories of terror and rage from the Vehemence, channeling them into a psychic hammerblow. Circuits burn, wards shatter — the lock collapses under your will. But the outburst sends a ripple into the Force.

Session 7: Intercept
Your ripple is answered: a Sith stealth corvette in boarding configuration closes in — sleek, winged, cloaked in ritual plating. Its armament shows intent to disable, not destroy. You divert power to forward shields, target acquisition, and bulkhead lockdown to stall their harpoon.
Impact rocks the Fury. A breach opens in the ventral promenade. You rush to meet the first boarding wave.

Session 8: Breaking the Blade
Through the Force, you taste the boarders’ resolve. Deciding survival demands fear, not mercy, you unleash a killing strike — crushing the lead trooper’s chest with invisible force and scattering the squad. Using that same power to propel you forward, you cut down another at point‑blank range, then choke the survivor into submission.

Session 9: Words in the Dark
Interrogation yields a chilling truth: the Sith Imperial Inquisition has marked your Force signature and dispatched Inquisitor Vesper — a Mirialan master of mental domination and Jedi‑breaking — to capture or destroy you. This corvette was only the screening blade.
On your word, the acolyte directs the prisoner to send a falsified recall report: the Fury destroyed, its Force anomaly uncontrollable. The enemy withdraws.

Session 10: The Hunt in Shadow
As you jettison the dead and weld shut evidence of battle, the acolyte tells you of Vesper’s fate‑trails — how she unmakes prey before touching her saber, and wears the will of the broken like a mask.
You splice the navicomputer, mask the Fury’s ident as a battered free‑corsair, and wipe the Vehemence from your logs. With the hyperdrive primed, you give the order: jump to Nar Vathis, a Sith‑held moon deep in the Esstran Sector’s shadow, beyond Republic reach.
The streaking stars swallow the cockpit. The hunt will resume. But for now… you’ve vanished into the deep.

Current Status 1
Location: In hyperspace, en route to Nar Vathis — Sith‑held Outer Rim moon, staging ground for covert fleets.
Condition / Resources: Physically healed; conduit pipe, Sith military blaster, vibroblade, high‑clearance ident‑sigil keycard, secured power cell; Fury‑class interceptor (masked transponder).
Allies: Sith acolyte pilot — pragmatic, volatile, now your master in Sith tutelage.
Enemies: Soul‑devouring Force‑spawn left aboard the Vehemence; Sith Imperial Inquisition — specifically Inquisitor Vesper; unknown Mandalorian forces; opportunistic Republic elements.
Force Profile: Latent Force‑sensitivity now tested in combat and survival — capable of raw bursts of light‑side cleansing and dark‑side aggression (telekinetic crush, speed, fear‑induction). Untrained but fast‑growing.
Cover / Threat Level: Signature masked; current threat minimal until Nar Vathis arrival — but profile marked by the Inquisition. If detected, response will be decisive.



Got it — here’s your ERA‑LOCKED “Story So Far” Recap with all events retconned to the proper 10,538 BBY Old Republic setting, covering the next arcs after the one you provided.
 This keeps everything firmly in‑era while preserving the exact beats and choices from the actual play logs.

Star Wars: Fury — Story So Far
(Late Mandalorian Wars, cusp of the Jedi–Sith War — Era‑Locked Retcon)

Session 11: Masks at Nar Vathis
Hyperspace gutters as your Fury‑class interceptor drops into orbit over Nar Vathis — a vermillion‑veiled moon of obsidian spires and Sith war‑docks. Its defensive grid bristles with centuries‑old weaponry and cloaked hunter‑craft.
 Your forged ident‑sigil marks you as Officer Corvin Dray, escort to Commander Vela Sorn of Imperial Intelligence. Drawing on charisma sharpened by survival, you bluff the port authority, reciting a convincing cover: deep‑sector reconnaissance against Jedi sympathizers. The berthmaster accepts — barely — and directs you to berth Cresh‑Seven under standard scan.
You defer to Vela’s command, letting her carve a silent moat of authority between you and hostile eyes. Security sweeps are tight but superficial; your falsified persona holds as you enter the fortress‑city.

Session 12: The Watcher in the Hall
In the shadow‑halls beyond Administration, your perception snags on a subtle disturbance — not overtly hostile, but intent. A figure in the garb of a maintenance adept shadows your route.
 You signal Vela, and together spring a controlled trap in a shielded service alcove. Your quarry is quick to claim “orders from Command,” but his mind ripples with something else: fear of the Inquisition, and curiosity about you. Testing him with a calculated lie, you offer a fragment of harmless “intel” in return for his discretion.
The adept — later giving the name Lin — admits he sought you on behalf of a quiet faction inside Nar Vathis that distrusts the Inquisition’s reach. He offers safe passage through back‑routes when the need arises, in exchange for mutual protection.

Session 13: The Rift in the Force
You press deeper into Administration. Vela delivers your fabricated Intelligence report with imperial precision, shifting defense orders and planting false trails to confuse Inquisition trackers.
 As you stand watch, you feel it: a hairline crack in the Force, as if something — or someone — is observing from beyond normal perception. Vela senses less than you do, which means the observer is masking skillfully, perhaps even from her.
You whisper the warning. She adjusts your egress to avoid fixed surveillance paths and to probe for pursuit. The sense fades, but not fully — the shadow is patient.

Session 14: Withdrawal and Regrouping
Lin’s covert signal reaches you: Vesper Protocol is active two levels down — a sweep aimed at finding a “contaminant” rather than a named target. You and Vela choose caution over confrontation, retreating through the Technician’s hidden maintenance ways before the sweep seals the upper levels.
You descend multiple strata into Nar Vathis’s understructure — a labyrinth of smuggler vaults and forgotten docking bays. There, in a warren of sealed cargo and dormant loader‑frames, Vela declares a temporary refuge for rest and planning. The alliance with Lin is now pivotal: he alone can move you between decks without tripping Inquisition trip‑harps.

Session 15: The Grand Gambit
Discussion turns from hiding to removing yourselves entirely from Nar Vathis’s reach. Vela confirms Inquisitors of this era often travel with stealth shuttles — black‑hulled craft adorned with warding runes, equipped with cloaking matrices and hyperwave encryptors, their holds carrying mission logs and Sith secure archives.
Your plan:
Rendezvous with Lin to acquire new disguises and a false work assignment.


Use the chaos of data‑glitches already roiling Nar Vathis as cover to infiltrate an Inquisitor vessel berth.


Disable its identity beacon, seize its data‑cores, and vanish into hyperspace before the base recovers.



Session 16: Heist of the Shadow‑Wings
You meet Lin in an abandoned shaft. He provides nondescript Imperial work garb and service‑grade access wafers, then spins an emergency alarm through the city’s systems — luring defense teams away from Hangar Theta.
From a catwalk above, you see your target: a stealth courier‑corvette of ancient Sith design, engines keening low, its hull traced in silvered binding‑script. Only a single automaton crew‑unit guards her.
Sliding into the berth’s shadow, you breach the outer seal and board. Vela moves to the beacon‑array, hands shaping invisible locks in the air as she unthreads its locator webs. You pull the vessel’s mission log and hyperlane charts — every byte encrypted, but now yours to crack.

Session 17: Phantom Departure
With the beacon silenced, you queue a falsified flight‑order in the hangar’s dockmind. External sensors register you as a routine courier jump; no alarm follows as the corvette rises through the vermillion haze.
Once clear, you ignite the stealth field. Nar Vathis shrinks to a black‑red coin in the viewport and vanishes into starlines. In your possession: an Inquisitor’s ship, her sealed records, and the sheer power to choose your next theatre of war.
Hyperspace wraps you in its humming cocoon. As decryption begins, you and your companions — Vela Sorn and Lin — use the rare stillness to train, speak truths long‑buried, and forge the trust of those who will face the Sith’s future with you.

Current Status 2
Location: In hyperspace aboard a stolen Sith stealth courier‑corvette, design lineage tracing to the earliest Great Hyperspace War era.


Condition / Resources: Physically sound, rested; armed with Sith‑era blaster sidearm, vibroblade; high‑clearance ident‑sigil from the Vehemence; corvette’s cloaking matrix operational; encrypted Inquisitor mission log and charts in possession.


Allies:


Vela Sorn — Sith acolyte turned uneasy master; strategist and Force adept skilled in deception, mental influence, and survival tactics.


Lin — ex‑Sith Imperial slicer and infiltrator; skilled in bypassing security, falsifying records, and creating distractions.


Enemies:


Inquisitor Vesper — Mirialan Sith Inquisitor; expert in mental domination and the breaking of Jedi and Force‑sensitives.


The Sith Imperial Inquisition as a whole; unknown patrons of the Force‑predator aboard the Vehemence.


Force Profile: Developing connection, blending untrained light‑side cleansing feats with instinctive dark‑side aggression — telekinesis, fear projection, bursts of enhanced movement. Raw, dangerous, and growing rapidly under Vela’s guidance.


Cover / Threat Level: Signature masked and in stealth transit; threat low in immediate terms, but Inquisitor Vesper’s hunt is active and her loss of the courier will provoke a severe Imperial response once discovered.




Got it — here’s your full ERA‑LOCKED “Story So Far” recap for everything after the Nar Vathis heist, fully retconned to 10,538 BBY (Late Mandalorian Wars / cusp of Jedi–Sith War) setting and tone.
 All anachronisms have been replaced with period‑appropriate equivalents, tech, and political context.

Star Wars: Fury — Story So Far
(Late Mandalorian Wars, cusp of the Jedi–Sith War — Era‑Locked Retcon)

Session 18: Secrets in the Void
Aboard the stolen Sith stealth courier, you, Kaelen — once “Cipher Null” — stand with Vela Sorn and Lin as the courier’s sealed Inquisitor archives reach 97% decryption. The hum of hyperspace and the dim red‑gold glow of the consoles make the moment feel ritualistic. Rather than pry alone, you gather your allies, insisting that the truth be faced together.
The decrypted manifest reveals Vesper’s cold dossiers:
Maps of Outer Rim asset deployments, garrison strength, and hidden listening posts.


Surveillance records of hundreds of targets — Jedi, Sith traitors, and allies of convenience — including personal files on you and your companions.


Corrupted project logs from the dreadnought Vehemence, including a fragment labeled Subject Profile: Cipher Null.



Session 19: What Vesper Thinks She Knows
You open the Nar Vathis “cell” file first:
 Vesper marks you as Force‑sensitive, unpredictable, untrained — a dangerous anomaly. Lin is dismissed as a coerced tool. Vela is reduced to “muscle,” a liability to be broken or bribed.
You then read Vela’s own file — a thorough dissection of her life, motives, and fears, painting her as an ambitious defector who would abandon you for power. Instead of letting it fester, you make it clear to Vela that Vesper’s narrative is wrong — and that unity is your advantage. This moment hardens the bond between the three of you.

Session 20: The Inquisitor’s Mind
You pore over Vesper’s personal audio logs, spanning years of hunts and culminating in her obsession with you. Early entries describe neutralizing a Jedi Knight whose compassion proved his undoing. Recent ones reveal the Dark Council entrusted her with Project Vehemence: the study of an unprecedented Force “void” signature — you.
Post‑Nar Vathis, her anger cools into lethal calculation. She now sees you not as a tool, but as a rival ideology — one that transforms loyalty into strength. She vows to scour every system you touch.

Session 21: The Corrupted File
With only the damaged Vehemence archive left, Lin works to bypass the data‑traps. Fragments appear:
Imagery of you as a bound child in a cold, sterile chamber.


Cold‑blooded research notes on the “nullifying” of the Force through your presence — severing others from its flow.


A final clear tag: Name: Kaelen. Origin: Jedi Enclave — Dantana.


The recovery slams you with a half‑memory: sunlight in a stone courtyard, a woman’s voice calling your name. You tell Vela and Lin the truth — you were taken from the Enclave as a child — and declare your plan: learn who you were, then return to the Vehemence to destroy the predator Vesper left behind.

Session 22: Training the Void
En route to Dantana, Lin digs for any trace of the Force predator — your “opposite.” He uncovers veiled references to Project Chimera: a bi‑alchemical “Amplifier” able to absorb and magnify Force energy to catastrophic effect, but dangerously unstable.
Vela tests your ability in the cargo hold. You learn to focus your Sanctuary Field — first flooding a space with stillness, then shaping it into a narrow “bubble” that severs only a small part of an opponent’s Force connection. She recognises the ability as a duelist’s nightmare — and a weapon beyond anything the Sith of this era wield.

Session 23: Course to Dantana
You keep the course, reasoning that no one knows your heading. Only by mastering your nature can you confront both Vesper and the Chimera. Preparations are made to use the ruins of your homeworld as training ground — and perhaps bait for the final confrontation.

Session 24: Ghosts of the Enclave
Emerging at the system edge, Lin’s passive scan finds little — no major settlements, one ancient Jedi ruin in a remote valley — but detects faint pre‑Republic power signatures, and signs of concealed movement in the wilderness.
Choosing to act in daylight, you lead Vela and Lin on foot toward the ruins. The jungle feels alive, its presence brushing against your memory. You detect trail markers carved into trees within the past day.
From a ridge, you sight the Enclave: moss‑draped spires, shattered courtyards, and in the heart‑tower, a single steady light. Unknown watchers circle the perimeter.

Session 25: The Keeper
Deferring to your allies’ counsel, you give Lin a scant ten minutes for deeper scans while you extend your senses in the Force. You find one presence in the tower — ancient and steady — and over a dozen smaller, cautious sparks in the ruins.
Approaching openly and unarmed, you find the tower door already opening. Within waits Jocian, an elderly Twi’lek scholar — Keeper of the ruined Enclave. She names you at once as Kaelen, and speaks of your master, Leona, whose final vision foresaw your abduction, survival, and eventual return.

Session 26: The Consuming Dark
Jocian reveals her vigil: to await you and deliver Leona’s warning — that your nullifying gift was meant as a shield against a “Consuming Dark” that feeds on the Force itself. This shadow cannot be destroyed with the Force, only starved of it. She directs you to a holocron keyed to your presence.
When you open it, memories flood back — childhood training to use your calm as sanctuary, the Sith attack that stole you, Leona’s urging to embrace the darkness in peace rather than meet it with power. You now understand: the Chimera is that shadow.

Session 27: The Forgotten
Beyond the valley live the Forgotten — descendants of refugees sheltered here during past wars. They know Jocian but fear outsiders. Rather than wait, you walk unarmed into their sight and project the Sanctuary Field over their village.
Their leader, Roric, feels their fear dissolve and grants you an audience with matriarch Elara. She offers a pact: the Forgotten will watch the valley and grant you access to hidden training halls if you protect them from the “fire from the sky” ever touching their homes again.

Session 28: Preparing for the Trials
Returning to the temple, you inform Vela and Lin that the valley is secure and allies are in place. The Forgotten will be your eyes while you turn to the holocron’s teachings and the Enclave’s buried training chambers.
For the first time since fleeing the Vehemence, you have shelter, allies, and a clear path:
 Master your power. Prepare the trap. Confront Vesper and the Chimera — on your terms.

Current Status
Location: Dantana — Ruined Jedi Enclave in a concealed valley, fortified through alliance with the native Forgotten.
Condition / Resources:
Fully healed, mentally focused.


Equipped with Sith‑era blaster, vibroknife, high‑clearance ident‑sigil, stolen Sith stealth courier (cloaking matrix intact).


Access to Jedi holocron of Master Leona, hidden training halls, and Enclave ruins.


Early warning network via Forgotten hunters.


Allies:
Vela Sorn: Former Sith acolyte, now partner in purpose — combat master and tactician.


Lin: Former Sith Imperial slicer, infiltration and counter‑intel expert.


Jocian: Twi’lek Keeper of the Enclave ruins, guardian of your past.


The Forgotten: Indigenous settlement, led by Matriarch Elara and warrior‑chief Roric.


Enemies:
Inquisitor Vesper: Mirialan mentalist and Jedi‑breaker, now personally invested in your destruction.


Project Chimera: Force Amplifier — unstable, insatiable, capable of feeding on and magnifying the Force; believed lost after the Vehemence incident.


Sith Imperial Inquisition at large.


Force Profile:
Sanctuary Field — pacifies and nullifies Force connection in controlled radius; now able to focus effect precisely.


Combat Force skills: targeted telekinesis, fear modulation, bursts of speed. Trained neither as full Jedi nor Sith — hybrid instincts rooted in survival and persuasion.


Cover / Threat Level:
Hidden in uncharted valley beyond Sith and Republic maps. Threat from Vesper temporarily low, but her hunt is tireless. Chimera remains an existential danger if recovered by Sith forces.




Alright — here’s your ERA‑LOCKED “Story So Far” continued and fully retconned to the 10,538 BBY Late Mandalorian Wars / cusp of Jedi–Sith War setting.
 It picks up from the events after the Dantana discovery arc you just reviewed, updating everything into chronological campaign sessions for fast reference:

Star Wars: Fury — Story So Far
(10,538 BBY – Late Mandalorian Wars, cusp of Jedi–Sith War — Sith Empire vs Galactic Republic)

Session 29: Shadows in the Data
In the fortified quiet of Dantana’s Enclave, Lin completes partial decryption of Vesper’s stolen mission archives. Among dossiers on Jedi Knights and high‑value Sith traitors are Dark Council communiqués confirming Project Chimera was not isolated — lesser Amplifier prototypes were tested in hidden Sith laboratories across the Esstran Sector.
One tagged site lies adrift on the border between Sith Imperial and Mandalorian raiding space — its power signature akin to Chimera’s, but dormant. Vesper’s own notes suggest she meant to use that ruin to increase the Chimera’s resilience before final deployment.
You decide the site is too great a risk to ignore — and too useful as bait.

Session 30: The Muster Signal
At dusk, Jocian summons you to the western ridge. Her hunters have seen Mandalorian scouts — advanced parties for a larger force — probing the system’s uncharted approaches. Master Zhar Lestin, recently landed in a battered Defender‑class corvette, warns that the Mandalorians are pressing deep into both Republic and Sith territories, seeking any superweapon to shift the wars. A Chimera‑class entity would draw them like carrion birds.
You convince Zhar to join the Dantana defense council, entrusting him with coordinating The Forgotten’s militia. He agrees — but warns that leaving the valley risks revealing its position unless cloaked movement is used.

Session 31: Awakening the Bastion
In the Enclave’s deep vaults, guided by Master Zhar and Lin, you commune directly with the ruin’s ancient defense nexus. The system is a blend of pre‑Republic crystal matrices and kinetic energy projectors: barrier walls, retractable turret beds, and wide‑arc sonic disrupters.
 You set your intent clearly in the Force: to shield the people and the knowledge here from destruction. The Enclave accepts, knitting you into its targeting web until your awareness flows through every embrasure and wall.
From now on, your mind can guide the Bastion’s weapons as easily as your own hands.

Session 32: The Siege of Dantana
The Order of Unbroken Truth arrives on burn‑in vectors — a Terminus‑class command cruiser flanked by two Harbinger‑class troop carriers. Drop‑pods streak toward the valley in twin streams aimed for the western and northern gates.
You act instantly, pouring thought into the defense grid. Kinetic barriers blaze into golden arcs, hurling assault pods into the mountainside. Turrets burn the night sky crimson. On the north ridge, you trigger sonic disrupters — enemy bombers smash into rock. The first wave is annihilated.
In orbit, the cruiser holds fire — they want the Enclave intact. Then a new presence brushes your mind: cold, disciplined, and probing. The Hunt Master has arrived.

Session 33: The Duel of Wills
You sink into your Sanctuary Field before the Hunt Master’s assault begins. His strike is not brute terror but precision — planting doubt by showing the endless strength of the Empire, the danger your defiance brings to the Forgotten, and the hypocrisy in claiming peace while leaving ruin in your wake.
But you remain a placid lake, offering neither anger nor fear. The probe collapses, his frustration boiling over. Lin’s voice breaks through — the Hunt Master is descending personally.

Session 34: Clash in the Courtyard
You meet him in the courtyard with Vela at your side, her crimson blade igniting in defiance. He names himself Darth Rictus, Hand of the Order, wielding a rare white‑bladed lightsaber. You answer with your title and history, conjuring your shimmering Sanctuary Gloves — null‑fields shaped to your hands.
The duel is a storm. You phase into the fight as a living interference field, extinguishing his blade at key moments while Vela strikes with predator’s grace. With precision and trust, you create the opening she needs: Sanctuary snuffing his guard, her saber thrust ending his life.
In orbit, the Order’s fleet breaks, retreating in disarray.

Session 35: The Aftermath
The valley breathes again. The Forgotten celebrate quietly, wary this was but a single battle in a greater war. You stand over the body of Rictus knowing two truths:
You’ve bought time for Dantana.


The Order will come again — likely with Vesper herself at their head.


Master Zhar urges you to take the fight away from the valley before the enemy regroups. Jocian counsels that mastering your gift further may be the only way to end this.

Session 36: Choosing the Next Front
The options before you:
Seek the dormant Amplifier site on the Mandalorian frontier — destroy it before the Sith or Mandos can claim it.


Hunt Vesper directly, striking before she can marshal a second crusade toward Dantana.


Fortify further, knowing each day’s delay risks the valley’s secrecy.


With Vela and Lin ready, and Zhar prepared to hold the valley in your absence, your next theatre is yours to choose.

Current Status
Location: Dantana Jedi Enclave — fortified valley with active barriers and turrets, allied population (The Forgotten).
Condition / Resources: Fully healed; weapons — Sith‑era blaster, vibroknife, lightsaber‑nullifying Sanctuary Gloves (summoned power); high‑clearance ident‑sigil; stolen Sith stealth courier (cloak functional); control of Enclave defense systems.
Allies:
Vela Sorn — former Sith acolyte, lightsaber duelist, battle partner.


Lin — ex‑Sith slicer, Enclave systems co‑administrator.


Master Zhar Lestin — Jedi Master, military advisor to valley defense.


Jocian — Twi’lek Keeper of Enclave lore.


The Forgotten — native militia under Roric and Elara.


Enemies:
Inquisitor Vesper — Mirialan Sith Inquisitor of the Order of Unbroken Truth, ideological zealot.


Order of Unbroken Truth — Sith cult‑sect pursuing you as “Anathema Kaelen.”


Project Chimera — primary Amplifier entity destroyed, but knowledge endures; lesser prototypes possible.


Mandalorian Clans — opportunistic threat if Amplifier tech discovered.


Force Profile: Sanctuary Field mastery — wide‑area nullification or finely‑focused disruption. Manifested as melee “gloves” that can extinguish lightsaber blades on contact. Telekinetic bursts, targeted Force augmentation of allies, and resilience under mental attack.
Cover / Threat Level: Hidden in cloaked valley; currently low local threat, but high‑value target in both Sith and Mandalorian intelligence nets. Likely escalation if inactive too long.


Got it — here’s your ERA‑LOCKED “Story So Far” continuation, fully retconned to the 10,538 BBY Late Mandalorian Wars / cusp of Jedi–Sith War period.

Star Wars: Fury — Story So Far
(Late Mandalorian Wars, cusp of the Jedi–Sith War — Sith Empire vs Galactic Republic)

Session 37: The Hunt Becomes the Strike
After a brief council with Vela, Lin, Master Zhar, and the valley’s elders, you make the choice: you will take the fight to the Order before they can regroup. A single shard of information from Rictus’s wargear — a scorched data‑crystal — points to a term repeated in his private tactical log: “The Korriban Scrimshaw.”
 Cross‑referencing Sith Intelligence glyphs, Lin confirms it is the codename for a Sith relic — an ancient ivory map‑talism to one of the cult’s holiest and most guarded sanctuaries. If retrieved, it could lead you directly to the Order’s Master.

Session 38: Into the Maw
The first sign of the relic surfaces on The Vex, a deep‑lawless smuggler port carved into a bound cluster of asteroids in the Stygian Caldera’s fringe. You and Vela land the stealth courier under an assumed banner while Lin remains aboard, ready to run slicing interference.
Using charm and sharp intuition to read the Force‑currents of the crowd, you find an unlikely lead in Xylo, a four‑armed Xy’kar broker whose booth overlooks the bazaar. You earn audience by using the relic’s name as bait. Xylo delivers the truth: the Scrimshaw is not a key, but a Force‑sensitive map‑artifact that reveals a hidden hyperlane when held by a powerful adept. Its current owner is a Sith‑aligned privateer, Vornax, celebrating his win of it in the Starfall Casino on Nar Shaddaa.

Session 39: The Scalpel Before the Sword
Rejecting Vela’s call for a direct kill, you adopt Lin’s heist plan: infiltrate the Starfall’s high‑stakes sabacc tables, goad Vornax into wagering the Scrimshaw, and win it in a way that looks like nothing more than cruel chance. Dressed as a wealthy thrill‑seeker with Vela as muscle, you play Vornax with practiced imperfection — folding when needed, winning enough to be noticed, bleeding him dry until only his pride is left. He stakes the Scrimshaw as the only way to restore face and loses to you in the only hand that could beat his — a victory so statistically ridiculous he cannot suspect cheating.
You leave Nar Shaddaa without drawing a weapon.

Session 40: The Path to Aethel
Aboard the stealth courier, you activate the relic. Under your touch, the carved whorls realign, glowing with a blood‑red light and whispering in languages half‑familiar from nightmare. A lone hyperspace lane unfurls on the console — a forbidden route cutting through the Wraith’s Shroud, an unstable stellar maelstrom, to a storm‑wreathed world named only Aethel.
You feel it even before Lin finishes plotting the course: the Master is there.

Session 41: Through the Wraith’s Shroud
The passage is agony for ship and crew alike — gravitational shears, semi‑real eddies of dark‑charged space, and a psychic spear from Aethel’s surface. You hold your mind and theirs in your Sanctuary, dissolving the invasive whispers. Deviations guided by your Force sense carry you clear of hazards the navicomputer can’t see.
When the courier breaks realspace, lightning‑veined clouds writhe over a world of eternal twilight. A single obsidian spire at the edge of a black ocean radiates both power and challenge. A summons vector pings your nav‑panel — a blatant invitation.

Session 42: The Kill‑Box and the Nullifier
Choosing speed over stealth, you descend to the indicated landing platform, knowing it’s a prepared trap. Your expanded senses map the kill zone: concealed turrets, energy grids, and psychic trip‑wards.
At your signal, Vela advances aggressively, daring the defenses to reveal themselves. Your Sanctuary field shields her through the withering opening barrage while she dismantles the gunnery nests. Together, you cross the platform unscathed.

Session 43: The Test of Identity
The spire’s gate seals behind you into a vast, dim hall. At its center kneels a statue radiating crushing despair — a psychic lure meant to force Sith‑style destruction or Jedi‑style compassion, both wastes.
With Vela combing the walls for hidden mechanisms, you choose the third path: to sit in stillness and let the despair flow through and past you. You neither destroy nor heal — you refuse the frame of the game. The trap collapses, revealing a spiral descent.

Session 44: Duel in the Dark Core
At the heart of the spire waits the Master. Frail flesh throned in a web of conduits, he is fused into the fortress, mind and machine one. He calls you a flawed weapon to be decommissioned and unleashes the full power of his sanctum.
You answer by manifesting Sanctuary Blades — hovering shards of null‑space that orbit you in attack and defense. In shock, the Master diverts his energy to break you. You send one of your blades across the floor to anchor to Vela’s lightsaber hilt, forging a double‑bladed fusion of crimson fury and perfect silence.

Session 45: Severing the Will
Pinned under the combined assault of spire‑lightning, telekinetic crush, and mechanical limbs, you throw every blade to shield Vela for the breath she needs. She vaults the gap, strikes deep, and your paired blades bite through the conduit linking Master and machine.
The feedback swallows him whole — body vaporized, mind erased — and the spire begins to implode. Following Lin’s voice over comms, you sprint through a thermal exhaust vent to the courier and escape into orbit as the sanctum collapses into the black sea.
The Master of the Order of Unbroken Truth is no more.

Session 46: Ashes and Horizons
Breaking Aethel’s pull, you look out at a galaxy momentarily absent the Order’s guiding hand. Lin is alive, Vela stands unbowed, and you — for the first time — are enemy to neither Sith nor Jedi by leash or chain. The war still rages across the stars, and the cult’s remnants will seek vengeance, but for now, you are free to choose the field.
One promise remains in the back of your mind: to one day surprise Lin with a droid partner worthy of him.

Current Status
Location: In hyperspace aboard a stolen Sith stealth courier; exact vector undisclosed.
Condition / Resources: Fully healed; Sanctuary Field and derivative forms (Gloves, Shield, Blades) battle‑tested; Sith‑era blaster, vibroblade; high‑clearance ident‑sigil; Korriban Scrimshaw map (now inert); cloaked courier with hyperdrive.
Allies:
Vela Sorn — Former Sith acolyte, now bonded partner in battle; master of Form VII Juyo combat.


Lin — Ex‑Sith slicer/pilot; unmatched in infiltration and systems warfare.


Master Zhar Lestin — Jedi sage, holding Dantana’s defense.


The Forgotten — Valley militia sworn to protect the Enclave.


Jocian — Twi’lek Keeper of Jedi lore and your past.


Enemies:
Inquisitor Vesper — Mirialan Sith mentalist; now leaderless cult may rally to her.


Order of Unbroken Truth (remnants) — Decapitated but not annihilated.


Project Chimera (prototypes) — Dormant sites may still exist.


Mandalorian Clans — Warbands seeking superweapons in the Outer Rim.


Force Profile:
 Sanctuary Field mastery — nullifying wide zones or precise connections; physical augmentation as Gloves, autonomous Blades; defensive mental bastion against psychic intrusion. Unaligned to Jedi or Sith dogma, wielded with adaptive pragmatism.
Cover / Threat Level:
 Courier’s cloak and scrambled ident keep you cold for now; however, word of the Master’s fall will travel fast through Sith Intelligence networks. The next move is yours — and the galaxy will be watching.


Understood — here’s your ERA‑LOCKED “Story So Far” continuation, covering everything that happens after the destruction of the Order’s Master, fully retconned for 10,538 BBY (Late Mandalorian Wars / cusp of Jedi–Sith War), preserving all the original beats of the sessions but framed in‑era.

Star Wars: Fury — Story So Far
(Late Mandalorian Wars, cusp of the Jedi–Sith War — Sith Empire vs Galactic Republic)

Session 47: Choosing the Forge
With the Master of the Order reduced to ash in the black sea of Aethel, the Nightfall prowls the trade‐void under full cloak. For the first time, there is no urgent departure point on your star charts — only open choice.
 Kaelen, Vela, and Lin gather in the stealth courier’s galley to take stock. Victory has stripped away pursuit, but it has also pulled the curtain back on a harsher truth: without the Sanctuary Field in its former strength, your survival and the crew’s defense will hinge on new tools.
It’s during this reckoning that your newest crew member, T7‑O4 — the rare and deeply sentient T7‑series astromech retrieved on Corulag — projects an ancient star map from its memory banks. It is not a chart to Ilum or Ossus, but to a world unknown even to the Jedi Archives: a molten, violet‐starred sphere called only The Forge. Once, it was where Jedi explorers forged crystals from raw planetary essence, not by finding them, but shaping them through trial and will.
The decision is swift: the galaxy can wait. You will go to The Forge.

Session 48: The Long Crossing
The route into the Deep Unknown Regions offers no reliable waystations. Days stretch into more than a standard week of hyperspace drift.
 You exploit the time — turning the voyage into a disciplined exchange of skills:
Mornings with Vela are spent turning your injury‐compensated stance into something sharper — a one‐handed, agile dueling form blending Makashi precision with Soresu defense.


Afternoons with Lin immerse you in the slicer’s art, reading machine‐logic like a second Force sense.


Evenings with T7 bring forgotten Jedi reconnaissance logs to life — ancient surveys of The Forge’s molten continents and the trials they house.


By the tenth day, bonds long tested in war are tempered again in shared purpose.

Session 49: Descent into Fire
The Nightfall emerges from hyperspace into the shadow of a violent violet sun. The Forge churns below — oceans of liquid metal, continents of obsidian, and a central volcano as wide as a city. Lin and T7 chart a landing plateau halfway up the southern flank, the closest stable ground to the trial’s entrance.
 During descent, mag‐charged storms batter the courier’s shields; landing is a teeth‐jarring slam. Outside, the air hums with Force‐pressure so thick it’s a physical thing.

Session 50: The Narrow Path
The route to the caldera’s mid‐point is a climb through knife‐sharp volcanic glass ridges. Midway, a ledge bottlenecks into a crystal‐lined alcove — and a nest of obsidian‐scaled predators, quadrupeds with molten eyes, blocks your path. Vela advises pre‐emptive strike. Instead, you extend the Sanctuary outward as a pulse of benign intent, showing yourselves as travellers, not rivals.
 The alpha watches, then backs into shadow. The path beyond is yours.

Session 51: The Trial Within
The cave mouth in the mountainside breathes heat and low, seismic rhythm — the heartbeat of the world. Inside, the tunnel opens into a titanic crystalline chamber surrounding a lone obsidian altar. Energy slams into your mind at once — visions tailored to desire:
You, whole and godlike, Sanctuary unfettered.


Vela, crowned in Sith command.


Lin, eternal and perfect in machine‐logic.


Instead of breaking the illusions separately, you gamble everything — forging a Sanctuary Bond between you to hold all three against the psychic storm. It works — for a moment — before shattering under the planet’s raw Force tide. Staggering, you physically anchor yourself to Vela, speaking your shared history into the storm until her focus returns. The unity spreads; Lin frees himself seeing you both unbowed.
The Forge recognizes the passing of its test; the psychic gale last fades.

Session 52: Forging the Crystal
At the altar, you make your offering — not a fragment of self, but the whole:
Your will to survive, the iron core forged through every trial.


Your bonds, golden and crimson threads tied to Vela, Lin, and T7.


Your Sanctuary, now a tempered, rarer flame, used to shield that fusion.


The altar hums, and from its heart coalesces a kyber crystal like no other: smoky storm‐grey shot through with slow rivers of gold and crimson, wrapped in a faint indigo aura that drinks the light.

Session 53: The Blade of the Pack
Back aboard the Nightfall, you enter deep meditation in the ship’s small workshop. Components rise in a slow, orbiting circle: a compact single‐handed hilt sheathed in Forge‑volcanic inlay, basic activation stud, emitter tuned to your duelist’s stance.
 The crystal fits with a click felt in your soul. When you ignite it for the first time, the blade blooms storm‐grey, gold and crimson eddies swirling within, haloed by the shadowed indigo of the Sanctuary. It is unmistakably yours — a weapon of survival, loyalty, and the quiet void.

Current Status
Location: The Nightfall, cloaked in deep space beyond The Forge.
Condition / Resources: Fully healed; new single‑handed lightsaber with Forge‑forged crystal; Sanctuary Field diminished but precise; Sith‑era blaster, vibroknife, high‐clearance ident‑sigil; cloaked courier fully operational; T7‑O4 active.
Allies:
Vela Sorn — Former Sith acolyte, sworn partner, lightsaber duelist.


Lin — Ex‑Sith slicer, cybernetic leg and neural interface, tech‑mastermind.


T7‑O4 — Ancient, loyal Jedi astromech with pre‑Great War archives.


Master Zhar Lestin, Jocian, and the Forgotten — allied on Dantana.


Enemies:
Inquisitor Vesper — Mirialan Sith mentalist, still on your trail.


Remnants of the Order of Unbroken Truth.


Possible Chimera‑class prototypes in sector.


Opportunistic Mandalorian warbands.


Force Profile: Sanctuary Field — now slower to charge, immense cost to large bursts; precision nullification in gloves or blades; new synergy via external “batteries” and Vela’s modified saber; telekinesis, speed, fear modulation retained.
Cover / Threat Level: Currently cold and cloaked. Next move is yours — but any use of the new saber or a large Sanctuary display will ripple through the Force, and Vesper will feel it.

Star Wars: Fury — Story So Far
Retconned for 10,538 BBY (Late Mandalorian Wars, cusp of Jedi–Sith War — Sith Empire vs. Galactic Republic)

Session 47: Choosing the Forge
In the shadowed aftermath of the Order’s destruction on Aethel, the Nightfall prowls the deep void beneath maximum cloak, its crew at a rare crossroads. With no pursuit at their heels and Sanctuary power waning, Kaelen, Vela, Lin, and the newly recruited ancient astromech T7‑O4 contemplate their future.
T7‑O4 reveals a lost star map from its memory banks, not leading to Ilum or Ossus, but an unknown molten world: The Forge. Legends say Jedi of old journeyed to shape crystals from planetary essence, forging them by trial rather than simply harvesting. The crew agrees: their next step is not for war, but for renewal — to seek The Forge.

Session 48: The Long Crossing
The voyage into the Unknown Regions drifts over days. The sabers rest unused; training and knowledge now fill the hours.
Mornings: Vela drills Kaelen in one‑handed duelist forms, blending precise Makashi with enduring Soresu.


Afternoons: Lin guides Kaelen through the subtleties of ancient starship logic, blending data‑slicing with mechanical intuition.


Evenings: T7‑O4 narrates the storied past — Jedi reconnaissance logs, tales of The Forge’s molten seas, and the trials that shaped legendary crystals.


Bonds forged through conflict are now tempered by shared purpose.

Session 49: Descent into Fire
Nightfall bursts from hyperspace above The Forge, a world of violet sunlight, rivers of liquid ore, and obsidian plateaus. Lin and T7 make planetfall on a brittle ledge up the volcanic flank.
Violent magnetic storms buffet the hull. Groundfall is hard and bruising, and the air around the ship vibrates with raw Force energy.

Session 50: The Narrow Path
A climb over razored volcanic glass brings the party to a crystal‑fringed alcove, guarded by obsidian‑scaled predators with glowing eyes.
Vela suggests they preempt attack. Instead, Kaelen reaches out with the Sanctuary Field in a pulse of calm, telegraphing their peaceful passage. The alpha retreats into the shadows, and the way forward opens — proof the Sanctuary can still turn threat aside with balance.

Session 51: The Trial Within
The cave mouth at the caldera’s heart leads to a vaulted chamber amethyst with crystal, a lone altar at its core. As all three approach, psychic visions batter their minds — offers of power, perfection, and fulfillment tailored to their deepest desires.
Refusing to stand alone, Kaelen forges a Sanctuary bond across the group, giving them strength against the mental onslaught. The planet’s raw Force energy rips through the illusion, forcing unity against the storm. Only by speaking truth — their shared history, pain, and victories — do they emerge intact. The Forge accepts this sacrifice, granting passage.

Session 52: Forging the Crystal
At the altar, Kaelen offers not just a fragment of self, but his entire will — survival honed by trials, bonds to Vela, Lin, and T7, and the tempered Sanctuary within. The altar responds: forging a unique kyber crystal from essence — storm‑grey, flecked with gold and crimson, haloed in indigo shadow. Unlike any before it, it promises subtlety and power in equal measure.

Session 53: The Blade of the Pack
Back aboard Nightfall, Kaelen meditates in the ship’s workshop, assembling a compact hilt inlaid with Forge metals. The crystal sings as it’s set within, and upon ignition, the blade unfurls storm‑grey and gold with hints of Sanctuary’s indigo, swirling with a soul‑deep resonance. No longer just a survivor, Kaelen’s weapon embodies the spirit of his found family and the ordeal endured.

Current Status (August 13, 2025)
Location: Nightfall, cloaked in deep space beyond The Forge.


Condition/Resources:


Crew fully healed, united and balanced.


Kaelen wields a new single‑handed lightsaber forged from The Forge’s unique crystal.


Sanctuary Field power precise but harder to recharge; talismans and external “batteries” prepped for regulated use.


Sith‑era blaster, vibroknife, high‑clearance ident‑sigil, supplies and stealth ship in top condition.


T7‑O4 active with rare Jedi archives.


Allies:


Vela Sorn: Ex‑Sith acolyte, saber duelist, trusted partner.


Lin: Ex‑Sith engineer and slicer, tech mastermind, loyal.


T7‑O4: Ancient Jedi astromech, pre‑war archives.


Dantana’s Master Zhar Lestin, Keeper Jocian, and the Forgotten (distant allies).


Enemies:


Inquisitor Vesper: Mirialan Sith mentalist, still searching for Kaelen.


Remnant Sith cults, including the broken Order of Unbroken Truth.


Chimera‑class amplifier prototypes rumored in sector.


Opportunistic Mandalorian raiders.


Force Profile:


Sanctuary Field: slower charge, immense cost for large effects, precise nullification via gloves/blades.


External talismans and Vela’s saber for distributed use.


Telekinesis, speed, and modulation of fear retained.


Cover/Threat Level:


Cold, cloaked, without active pursuit.


Any significant display of Sanctuary or the Forge blade will echo through the sector, likely drawing attention from Vesper and Sith Imperial trackers.


The next move is yours.



Drop directly into play: the Nightfall rides the galactic dark near The Forge, every system humming with readiness and possibility — the next theater of war awaits the crew’s decision.
______________________________________________________________________________

Full Transcript:
The hiss of depressurization is the first sound you hear, a sharp, invasive noise that cuts through the deep silence of your long sleep. Your eyes flutter open, heavy and unfocused. A thin layer of frost coats your eyelashes, and each blink feels like scraping away a layer of ice. You are encased in a vertical, coffin-like pod, its transparent durasteel door now retracting into the ceiling.
Cold, recycled air floods your lungs, carrying the sterile, metallic scent common to starships. The world outside your pod is dim, lit only by the rhythmic pulse of red emergency lights casting long, dancing shadows across the room. You see rows of identical stasis pods lining the walls, most still sealed and dark. A few are shattered, their former occupants gone or... worse. The low, ominous hum of a ship's engines in distress vibrates through the deck plates beneath your bare feet.
You feel weak, your muscles atrophied from disuse. A simple, gray tunic and trousers cling to your body, offering little warmth. You have no memory of how you got here, who you are, or why you were put into stasis. The only thing you feel is a gnawing, instinctual certainty: you need to get off this ship. 
As your senses slowly return, you notice a flicker of movement in the reflection on a nearby darkened monitor. It's a fleeting shape, gone as quickly as it appeared. At the same time, a faint, almost inaudible whisper seems to echo in the back of your mind—a premonition of danger, a subtle nudge from your latent Force sensitivity.
To your left is a heavy blast door, currently sealed, with a control panel next to it that is sparking intermittently. To your right, a narrow maintenance corridor disappears into the shadows, a loose grate on the floor suggesting a possible alternate route. Straight ahead, at the far end of the bay, is a computer terminal that appears to be active, its screen displaying a scrolling wall of text in a language you don't recognize.
You make your way toward the far end of the cryo bay, your steps unsteady but determined. The floor is cold and grimy against your bare feet. As you get closer to the computer terminal, the scrolling text on its screen becomes clearer, though no more comprehensible. It’s a harsh, angular script, utterly alien to you. The sheer volume of data flowing past is dizzying.
You place a hand on the console, leaning on it for support. Staring at the cascade of symbols, a wave of frustration washes over you. This is useless. How can you escape if you can't even understand what's happening?
But then, as you focus your intent on the screen, a strange thing happens. The noise in your mind—the faint whisper you heard earlier—sharpens into a feeling, a distinct pull. Your eyes are drawn to a specific section of the screen. The torrent of alien text fades into the background, and a simple wireframe schematic of the ship glows with a faint blue light. A single blinking dot indicates your current position: Cryo Bay. A thin, dotted line traces a path from your location through a series of corridors to another blinking point labeled with a symbol you intuitively understand means Bridge.
A sudden, loud clatter of metal on metal behind you shatters your concentration. The schematic vanishes, replaced by the scrolling text once more.
You spin around to see a humanoid security droid lurching into the room from the maintenance corridor you'd considered earlier. It's heavily damaged—one of its arms is missing, and sparks fly from an open panel on its chest. Its single, glowing red photoreceptor swivels to fix on you.
"Unauthorized... organic... detected," it rasps, its voice a discordant mix of static and garbled protocol. "Sector... is... quarantined. Prepare... for pacification."
The droid raises its remaining arm, which ends in a heavy, sparking pincer. It takes a slow, deliberate step toward you. The premonition of danger you felt before is now a blaring alarm in your mind.
Your instincts scream, and you react without a moment's hesitation. Instead of confronting the damaged droid head-on, you dive to the side, your movements surprisingly agile for someone who just woke from stasis. You slip into the deep shadows between two towering cryo-pods, the metal cold against your back. The faint hum of the Force that you felt earlier sharpens into a focused awareness, guiding your steps and silencing your footfalls.
(Perception/Stealth Roll: 23 - Critical Success)
The security droid lurches forward to the spot where you were just standing. "Target... has... moved," it grinds out, its red photoreceptor sweeping across the room in a clumsy, predictable pattern. It seems to have completely lost track of you. From your hiding spot, you have a clear view of its damaged chassis and the sparking, vulnerable components within.
Your eyes, now adjusting to the gloom, dart across the debris-strewn floor. Amidst the shattered durasteel and tangled wiring from a broken pod, your gaze locks onto a length of heavy-duty conduit pipe—about a meter long and solid enough to have some real weight to it.
(Improvisation Roll: 17 - Success)
You carefully scoop it up. The pipe feels cold and solid in your hand, a reassuring weight. You are now armed and hidden, with the element of surprise on your side. The droid continues its slow, methodical scan of the room, its back currently turned to your position.
You grip the heavy conduit pipe, its cold, metallic weight a stark contrast to the thrum of energy you feel buzzing just beneath your skin. The Force, a sensation you can't name but instinctively trust, flows through you, sharpening your focus, slowing the world down for a brief, crystalline moment.
The droid's red eye continues its useless scan of the opposite wall. This is your chance.
(Combat Roll: 18 - Success)
You explode from the shadows, your movements a fluid, silent blur. You close the distance in two quick strides, raising the pipe high. With a surge of adrenaline, you bring the weapon down in a powerful arc, striking the droid's sparking chest cavity with a sickening crunch of metal and wires.
A shower of orange sparks erupts from the impact point. The droid convulses violently, its vocoder emitting a final, mangled burst of static: "System... failure... Criti-criti-criti—"
Its single red photoreceptor flickers wildly before dimming into darkness. The hulking metal frame teeters for a moment and then crashes to the floor with a deafening clang that echoes through the cryo bay.
Silence returns, deeper and more profound than before. The only sounds are the low hum of the ship and your own ragged breathing. You stand over the twitching, disabled automaton, the conduit pipe still held firmly in your hands. You have survived your first test.
The path the droid came from—the maintenance corridor—is now an open invitation. The terminal that showed you the schematic beckons. And the sealed blast door remains a potential, if problematic, exit.
You cast one last glance at the disabled droid, then turn your attention to the narrow opening it emerged from. Gripping the conduit pipe, you step into the maintenance corridor, leaving the cold silence of the cryo bay behind.
The change in atmosphere is immediate. The corridor is tight, barely wide enough for you to walk through without turning your shoulders. The air is thick with the smell of ozone and hot metal. A tangled web of thick cables and coolant pipes lines the walls and ceiling, many of them spitting sparks or leaking a fine, vaporous mist that chills your skin. The floor is a metal grate, and through it, you can see the deeper, darker guts of the ship's infrastructure.
Despite the claustrophobic environment, you feel a faint sense of reassurance. Your memory of the schematic—that brief, intuitive flash of understanding—tells you this is the right way. The corridor seems to be heading in the general direction of the "Bridge" symbol you saw.
You follow the path for about twenty meters, navigating around a collapsed section of ceiling paneling. As you round a gentle curve, the red emergency lighting casts a grim scene into view. Slumped against the far wall is a body. It's a human male, dressed in a black and gray uniform adorned with a harsh, angular insignia—an emblem you vaguely associate with the Sith Empire. He appears to have been killed by a blast wound to the chest, now long cold.
Near his outstretched hand lies a datapad, its screen dark. His hip is still adorned with a holster containing a standard-issue blaster pistol.
The corridor continues past the body, but just ahead, you see a junction. The main path goes straight, while a smaller access tunnel branches off to the right, from which you can hear a low, rhythmic humming sound.
The whisper of the Force in your mind is neutral, offering no clear warning or specific guidance, merely a heightened awareness of your surroundings and the options before you.
You kneel beside the fallen Sith officer, the grim reality of your situation settling in. Survival comes first.
You carefully pry the blaster pistol from the corpse's rigid fingers. It's a standard-issue Sith military sidearm, heavy and cold in your hand. The weapon feels potent, a significant and deadly upgrade from the simple pipe you've been carrying. You tuck the pipe into your tunic's waistband—no sense in discarding a perfectly good tool—and holster the blaster, the weight of it a strange comfort.aminoapps
Next, you pick up the datapad. Its screen is dark, but a press of the activation stud brings it to life with a flicker. The display is filled with the same angular, hostile script you saw on the bridge terminal, but this time, something is different. As you focus, trying to make sense of the information, that familiar whisper in your mind guides your fingers. You navigate menus and bypass security prompts with an intuition that isn't your own, your latent Force sensitivity translating your intent into action.
(Logic/Perception Roll: 19 - High Success)
The encrypted files begin to yield their secrets. You piece together fragmented logs and official-looking reports:ign+1
Ship Identification: This vessel is the Vehemence, an Sith Imperial Black Ops research ship.


Mission Status: The logs speak of a "containment failure" related to a top-secret research project in the ship's lower labs. The last entry is a panicked, ship-wide quarantine order from the Bridge, followed by the activation of all security droids with "pacification" protocols. This explains the droid you encountered.


Key Information: One file contains what looks like a security schematic. It highlights a maintenance override command for the primary blast doors in the cryo bay. The code is simple: Crimson Blade.


The last log entry you manage to decrypt is chilling. It's a researcher's personal log, mentioning a "sentient, non-corporeal bioweapon" that has breached its containment field. The entry cuts off abruptly.
You now possess a weapon and critical information. The path ahead continues into the ship's depths, and the side tunnel still hums with an unknown energy. But the code you've found offers a potential path backward, through the main blast door you first saw.
You decide against rushing forward or backward. The datapad's chilling report of a "non-corporeal bioweapon" and the constant, unnerving whisper in the back of your mind demand attention. You need to understand what this feeling is.
You find a relatively clear spot on the grimy floor, holster the blaster, and sit, crossing your legs. You close your eyes, shutting out the dim, red emergency lights and the sight of the dead Sith officer. You focus on your breathing, trying to replicate a state of calm you don't even remember learning. You reach out with your feelings, not to the cold metal of the ship, but inward, to the source of the whisper.
(Force Sensitivity Roll: 22 - Critical Success)
The effect is immediate and overwhelming. The chaotic noise in your head doesn't just quiet down; it snaps into perfect, terrifying clarity. It isn't a whisper. It's a beacon. A thrumming network of energy that connects everything. You can feel the cold, dead space in the cells of the corpse nearby. You can feel the thrum of the humming machinery down the side tunnel—a power conduit. You can feel the faint, residual life signatures of the thousands of souls who died on this ship.
And you can feel the bioweapon.
A vision floods your mind, unbidden. You see a swirling vortex of black and purple energy—a creature of pure dark side malice—drifting through the ship's lower decks. It has no body, no eyes, yet it sees. It is drawn to life, to consciousness, to fear. It is a predator of the soul.
The vision shifts. You see the Bridge, the destination from the schematic. It's a death trap. The quarantine was activated there, but the entity is on the Bridge, having consumed the life force of the entire command crew. The Force screams a warning: do not go to the Bridge.
Then, a new path emerges in your mind, not from the schematic but from the Force itself. A clear, urgent pull towards a different part of the Vehemence: the Hangar Bay. It feels like the only viable chance of survival. The path isn't laid out for you, but the destination is now certain.
You open your eyes, the vision fading but the knowledge remaining. You are Force-sensitive. The ship is a tomb. The creature is real. And the Bridge is a lie. Your only hope is the Hangar Bay.
You kneel once more beside the body of the Sith officer. This time, you don't just see him with your eyes; you reach out with your senses, with the Force. You close your eyes and let the energy that now thrums at the edge of your consciousness guide your hands.
(Perception/Force Roll: 16 - Success)
The Force is a subtle guide. It doesn't give you a vision, but a powerful, undeniable hunch. Your fingers are drawn not to the officer's pockets or belt, but to the inside lining of his tunic. There, stitched into the fabric, is a small, hidden slit. You slide your fingers inside and find a thin, black metallic card. It’s cool to the touch and marked with a silver, stylized Sith emblem. It feels important—a high-clearance security keycard. You pocket it, a new key for a lock you haven't yet found.
With this small victory secured, you turn and head back the way you came. The journey through the maintenance corridor feels different now. The sparking cables and hissing pipes are no longer just a chaotic mess; you can almost feel the flow of energy through them. The claustrophobia is replaced by a strange sense of awareness. You are a part of the ship, and it is a part of you.
You emerge back into the vast, cold silence of the cryo bay. The scene is exactly as you left it: the shattered pods, the silent computer terminal, and the sparking control panel next to the heavy blast door. Your first kill, the security droid, lies in a heap on the floor, a monument to your survival.
You are armed, you have a security keycard, and you have the override code—Crimson Blade. The Force has warned you that the Bridge is death and that your only hope is the Hangar Bay. The blast door in front of you is the first step on that new path.
You decide to trust your newfound senses. While the blast door is a tempting and known exit, the computer terminal provided the first clue, and with your enhanced perception, it might offer more.
You walk back to the glowing console, the alien script still scrolling endlessly. This time, instead of just looking, you place your palm flat against the screen. You close your eyes, focusing your will, not on understanding the language, but on finding the location—the Hangar Bay—that the Force has revealed as your only hope.
(Logic/Force Control Roll: 20 - High Success)
The connection is instantaneous and powerful. The terminal responds not to a command, but to your intent. The alien text dissolves, replaced by a fully interactive 3D wireframe schematic of the entire Vehemence. The path to the Bridge glows with a sickly, dangerous red—a trap, just as your vision foretold.
You push the thought of the Hangar into the machine, and the schematic rotates and zooms with startling speed. It highlights two potential routes:
Primary Route: A long, winding path from the main concourse (through the blast door) that circumnavigates the entire ship. It's the "official" route, but it's long and exposes you to large, open areas.


Secondary Route: A much more direct path that cuts through a series of Cryo-Cargo Holds located directly below the cryo bay. The schematic shows this route leads almost directly to the hangar elevators.


As you focus on this shortcut, a new data packet overlays the screen. It's a biohazard warning.
ALERT: Cryo-Cargo Holds 3-7 compromised. Coolant leak has resulted in flash-freeze protocol activation. Temperature at -120 degrees. Regulation environmental suit required for entry.
The terminal helpfully highlights the location of the nearest suit storage: a small Locker Room connected to this very cryo bay through an unmarked service door you hadn't noticed before, near the wall of shattered pods.
Furthermore, a query pings the hangar status.
Hangar Bay 7: Docking clamps engaged.
 Vessel: Fury-class Sith Imperial Interceptor.
 Status: Fueled. Flight-ready. Life support active.
You have a destination, a potential shortcut, a specific obstacle, and the solution. The path is becoming clearer.
Trusting the data and the new clarity provided by the Force, you turn away from the terminal. Your eyes scan the wall near the row of broken and empty stasis pods, an area you had previously dismissed as uninteresting wreckage. Guided by the memory of the schematic, you spot it: a faint rectangular seam in the wall paneling, almost perfectly flush, with no obvious handle or control. You press a corner of the panel, and it retracts with a soft hiss, revealing a dark doorway.
You step through into a small, functional locker room. The air here is stale, smelling of old sweat and cleaning chemicals. Rows of tall, metallic lockers line the walls, most of them sealed shut with glowing red electronic locks. One locker has been violently pried open, its door hanging from a single hinge, its contents gone.
However, your attention is drawn to a single locker that is slightly ajar. Peering inside, you find what you're looking for: a standard-issue shipboard environmental suit. It's a bulky, gray jumpsuit with a built-in helmet and rebreather system. It looks intact, but as you pull it out for a closer look, a small diagnostic light on the wrist gauntlet blinks a steady, cautionary amber. A nearby readout displays the status of the internal heating unit's power cell: 25% charged.
It will offer protection from the extreme cold of the cargo holds, but perhaps not for long. The fully sealed lockers likely contain pristine suits with fully charged cells.
You opt for the most elegant solution. Bypassing the damaged suit, you approach one of the sealed lockers. You slide the black, high-clearance keycard you took from the Sith officer into the electronic lock's reader.
(Keycard Use: Success)
There's a moment of silence, then a soft, permissive beep. The red light on the lock flicks to green, and the locker door unlatches with a satisfying click.
Inside is a pristine environmental suit, identical to the other one but clearly brand new. The diagnostic light on its wrist gauntlet glows a steady, confident green, and the display confirms its status: Power Cell 100%. This suit is also reinforced with light plating around the chest and limbs, offering a degree of protection the other one lacked.
You have your solution—a fully powered, armored suit that should be more than capable of protecting you from the flash-frozen temperatures of the cargo holds below. The path to the hangar is open, provided you can survive the shortcut.
There's no more time to waste. The clock is ticking, not just on your escape, but on the power cell of your only protection.
You quickly strip off your simple tunic and trousers and climb into the reinforced environmental suit. It's a perfect fit. The moment you pull the helmet over your head, it seals with a soft thump and a hiss of equalizing pressure. The chaotic sounds of the ship are instantly muffled, replaced by the steady, low hum of the suit's life support and the sound of your own breathing. A heads-up display (HUD) flickers to life inside the helmet's visor, showing your suit's power at a healthy 100% and a small, integrated compass.
A quick search of the cryo bay reveals exactly what you're looking for: a heavy-duty floor hatch marked with stenciled lettering: CRYO-CARGO ACCESS: HOLDS 3-7. You turn the large manual release wheel, and the hatch groans open, revealing a ladder descending into a thick, swirling cloud of white mist.
With the blaster secure at your hip, you descend into the freezing fog. The suit's external temperature gauge plummets violently, quickly dropping past -100 degrees. The internal heating unit kicks in with a noticeable vibration, and your HUD flashes a warning: EXTREME COLD DETECTED. HEATER ACTIVE. POWER CONSUMPTION INCREASED.
You reach the bottom and step onto a metal catwalk. You are in a vast, cavernous hold, far larger than the cryo bay. Massive, multi-story cargo containers are stacked in long rows, everything covered in a thick, glittering layer of frost. Visibility is low, the air a shimmering, frozen fog, and the only light comes from your suit's headlamp cutting a sharp beam through the gloom.
Following the direction indicated by the schematic on your memory, you proceed along the catwalk. After a few minutes of cautious progress, you come to an abrupt halt. A section of the walkway ahead has collapsed, leaving a wide, dark chasm between you and the continuing path on the other side. The gap is at least ten meters across—far too wide to jump. Below, the chasm disappears into frozen darkness.
Your HUD's power reading has already ticked down to 96%. You need to cross, and quickly.
You decide against a risky, brute-force solution. The best approach is to find a path that was designed to be there, however hidden.
(Perception Check: 15 - Success)
You pan your suit's powerful headlamp left and right, its beam cutting through the thick, swirling cryo-fog. The catwalk is gone, but the hold's infrastructure remains. Your light sweeps over frozen pipes and massive support struts. Then, you see it. About fifteen meters to your left, your beam catches the glint of metal rungs set into the side of the massive wall. It's a maintenance ladder, descending into the darkness.
You trace its path with your light. The ladder goes down about twenty feet to a wide, sturdy-looking structural support beam that spans the chasm. On the far side, another ladder goes back up to the continuation of the catwalk. It's a viable, if treacherous, path.
Making your way over, you find the ladder's rungs are slick with a thick layer of ice. The climb requires careful, deliberate movements. You descend into the deeper cold of the chasm, cross the wide support beam with sure footing, and begin the arduous climb back up. Each exhale turns to instant frost on the inside of your visor.
By the time you haul yourself back onto the main catwalk, you feel a sense of relief, but a glance at your HUD shows the cost. The power cell is now at 94%.
You get your bearings and are about to proceed when a new sound echoes from deeper within the frozen hold—a sound that is not the groaning of the ship or the hiss of your suit. It's a sharp, scraping noise. The sound of claws on metal, followed by a low, guttural snarl that seems to vibrate through the deck plates. It sounds large, and it's somewhere ahead in the fog.
You choose not to rely on sight alone. In this frozen, misty hell, your eyes can deceive you. You need a deeper perception. You steady your breathing, the sound echoing softly inside your helmet, and reach out with the Force, seeking the source of that predatory snarl.
(Force Sense Roll: 20 - Critical Success)
The sensation is no mere hunch or whisper this time. It's a vivid, intrusive vision that floods your mind with terrifying detail. You see the creature clearly through the Force, as if the fog wasn't there at all.
It's a Tuk'ata, a Sith Hound, but one horribly altered. Larger than any natural specimen, its body is a grotesque fusion of dark hide and gleaming cybernetics. One of its eyes is a glowing red implant, and its claws are reinforced with jagged metal. It stalks the catwalk ahead, sniffing the icy air, its mind a maelstrom of primal hunger, aggression, and the maddening pain of its own enhancements. This is no mere beast; it's a bio-engineered weapon, a living engine of murder let loose from its cage.
The Force, however, shows you more than just the threat. It shows you a vulnerability. Your vision highlights a small, glowing power conduit located on the creature's back, just between its shoulder blades—the central hub for its cybernetic systems. It's a clear weak point.
The vision fades, leaving you with the chilling knowledge of what awaits you in the fog. The scraping sounds of its claws on the metal catwalk are closer now. A glance at your HUD shows your suit's power has ticked down to 93%. You have knowledge and a target, but time is against you.
Your instincts for survival, honed by your burgeoning connection to the Force, take over. A direct confrontation is foolish. An ambush is smart.
You melt back into the thick, frozen fog, your suit's systems muffling any sound you make. Your headlamp sweeps across the area and finds a perfect hiding spot: a recessed maintenance alcove set into the massive wall, partially obscured by a cascade of frozen pipes. It offers cover and a clear line of sight to the catwalk. You press yourself into the nook, raise the blaster pistol with both hands, and steady your aim on the path ahead. The image of the glowing power conduit on the beast's back is burned into your mind.
The scraping grows louder, punctuated by low, angry snarls. A moment later, the cybernetic Tuk'ata stalks into view, a monstrous silhouette in the swirling mist. Its cybernetic eye glows with a malevolent red light, sweeping back and forth, but it fails to notice your concealed position. It passes your alcove, exposing its back completely.
Now.
(Targeted Attack Roll: 20 + 4 Bonus = 24 - Critical Success)
You hold your breath, your focus absolute. The world seems to slow for a fraction of a second as you squeeze the trigger. A single, brilliant red bolt of energy lances through the cryo-fog and strikes the power conduit with pinpoint precision.
The result is instantaneous and catastrophic.
A flash of blinding blue-white energy erupts from the Tuk'ata's back. The creature lets out a shriek that is a horrifying mix of animal pain and electrical discharge. Its cybernetic limbs lock up, and it convulses violently before crashing to the metal catwalk with the force of a falling engine block. Its red eye flickers once, twice, and then goes dark. A plume of acrid smoke rises from the fried conduit, mingling with the frozen mist.
The beast is dead. The path is clear.
You step out from your cover, the blaster still warm in your hand. The silence that follows is a stark reminder of your isolation. A quick glance at your HUD shows the suit's power is now at 91%. You've survived, but the clock is still ticking. The hangar elevators, according to the schematic, should be at the far end of this hold.
You're absolutely right. The blaster shot echoed like a cannon in the frozen silence, and the creature's death shriek could have been heard decks away. You have no doubt that if the non-corporeal entity is drawn to life and conflict, you've just lit a massive beacon.
With a final, wary glance at the smoking corpse of the cybernetic beast, you break into a steady jog, your boots clanging on the icy catwalk. The beam from your headlamp cuts a solitary path through the dense, swirling fog. The path ahead is clear of physical obstacles, but a new and far more terrifying sensation begins to creep into your mind.
It starts as a faint chill that has nothing to do with the -120 degree air outside your suit. It's a coldness that seeps into your very spirit, a profound and unnatural dread that makes the hairs on your arms stand up. The Force isn't whispering a warning anymore; it's screaming one. It knows where you are. It is coming.
Your jog turns into a desperate sprint. Finally, you see it through the mist: a massive, reinforced blast door set into the far wall of the hold. Above it, emergency lights flicker over a stenciled sign: HANGAR ELEVATOR E-03.
You slam to a halt in front of it, your breath ragged inside your helmet. A control panel next to the door is dark, completely lifeless. The elevator is powered down. To the side of the panel is a standard keycard reader and a manual power conduit access panel, currently sealed. Your HUD flashes an update: Suit Power: 89%.
The feeling of dread intensifies. You feel a presence approaching, not through the hold behind you, but through the very walls of the ship. It's close.
You shove the Sith officer's keycard into the reader, praying for another permissive beep. The panel remains dark. You try again, jiggling it, but the reader is completely inert. The elevator is not just locked; it's offline. The keycard is useless here.
(Keycard Use: Failure)
Wasting no more time, you discard the card and grab the heavy conduit pipe from your waistband. The feeling of dread is a physical weight now, a suffocating pressure in the air. You wedge the end of the pipe into the seam of the manual power conduit panel and throw your entire body weight against it.
(Technical/Strength Roll: 5 - Critical Failure)
The pipe, slick with frost, slips from the seam with a screech of metal on metal. The force of your own desperate shove sends you stumbling backward, and you fall hard onto the icy catwalk. The pipe clatters away into the fog. Your suit's HUD flashes a warning: Suit Power: 88%.
A profound, unnatural silence descends. The distant hum of the ship, the hiss of your own life support—it all fades away, consumed by an oppressive void. The cold you feel now is not from the cryo-leak; it's a soul-deep emptiness.
From the swirling fog in the direction you came, a shape begins to resolve. It has no body, no solid form. It's a vortex of shimmering, midnight-purple energy, a tear in the fabric of reality. As it drifts closer, the metal catwalk around it groans and warps, frost instantly forming and then shattering as the very energy is drained from the material. This is the "non-corporeal bioweapon" from the datalogs. The predator of souls.
It stops about twenty meters away, a silent, swirling testament to your imminent doom. The Force is screaming, a raw, undiluted wave of pure terror. Your blaster feels like a child's toy.
You choose the path of empathy—a desperate, perhaps foolish, attempt to connect with the monster in the mist. You steady yourself, pushing past the primal terror gripping your soul, and reach out with your mind. You don't project words, but feelings: confusion, a sense of shared imprisonment, a plea for understanding. I am a victim here, just like you. What are you? Let me help.
(Communication/Force Empathy Roll: 1 - Catastrophic Failure)
The entity does not respond. It reacts.
The instant your consciousness touches the swirling vortex of dark energy, it's like grabbing a live power conduit with your soul. A wave of pure, undiluted malice slams into your mind. You don't hear thoughts; you feel an eternity of rage, agonizing hunger, and the echoes of a thousand screams from the souls it has already consumed. It is not a victim. It is a weapon, and it is ecstatic to have found you.
The psychic backlash throws you back, not physically, but mentally. You cry out inside your helmet, clutching your head as the entity's vile hunger momentarily overwhelms you. Your suit's HUD flickers erratically, and the power reading drops precipitously from 88% to 75% as the creature leeches energy directly from your suit—and from you.
The swirling vortex of purple and black energy intensifies, drifting closer with a terrifying, deliberate speed. Your attempt to communicate has failed utterly; you have only succeeded in ringing the dinner bell.
However, in that brief, agonizing connection, you learned one critical thing: the creature is drawn to active, concentrated energy above all else. Life force is its sustenance, but raw power is an irresistible lure.
Your pipe lies uselessly a few meters away. The elevator panel is dead. The entity is now less than fifteen meters from you and closing. The Force screams a single, frantic imperative: ACT!
A desperate gamble. You choose not to fight the entity, but to bait it. Power is what it wants, and the blaster at your hip is a concentrated vessel of it.
(Improvisation Roll: 18 - Success)
Your mind races, your burgeoning Force sensitivity giving you an intuitive, frantic understanding of the weapon's mechanics. You fumble with the blaster's side panel, overriding the safety protocols and forcing the energy levels on the power pack past every conceivable limit. The weapon begins to glow a dangerous, angry red, emitting a high-pitched whine that vibrates through your glove. It feels like you're holding a miniature sun.
With a desperate cry, you hurl the overloading blaster as far as you can down the catwalk, back into the swirling cryo-fog.
It detonates mid-air in a blinding flash of crimson energy, a miniature supernova that momentarily burns away the mist and illuminates the entire hold. The entity reacts instantly. The formless vortex lets out a silent, psychic shriek of pure, ravenous desire. It abandons its slow, menacing advance on you and surges toward the much more potent, much more appealing lure. It envelops the fading energy flare, its shimmering form pulsating as it feeds.
The distraction has worked. You have bought yourself seconds.
You scramble across the icy floor, snatching up the fallen conduit pipe. You rush back to the inert elevator panel and jam the pipe back into the seam. Fueled by adrenaline and sheer terror, you put every ounce of your strength into it. With a loud CRACK, the panel cover breaks loose and clatters to the floor.
Inside is a tangle of thick, frozen-over cables and conduits. A single, large, red manual override lever is set prominently in the center of the wiring cluster.
You glance over your shoulder. The light from the blaster explosion is gone. The entity has consumed it. You can feel its "gaze" beginning to sweep back towards you, its hunger now whetted. Your HUD flashes another warning: Suit Power: 72%.
There's no time for finesse. With the terrifying psychic presence of the entity beginning to bear down on you once more, you grab the big, red, ice-crusted lever with both hands and pull with every ounce of your adrenaline-fueled strength.
For a heart-stopping moment, nothing happens. Then, with a deafening groan of protesting metal, the lever slides down.
(Gamble: Success!)
A massive surge of energy erupts from the panel, showering you with harmless blue sparks. The dead control panel next to the door flashes to life, its lights blinking green. A klaxon begins to sound, and the colossal blast doors of the elevator shudder and begin to part, revealing a dark, cavernous interior.
But the power surge is a double-edged sword.
The entity, having finished with the blaster's fading energy signature, instantly snaps its full attention to the massive release of power from the elevator. A psychic shriek of pure, ravenous hunger pierces your mind. It's no longer drifting; it's hurtling toward you. The fog boils away in its path, the metal of the catwalk warping and turning black with frost as it drains the energy from the very air.
You have seconds.
You scramble into the elevator car, spinning around to face the opening. The doors are agonizingly slow, grinding shut with ponderous, hydraulic certainty. Through the shrinking gap, you can see the swirling vortex of purple and black energy closing the distance with impossible speed. It's ten meters away... then five. The cold it radiates is so intense that your suit's heater screams in protest, and your HUD flashes a critical warning: Suit Power: 65%.
The gap is now only a meter wide. The entity is right there, a formless face of pure malice pressing against the opening. Tendrils of dark energy begin to lick through the gap.
You brace yourself against the elevator wall. There's no weapon, no trick that will work now. Only this raw, untamed power thrumming within you. You extend your hands towards the shrinking gap, not in surrender, but in defiance. You close your eyes and don't just push—you unleash.
(Desperate Force Push: 17 - Success)
A wave of pure, blue-white kinetic energy erupts from your palms. It's not a controlled push; it's a chaotic, untamed torrent of your will to survive. The raw power slams into the formless entity pressing through the gap.
There is no sound of impact, but you feel it in your mind: a silent, psychic roar of shock and fury. The dark energy vortex is thrown violently backward, away from the door, tumbling end over end through the cryo-fog like a stone skipping across water.
The distraction is all the time the elevator needs.
With a final, deafening CLANG, the heavy blast doors slam shut and lock, sealing you in darkness. A deep, mechanical groan reverberates through the floor as the elevator car lurches into motion, ascending.
You collapse against the wall, gasping for breath. The psychic scream of the entity fades, muffled by the thick durasteel, but its malevolent rage still echoes in your mind, a venomous promise of retribution. Your head throbs, and your body aches from the sheer effort. Your suit's HUD flickers, the power cell having taken a hit from the violent energy release, now reading 60%.
But you are alive. And you are moving.
The elevator continues its steady climb. The only sounds are the hum of the lift mechanism and your own ragged breathing. You are safe, for the moment, in this small metal box, rising towards your only hope of escape: the hangar bay.
You choose to use this precious, fleeting moment of safety to look inward. The elevator continues its slow, rumbling ascent as you lean your head back against the cold metal wall. You close your eyes, shutting out the dim emergency light, and focus on your breathing.
You don't try to push or pull or see. You simply… listen. You reach for the wild, chaotic energy you just unleashed, not to command it, but to understand it.
(Force Control Roll: 14 - Success)
The roaring tempest in your mind begins to subside. The raw terror inflicted by the entity recedes, leaving behind a profound sense of exhaustion, but also a startling clarity. You can feel the Force within you, a deep, powerful reservoir of energy. The outburst that saved you wasn't a fluke; it was a desperate, primal draw from that wellspring. You realize it is a part of you, as much as your own blood and bone, but it is also wild, untamed, and dangerous to wield without focus.
The fear is replaced by a cold, hard resolve. You are not a victim. You are a weapon.
As your mind settles, your sharpened senses extend beyond the elevator car. You get a vague impression of the hangar bay above. It feels… still. Empty. Devoid of the frantic energy of a battle or the hum of a busy crew. It’s a vast, silent space, holding its breath. The silence is more unsettling than a scream.
A heavy thud reverberates through the elevator as it slows and docks. A loud klaxon blares once, and the locks on the door begin to disengage with a series of loud clicks. The doors will open any second.
You embrace the silence, interpreting it not as a threat, but as an opportunity. There's no time for stealth. You plant your feet in the center of the elevator car, your posture straight, your conduit pipe held loosely at your side. You are not a cowering survivor; you are the one who has made it this far. Let whatever is out there see you.
The heavy doors grind open with a final, echoing groan, revealing the cavernous expanse of Hangar Bay 7.
The scene is one of vast, desolate silence. The bay is enormous, large enough to hold a small squadron of fighters, but it is dominated by a single vessel. There, in the center of the hangar, sits your salvation: a sleek, arrowhead-shaped starship. Its black hull and aggressive, wing-like solar arrays are unmistakable. It's a Fury-class Sith Imperial Interceptor—one of the most advanced ships of its era. Its boarding ramp is lowered, casting a pool of soft white light onto the deck, an open and irresistible invitation.
The rest of the bay is a scene of quiet chaos. Discarded cargo containers, overturned equipment, and the scorch marks of blaster fire are scattered across the floor, evidence of a battle fought and lost long before you arrived. The silence is profound, broken only by the low hum of your suit.
You step out of the elevator and onto the hangar deck, your boots echoing in the stillness. You take a determined step toward the Fury.
"That's far enough."
The voice is sharp, clear, and feminine, cutting through the silence from the base of the ship's ramp. A figure steps out from behind one of the landing struts. It's a young human woman, no older than twenty, dressed in the simple, dark robes of a Sith Acolyte. Her face is pale and streaked with grime, her eyes wide with a mixture of fear and fanatical resolve. In her hands, she holds a training lightsaber, its crimson blade ignited and humming with menace, casting a blood-red glow across the deck. She is the final guard, the last living soul on a ship of ghosts.
"This vessel belongs to the Sith Empire," she says, her voice trembling but gaining strength. "It is the property of my master. You are an unauthorized presence. A contaminant. You will not touch it."
She holds her ground between you and the ramp, the only thing standing between you and freedom.
You choose reason over violence. Lowering the conduit pipe to your side in a non-threatening gesture, you let the metallic clang echo in the vast, silent hangar. Your voice, amplified slightly by your helmet's external speaker, is calm and steady, cutting through her fear.
"I respect your power, and your loyalty," you begin, your tone even. "But look around us. The Sith Empire is gone. The ship is dead. Whatever loyalty you had died with it. We are the only two people left alive on this flying tomb. If we don't leave together, right now, no one leaves."
(Charisma/Diplomacy Check: 16 - Success)
Your words strike a chord, bypassing the thin shell of her indoctrination and hitting the core of her terror. The crimson blade of her training saber wavers, the hum dropping in pitch for a moment. Her knuckles are white where she grips the hilt, but the fanatical certainty in her eyes is replaced by a flicker of desperate, horrified understanding. She glances around at the silent, debris-strewn hangar, and the truth of your words sinks in.
"My master... he is one with the Force now," she whispers, her voice cracking. "He and the others... that... that thing took them." She shudders, the memory of it clearly raw.
A low, deep groan reverberates through the entire hangar deck, a structural stress-groan from deep within the ship. You both feel it—a fresh wave of cold dread from the Force. The entity is still hunting.
The Acolyte's resolve breaks. She deactivates her lightsaber with a sharp hiss, the blood-red glow vanishing and plunging the hangar back into its dim, sterile light.
"You're right," she says, her voice gaining a sliver of hard-won authority. "We leave. But this is a Sith Imperial vessel. I am the ranking officer. I fly. You will not interfere. You will do exactly as I say. Touch nothing. Is that clear?"
She is not your ally. She is a commander offering a conditional truce to a potential subordinate. But the ramp to the Fury is now clear.
You nod curtly. Survival is the only currency that matters right now. "Understood," you say, your voice flat and clear. "Let's go."
The Acolyte gives a sharp, affirming nod, her fear momentarily suppressed by a newfound sense of purpose. "This way. And stay close."
She turns and sprints up the boarding ramp with a practiced urgency. You follow right behind her, your heavy boots thudding on the metal. The interior of the Fury is as severe and functional as its exterior—all dark gray alloys, glowing red instrument panels, and the faint, sterile smell of ozone.
You move through a small crew corridor and into the cockpit. It's a compact, two-seat design dominated by a panoramic viewport showing the silent, desolate hangar. The Acolyte slides into the pilot's seat on the right and her hands fly across the controls with an innate familiarity.
"Main reactor online," she mutters, more to herself than to you. "Navicomputer booting... engaging inertial dampeners..."
You take the co-pilot's seat, a silent, tense observer. The ship hums to life around you, its systems waking from their slumber. Freedom is moments away.
Suddenly, a colossal BOOM rocks the entire ship, throwing you hard against your restraints. The main lights in the hangar bay shatter and die, plunging the vast space outside into near-total darkness, illuminated only by the frantic strobing of a single surviving emergency light.
"By the Sith's black heart!" the Acolyte screams. She points a trembling finger at the main viewport. Through the Force, you feel it before you see it—a tidal wave of pure, concentrated malice flooding the hangar. The entity has arrived. It tore straight through the main hangar blast doors.
A loud, insistent alarm blares in the cockpit. A red light flashes on the main console next to a stark message: EXTERNAL DOCKING CLAMPS: ENGAGED. MANUAL OVERRIDE REQUIRED.
"No!" the Acolyte cries, her voice laced with despair. "The power surge from its arrival must have fried the automatic release! The clamps are still locked on! The manual override is on the command gantry, outside!"
She looks at you, her momentary bravado completely gone, replaced by sheer terror. The ship is ready to fly, but it's physically shackled to the dying Vehemence. Outside, the psychic pressure of the soul-eating entity is building to an unbearable intensity. You are trapped. Your suit's HUD shows its power has ticked down to 58%.
You don't hesitate. This is the moment—the pivot point upon which your survival hinges.
"I'll do it," you declare, your voice cutting through the Acolyte's panic. "Keep the engines hot. Be ready to fly the second we're loose. Tell me where the gantry is."
The Acolyte looks at you, her terror momentarily eclipsed by surprise at your resolve. She jabs a finger toward the top of the viewport. "Up there! Port side! There's a maintenance ladder by the forward landing strut. The console controls all three clamps. Go!"
You give her a sharp nod, unbuckle your restraints, and bolt from the cockpit. The ship's ramp is your exit and your point of no return. You sprint down it, back into the maelstrom.
The hangar is a nightmare. The psychic pressure from the entity is a physical force, pressing in on you, stealing the air from your lungs. The single strobing emergency light creates a disorienting, hellish landscape of lurching shadows. The entity itself, a vortex of pure void, is drifting near the center of the hangar, its attention drawn to the thrumming energy of the Fury's engines. You need to get to the ladder without drawing its full, undivided attention.
(Agility Check: 17 - Success)
You run. Fueled by terror and adrenaline, your Force-honed instincts guide your every step. You weave around overturned crates and dodge a piece of ceiling paneling that crashes to the deck. The entity senses your movement, a flicker of its awareness turning toward you. A tendril of its dark, formless energy lashes out like a whip, vaporizing a spot on the floor just behind your heel. You don't look back.
You reach the ladder and haul yourself onto its rungs, climbing with desperate speed. Below you, the entity begins to drift slowly toward the base of the ladder, its psychic hunger a palpable wave washing over you.
You reach the command gantry, a narrow catwalk suspended high above the hangar floor. At the far end is the override console, its screen flickering erratically. Below, you have a terrifying bird's-eye view of the Fury and the swirling vortex of darkness that is now directly beneath you. It seems to be trying to drain the energy from the landing strut itself, causing the metal to groan and buckle. The entire gantry shudders violently.
You stumble to the console. It's damaged but active. Three large, illuminated switches are labeled: CLAMP 1, CLAMP 2, CLAMP 3. The entire gantry shakes again, more violently this time. The entity is attacking your perch. Your HUD flashes: Suit Power: 55%.
You opt for the careful approach. Brute force in a delicate situation is a good way to get killed. You take a steadying breath, the chaos of the strobing lights and the psychic screaming of the entity fading into a single point of focus.
(Logic/Dexterity Check: 18 - Success)
Your hand darts out and flips the first switch, marked CLAMP 1. The connection is clean. A deep, resonant CLANG echoes from the port side of the Fury as the first massive docking clamp retracts.
The entity below lets out a silent, psychic roar of fury. It understands what you're doing. The entire gantry groans and shudders violently as the creature intensifies its assault on the support strut. The console in front of you sparks wildly, and the floor plates beneath your feet begin to buckle. The direct path to the next switch is now a treacherous, tilting wreck.
To answer your question: Yes, you absolutely need your suit's power supply... for now. The hangar's life support is failing; while not the instant-kill flash-freeze of the cargo bay, the air is thin and rapidly chilling. Without the suit's heater, you would have only minutes before hypothermia set in. However, the power cell itself is a potent energy source. Ripping it out to create a distraction is a brilliant, desperate, and incredibly dangerous idea. It would work. But it would be a one-way ticket. You'd be starting a new, much more final countdown timer on your own life.
The gantry lurches again, throwing you against the railing. You have a choice to make, and you have to make it now.
You choose to trust in the Force. Not as a weapon to attack, but as a shield to defend. You ignore the sparking console and the tempting switches, planting your feet on the groaning, buckled catwalk. Closing your eyes, you reach out, not with your hands, but with your will. You pour your focus and energy into the failing structure beneath you, willing it to hold.
(Defensive Force Check: 16 - Success)
An incredible thing happens. The violent shuddering of the gantry lessens. The terrifying groans of stressed metal quiet to a low hum. You feel a connection to the very molecules of the structure, your Force-fueled will becoming a temporary, invisible support beam holding back the tide of the entity's destructive power. It is an immense strain, and you feel the energy draining from you, a deep, cellular exhaustion taking hold. The suit's power display flickers, dropping to 50% from the sheer effort.
But it works. The gantry is stable. For now.
Knowing you only have moments, you open your eyes and lunge for the remaining switches. Your hand slaps down on CLAMP 2. A second thunderous CLANG echoes as the forward clamp releases. You stumble and hit CLAMP 3. With a final, deafening groan, the last shackle holding the Fury hostage retracts.
The ship is free.
"We're loose! Go!" the Acolyte's voice screams through your helmet's comm, tinny and panicked.
The second the clamps are free, the entity lets out a final, mind-shattering psychic roar of absolute fury. The Force shield you had erected shatters like glass, and the gantry gives way completely. The support strut beneath you explodes in a shower of molten metal. The entire catwalk collapses into a waterfall of debris.
You are falling.
For a terrifying second, you are suspended in the air, the hangar floor rushing up to meet you. Below, the Fury's engines roar to life, and the ship begins to hover, its ramp still tantalizingly open. The swirling vortex of the entity is already rising from the floor to intercept you.
You reject the idea of simply falling. With your life hanging by a thread, you channel the adrenaline and the Force into one singular, desperate action. As the gantry disintegrates beneath you, you kick off a falling sheet of metal, using it as a springboard.
(Agility/Force Check: Agility 20, Force 15 - Mixed Success)
Your body responds with astonishing grace. It's a perfect leap, a flawless gymnastic maneuver that sends you soaring through the air. For a glorious second, you are an acrobat, flying through the hellish, strobing darkness of the hangar, your trajectory aimed perfectly for the open ramp of the Fury.
But your raw, untamed connection to the Force isn't quite enough to complete the miracle.
As you fly through the air, the entity lashes out. A tendril of pure dark side energy, impossibly fast, whips out and strikes your leg in mid-air. The impact is not one of physical force, but of soul-deep, agonizing cold. Your muscles lock up, and your perfect arc falters.
You slam onto the very edge of the boarding ramp, not with a clean landing, but with a sickening crunch. Your body slides, and you only manage to stop your fall into the void by digging your fingers into a seam on the metal floor. You are on the ship, but just barely, hanging precariously from the edge of the ramp. A searing pain shoots up your leg, and your HUD flashes a new, ominous warning: BIOMETRIC TRAUMA DETECTED. PHYSICAL INTEGRITY COMPROMISED. Your suit's power plummets to 40% as it tries to counteract the damage.
Below you, the entity coalesces, preparing to rip you from your perch.
"Got you!" the Acolyte's voice screams.
Before the creature can strike, the ship lurches violently. The Acolyte isn't waiting. The ramp begins to retract, scraping against the hangar floor with a shriek of tortured metal. The upward motion helps you, and with a final, agonizing effort, you haul your injured body fully onto the ramp just as it seals shut behind you with a boom of finality.
The ship rockets forward, its engines screaming in protest. It blasts through the damaged hangar doors, scattering debris, and launches into the black, star-strewn void of space.
You have escaped.
You lie on the floor of the crew corridor, gasping for air, the pain in your leg a throbbing, fiery agony. The psychic presence of the entity vanishes, leaving a profound and welcome silence in your mind. The ship's internal gravity plating kicks in, and the sensation of acceleration becomes a steady, stable hum.
Through the viewport in the cockpit door, you can see the starfield streaking past. You are free of the Vehemence, a ghost ship that you now leave tumbling in the void. But you are wounded, your suit is failing, and you are trapped on a stolen Sith Sith ship with a terrified, unstable Sith Acolyte who has just saved your life.


[Suit Power: 38% and falling]
The durasteel deck of the Fury is cold beneath your boots. Each step sends a fresh spike of agony up your leg from the wound the entity inflicted. It’s a deep, gnawing cold that has nothing to do with the ship's temperature and everything to do with the dark side energy that lashed out at you. You limp forward, one hand braced against the corridor wall for support. The rhythmic hum of the interceptor's engines is a reassuring sound after the terrifying silence of the Vehemence, but it’s undermined by the insistent, low-power warning beeping inside your helmet.
Light spills from the open cockpit ahead. As you reach the threshold, the scene unfolds. The young Sith Acolyte is strapped into the pilot's seat, her focus absolute. Her fingers dance across glowing control panels, her brow furrowed in concentration. The vastness of space fills the main viewport, the distant, ghost-white form of the Vehemence shrinking with every passing second. She hasn't noticed you yet.
You take another shuffling step into the cockpit, and the floor plate groans under your weight. Her head snaps around, her eyes—a startling, feverish yellow—fixing on you instantly. Her hand drops from the controls and hovers just above the hilt of a lightsaber clipped to her belt.
"That's far enough," she says, her voice sharp and devoid of warmth. "The ship is away. Our deal is concluded." She looks you up and down, her gaze lingering on your injured leg and the blinking power indicator on your suit's wrist display. A flicker of something—disdain, perhaps—crosses her face. "You're a liability. Wounded. Your life support is failing. Give me one reason why I shouldn't just space you and be done with it."
The cold of the void seems to press in from the viewport. Her threat hangs in the air, as real and dangerous as the lightsaber at her hip. 
You take a slow, deliberate breath, the recycled air hissing in your helmet. The pain in your leg is a sharp, insistent reminder of your vulnerability, but you push it down. You can’t show weakness. Not now.
[Suit Power: 36% and falling]
"You're right, I'm not much use to you like this," you begin, your voice calm and even. "But I have shown I am useful. Think of me as an investment. You need to get this ship somewhere safe, somewhere you won't be shot on sight. I can talk my way through situations you can't blast your way through. Consider the resources to get me functional again as a down payment on a valuable asset."
The Acolyte's yellow eyes narrow, the initial hostility giving way to a cold, calculating curiosity. She studies you, not as a person, but as a piece on a dejarik board. The word "investment" seems to have struck a chord, reframing your plea from one of weakness to one of grim pragmatism—a language she understands.
"An investment," she repeats slowly, tasting the word. Her hand finally moves away from her lightsaber, though she doesn't relax. "A bold claim for someone whose life is literally beeping away." She gestures dismissively towards your suit's blinking display. "You were useful, I'll grant you that. Getting past that... thing... was not a simple task."
She leans back in the pilot's chair, tapping a finger on the armrest. "Very well. Your logic is... acceptable. For now. An investment that fails to provide a return is liquidated. Remember that."
She points a sharp finger down the corridor you came from. "There is a small medical bay aft, port side, past the crew quarters. It should have a basic diagnostic scanner and bacta patches. Deal with your wound. There are also maintenance lockers throughout the ship; you might find a spare power cell for your suit if you're lucky. I want you fully operational."
Her gaze turns sharp as durasteel. "Do not touch anything else. Do not deviate. And stay out of my way. Now go."
She turns back to the controls, her message clear: you are dismissed. The conversation is over. You've bought yourself some time, but the terms of this alliance are perilously clear. You are a tool, and you will be discarded the moment you are no longer useful.
Your leg throbs in agreement. The suit's low-power chime seems to grow louder.
You nod, more to yourself than to the Acolyte, and turn away from the cockpit. The promise of medical attention, however basic, is a powerful motivator. Your body is failing on two fronts, and you need to stabilize at least one of them to survive.
[Suit Power: 34% and falling]
Limping back down the corridor, you retrace your steps. The ship is compact, designed for speed and combat, not comfort. The walls are a dark, polished metal, broken up by sealed hatches and access panels. You pass a door marked CREW BUNKS and another stenciled with MAINTENANCE LOCKER 02. The temptation to peek inside either is strong, but the sharp, pulsing agony in your leg keeps you focused on the Acolyte's directions: aft, port side.
At the end of the short hallway, you find it. A door marked with the universal red symbol for medical services. You slap the activation panel, and it slides open with a quiet hiss.
The medbay is small and starkly lit. A single diagnostic bed dominates the space, its surface sterile and uninviting. Against the far wall is a supply cabinet with a transparent duraplast door, revealing neatly organized medpacs, bacta injectors, and medical scanners. The air smells clean, antiseptic—a stark contrast to the metallic tang of fear and decay that permeated the Vehemence. This is a place of healing, however impersonal.
You shuffle inside, the door sliding shut behind you, finally giving you a moment of privacy. The nagging beep from your suit's wrist display seems amplified in the quiet room. You're safe from the Acolyte's immediate scrutiny, but your time is still draining away.
A logical, two-step approach. You can't treat what you can't see, and the constant beeping from the suit is a distraction you can't afford.
The suit's seals hiss open with a touch of the release clasps on your chest and wrists. The heavy outer plates feel like a lead weight as you shrug them off, letting them clatter to the medbay floor. The helmet comes last, and as you lift it off, the world suddenly becomes quiet. The incessant, low-power warning chime is gone, replaced by the gentle hum of the medbay's systems. You take your first deep breath of the ship's recycled air; it's clean, with a faint, sterile scent.
Now free from the bulky environmental suit, you turn your attention to your leg. The sight is worse than you imagined. The fabric of your under-suit is shredded and stained a dark, angry crimson around a deep gash on your thigh. The skin at the wound's edges is unnaturally pale, almost grey, and a network of thin, black veins spreads out from the injury like a spiderweb. It doesn't just hurt; it feels cold, a profound, unnatural chill that seems to emanate from the very marrow of your bone.
Gritting your teeth against a fresh wave of nausea and pain, you hobble over to the diagnostic bed and haul yourself onto its cold, unyielding surface. A control panel on an articulated arm floats nearby. You tap the "Activate" button.
A soft blue light emanates from an overhead scanner, which glides smoothly over your body. It lingers on your injured leg, its light flickering from blue to a harsh, diagnostic orange. On the panel beside you, medical data and anatomical charts flash into view. After a moment, the scan completes, and the final diagnosis appears on the screen.
MEDICAL DIAGNOSIS:
PHYSICAL TRAUMA: Severe laceration to the upper thigh. Muscle and tissue damage consistent with high-energy impact.


BIOLOGICAL CONTAMINANT: Unknown. Foreign energy signature detected within the wound. The signature is causing rapid, localized cellular necrosis. Standard bacta treatment may slow the spread but is unlikely to eliminate the source.


PROGNOSIS: If left untreated, the necrotic tissue will continue to spread, leading to systemic shock, permanent disability, and eventual death within 48 standard hours.


RECOMMENDATION: Immediate application of broad-spectrum bacta. Seek advanced medical treatment for energy-based wound purification.


The clinical, detached language of the computer does little to soften the horrifying reality. The entity didn't just cut you; it poisoned you with the dark side. The clock is still ticking, just in a different way.
You now know the full, grim truth of your condition. The supply cabinet against the wall is filled with standard-issue Sith medical gear.
You decide on a two-pronged approach: stabilize the injury first, then understand the nature of the threat.
[Suit Power: 33% and falling... then powered off]
First, the bacta. You limp to the supply cabinet, your bare feet cold on the deck plating. The cabinet opens with a touch, revealing rows of standard Sith medpacs, synthskin applicators , and several large, sterile bacta patches. You grab one. It's a thick, flexible bandage saturated with the translucent, gelatinous fluid that smells faintly of ozone and chemicals.starwars.fandom
Returning to the bed, you grit your teeth and peel away the torn, blood-caked fabric of your under-suit from the gash. The coldness emanating from the wound intensifies as it's exposed to the air. Taking a deep breath, you press the bacta patch firmly over the injury.
The pain is immediate and blinding. It’s not the clean fire of an antiseptic, but a violent, warring sensation as the regenerative properties of the bacta clash with the necrotic dark side energy corrupting your cells. Your vision whites out for a second, and you have to stifle a scream. Then, as quickly as it began, the agony subsides into a dull, manageable throb. The intense cold recedes, leaving just the ache of the physical wound. Looking down, you see the black veins under your skin have faded slightly, no longer spreading. The bacta is working, just as the diagnostic scanner predicted—it's a stopgap, not a cure.starwars.fandom+1
With the immediate crisis averted, you turn your attention to the medbay's computer terminal. You need to know what you're up against. You key in a search query: ENERGY-BASED WOUNDS and DARK SIDE CORRUPTION. After a moment of processing, the terminal displays the relevant files from its Sith medical database.
IMPERIAL MEDBAY DATABASE - FILE 77.34.B
SUBJECT: Exotic Trauma & Force-Related Afflictions
Entry 1: Conventional Energy Wounds (Blasters, etc.)
 Standard treatment protocols apply. High-energy plasma causes severe burns and cauterization. Recommended treatment includes debridement, microsuture application for deep tissue repair , and submersion in a bacta tank for rapid tissue regeneration.jodocast+1
Entry 2: Dark Side Energy Corruption
 Certain esoteric Sith abilities (Drain Life, Wound, Force Crush) do not merely inflict physical damage but imbue the target's living tissue with a necrotic dark side energy signature. This affliction actively resists and corrupts the natural healing process. Symptoms include localized cellular decay, spreading necrosis, and a "coldness" that does not respond to thermal regulation.reddit
WARNING: Standard bacta applications and even stimpacks will only slow the necrosis, not eliminate the source energy. The contaminant will eventually overwhelm the palliative treatment. Continued exposure can lead to madness, physical corruption, and death. It can be viewed as a targeted, personal version of a "Wound in the Force," an affliction carried within the victim's own body.reddit+1
Entry 3: Treatment Protocols - [CLASSIFIED - REQUIRES INQUISITORIUS-LEVEL CLEARANCE]
 Access Denied... Bypassing with Sith Officer Keycard... Access Granted.
Protocol 3-A (Conventional): Amputation of the afflicted limb above the point of corruption, followed by cybernetic replacement. Considered the most direct and reliable solution.starwars.fandom
Protocol 3-B (Esoteric): Counter-active energy application. The dark side signature can be neutralized by an opposing application of pure light-side Force energy. This technique, commonly known as Force Healing or Cure, involves a Force-sensitive individual channeling their own life energy to purify the wound, accelerating the natural healing process and expelling the corrupting influence. This is a rare and difficult ability to master. Attempting it without proper training is unpredictable.youtubeswtor
The terminal screen glows in the dim medbay. You have your answer. The bacta patch is a temporary shield. The clock is still ticking. The computer offers two solutions: a knife or the Force. The Acolyte isn't likely to offer help, and you don't know the first thing about controlled Force healing.
You've made your decision. A battlefield amputation on a moving ship isn't a viable option, and trusting the Acolyte feels like a last resort. The Force guided you off the Vehemence; maybe it can guide you through this. You trust your instincts.
You remain on the diagnostic bed, the cool hum of the machinery a stark contrast to the warring sensations in your leg. The bacta patch is a temporary dam holding back a flood of darkness. You know it won't last.
Closing your eyes, you shut out the sterile medbay. You shut out the low thrum of the ship's engines. You even try to shut out the throbbing pain in your thigh. You focus inward, searching for the source of the affliction. It isn't hard to find. Amidst the warmth and vitality of your own body, there is a patch of absolute cold. A void. A splinter of the same malevolent energy that belonged to the entity on the ghost ship.
The database called it a "Wound in the Force," and that's exactly what it feels like. An emptiness that is actively consuming you.
You have no training, no Jedi master to guide you, no Sith holocron to consult. All you have is the raw, desperate instinct that has kept you alive this long. You remember the feeling from the gantry—that surge of power, that intuitive leap that saved you from the void. You reach for that feeling again.
Instead of pushing outward, you pull it inward. You marshall your will, your stubborn refusal to die, and focus it into a single point of light and warmth. You imagine it as a sun inside your own chest, and you push that warmth down, into the cold darkness festering in your leg.
The moment your energy touches the corruption, there is a silent explosion in your mind. The darkness fights back. It shows you flashes of the Vehemence: the dead crew, the silent corridors, the soul-eating horror lunging for you. It whispers promises of power, showing you how you could wield this darkness, how you could make others feel the same fear you felt. It tempts you to embrace the cold, to make it your own.
You grit your teeth, sweat beading on your forehead. "No," you whisper into the quiet of the medbay. You reject the whispers, the fear. You pour more of yourself into the light, not with anger, but with a defiant certainty: This is not me. This does not belong here.
For a terrifying moment, nothing happens. Then, slowly, painstakingly, the cold begins to recede. The knot of darkness loosens its grip. A wave of brilliant, cleansing warmth washes through you, and the splinter of darkness dissolves into nothingness, like a shadow banished by a sudden dawn.
The backlash is instantaneous. You gasp, your eyes flying open. The world swims before you, and you feel utterly, profoundly exhausted, as if you've just run for miles. But the cold... the unnatural, deathly cold in your leg is gone. The throbbing ache of the physical gash remains, but the sinister undertone of corruption has vanished. Looking down, you see that the ugly black veins under your skin have faded completely.
Hsssk...
The sound of the medbay door sliding open makes you jump. Standing in the doorway is the Sith Acolyte. Her hand is on the hilt of her lightsaber, and her feverish yellow eyes are wide with shock and disbelief. She isn't looking at your leg; she's staring at you.
"What was that?" she demands, her voice a low, intense hiss. "I felt it. A flare of... light. It came from you. What are you?"
She thought you were just a lucky survivor. Now she knows you're something else entirely. The fragile truce has just been rewritten.
You push yourself up on your elbows, the effort sending a wave of dizziness through you. The medbay feels strangely quiet now that the internal battle against the corruption is over. You meet her intense, questioning gaze.
"I am no threat to you," you say, your voice rough with exhaustion. You take a breath, letting the words hang in the air to diffuse her hostility.
"The wound... it was wrong," you explain, choosing your words carefully. "It wasn't just a cut. There was something dark in it, something cold that the bacta was only holding back. I focused on it... and pushed the darkness out. It's what I had to do to survive."
The Acolyte takes a half-step into the room, her disbelief warring with the evidence she can feel in the Force. The air, which moments ago flared with a brilliant, unfamiliar light, is now calm, but your presence in it has fundamentally changed.
"You... cleansed it?" she says, the words a mix of derision and awe. "By instinct? Like some untrained whelp stumbling upon a holocron." She deactivates her lightsaber with an audible click, but her posture remains tense, alert. She looks you over again, her cold, analytical gaze reassessing you completely. "My 'investment' has revealed some unexpected features."
A grim smile touches her lips. "You may not think you are a threat," she continues, her voice low and dangerous, "but untamed power is a threat to everyone, especially its wielder. You are a liability until you are controlled."
She gestures to your discarded environmental suit and your tattered under-suit. "Get yourself presentable. There should be a standard ship uniform in the crew quarters. And find a power cell for your suit; its sensors might still be useful. Then meet me back in the cockpit. Our arrangement has... new terms to discuss."
With that, she turns and stalks out of the medbay, the door hissing shut behind her. She leaves you alone with her chilling words and your own profound exhaustion. The wound is cleansed, but you've traded one problem for a potentially much larger one. You are no longer just a survivor; you are an asset to be controlled.
You decide to trust the subtle currents of the Force that have guided you this far. The Acolyte wants you presentable and functional, but you need to be prepared. Survival is more than just a clean uniform; it's about having the right tools when you need them most.
You ignore the maintenance lockers for now and head directly for the door marked CREW BUNKS. The Sith officer's keycard is still in your hand; you press it to the lock panel. A green light flashes, and the door slides open.
The room is dark and cramped, containing four simple bunks built into the walls and a series of footlockers bolted to the floor. The air is stale. It's clear the former crew left in a hurry. You step inside, letting the door slide shut, and take a moment to center yourself.
Closing your eyes, you reach out not with your sight, but with your senses. You let the Force flow through you, not trying to command it, but simply asking a question: What do I need? There's no grand vision, just a series of subtle pulls, a sense of rightness drawing you toward specific spots in the gloomy room.
The Uniform: The first pull is mundane, practical. It leads you to a locker containing a standard black Sith Imperial ship officer's uniform, neatly folded. It's simple, functional, and will replace your tattered, blood-stained under-suit. You quickly change, the crisp fabric feeling alien after the ordeal in the environmental suit.


The Weapon: The next sensation is sharper, colder. It guides you to a bunk where a pillow has been hastily thrown aside. Tucked between the mattress and the wall is a standard-issue blaster pistol, heavy and solid in your hand. Its power pack is fully charged. You tuck it securely into the back of your new belt.


The Tool: Another feeling, one of utility and potential, draws you to the bottom of a footlocker. Beneath a jumble of datapads and personal effects, your fingers close around a compact, high-density power cell. It's the right size for your environmental suit's power system.


The Blade: The final pull is faint but insistent, a whisper of imminent conflict. It leads you to a toolkit left open on a small table. Tucked inside is a vibroblade, its hilt wrapped in worn leather. A quiet, deadly tool for close-quarters work. You clip it to your belt opposite the blaster.


You stand in the middle of the room, newly outfitted. You are no longer the wounded survivor in a failing suit. You are armed, your wound is cleansed, and your equipment is ready. You have everything the Acolyte demanded and more. The balance of power has shifted, however slightly.
Now, you are ready to face her. You head for the cockpit, your steps sure and quiet, the pain in your leg now just a memory.
You choose to project confidence. You are not the same wounded man who limped out of this cockpit an hour ago. You will not be treated as such.
You stride across the threshold, your boots making a solid, deliberate sound on the durasteel deck. The limp is gone, replaced by a steady, balanced gait. The Acolyte is leaning over a holographic star chart projected from the center console, its swirling blue light illuminating her focused expression.
She looks up as you enter, her yellow eyes immediately taking in your transformation. Her gaze sweeps over you once, sharp and appraising. She sees the clean lines of the black Sith Imperial uniform, the blaster pistol tucked into your belt, the vibroblade at your hip, and the quiet, centered confidence in your posture.
A slow, dangerous smile spreads across her face. It is not a friendly expression; it is the look of a predator who has just confirmed its prey is as strong and worthy as it had hoped.
"There. Much better," she says, her voice a low purr that does nothing to hide its sharp edges. She straightens up, deactivating the star chart with a casual wave of her hand, plunging the cockpit back into the dim glow of its control panels. "No longer a wounded stray, but something with... potential."
She gestures to the co-pilot's seat. "Sit. Our old arrangement is void," she continues, her tone shifting to one of command. "You are not my pilot, and I am not your savior. We are two survivors, bound by circumstance. But you are a bomb waiting to go off. That light I felt from you... it was raw, uncontrolled. It's a beacon. Any real Force-user, Jedi or Sith, could feel it from a system away if you let it flare like that again."
She leans forward, her eyes boring into yours. "So here are the new terms. I am traveling to the heart of the reconstituted Sith Empire. I will get you there. In return, you will serve me. You will be my shield, my hidden weapon. And I will teach you. I will teach you control, discipline. I will show you how to hone that raw power into a razor's edge instead of a clumsy club."
The threat is unspoken but crystal clear. Uncontrolled power is a liability she will not tolerate.
"You will learn the ways of the Force as I do," she finishes, the words hanging in the air with the weight of a death sentence and a coronation all at once. "You will be my Acolyte. That is the price of your survival and your power."
A flicker of cold satisfaction crosses her face. It’s not a smile of camaraderie, but one of acquisition. You have accepted the terms. You belong to her now.
"Good," she says, her voice low and even. "Wisdom is choosing the winning side."
She turns back to the cockpit's main console, her fingers gliding over the controls. A holographic star chart springs to life again, but this time it zooms in on a single, obscure sector of the Outer Rim.
"Our next step," she begins, her tone all business, "is to disappear. This Fury-class interceptor is a prize, but it's also a beacon. Its transponder signature is Sith Imperial, and its navicomputer is still logged into the Sith Imperial network. Every second we drift here, we're leaving a trail."
She points a single, sharp finger at a barren-looking moon orbiting a dull red star on the chart. "Nar Vathis. A moon of dust and shadow in the Esstran sector. It's a port of call for the Sith Empire's hidden fleet. It is our destination. But we cannot jump until the navicomputer is purged."
She turns from the console and looks at you, her yellow eyes seeming to glow in the dim light. "This is your first lesson. The navicomputer is protected by a military-grade data-cipher. A Sith Imperial technician would slice it. A Jedi would probably try to gently persuade the machine spirits. We do not."
Her voice drops to a conspiratorial whisper. "The dark side is a tool of power. It does not ask. It takes. It does not unlock. It breaks."
"I want you to sit at that co-pilot's station. Place your hands on the console. Feel the energy flowing through its circuits, the structure of the encryption locking the data away. Now, think back. Remember the Vehemence. The fear. The desperation. The surge of power you used to save yourself on that gantry. Take that raw emotion, focus it into a razor point... and shatter the lock from the inside out. Do it."
You are seated before the console. Its screen glows with a stark red icon: NAV-SYSTEM LOCKED. The Acolyte stands behind you, her presence a heavy weight in the Force, watching, waiting, judging. This is a test.
You choose to obey. This is a test, and you are ready to prove yourself. The lure of understanding this raw power, of seeing if you can wield the darker aspects of the Force, is strong.
You settle into the co-pilot's seat, the smooth, cool console beneath your fingertips. The red NAV-SYSTEM LOCKED icon pulses mockingly on the screen. The Acolyte stands behind you, a silent, imposing presence, her focus entirely on you.
You close your eyes, pushing aside all thoughts of the keycard, of subtle manipulation. She demanded power, aggression, the breaking of a lock. You reach deep within yourself, searching for the wellspring of raw emotion she spoke of.
The memories of the Vehemence surge forward. The terror of the bioweapon, its soul-shattering cold. The desperation of escaping the gantry, that primal fear of falling into the void. The anger at being a pawn, at being wounded, at being forced into this precarious alliance. You don't try to suppress these feelings; you embrace them, let them build into a roaring tempest within you.
You channel it all. You visualize the navicomputer's encryption as a complex, impenetrable wall of energy, a network of interwoven circuits and code. You imagine your will, your concentrated fear and rage, as a pure, focused beam of destructive force.
With a silent, explosive mental command, you unleash it.
A jolt, like a surge of pure electricity, shoots up your arms and into your mind. Your muscles tense, and a guttural groan escapes your lips. The red NAV-SYSTEM LOCKED icon flickers violently, then shatters into a thousand digital fragments.
A system-wide chime echoes through the cockpit, signaling success. The screen changes, displaying the ship's current coordinates, an active sensor sweep, and a clear, unlocked interface.
You open your eyes, panting slightly. Your hands are clenched into fists on the console. A faint, acrid smell of ozone hangs in the air. You feel... drained, but exhilarated. The dark side is not subtle; it is direct, brutal, and effective. And you used it.
The Acolyte lets out a low, satisfied laugh. "Remarkable," she murmurs, stepping forward and placing a hand on your shoulder. Her touch is surprisingly heavy, almost possessive. "Untrained, yet you wield it with such... conviction. The raw power is undeniable."
She moves to the pilot's console, her fingers already dancing across the controls. "We will make good use of this. You show great promise, Acolyte."
She pauses, glancing back at you with a predatory gleam in her eyes. "There is, however, a drawback to such unrefined displays. The Force echoes. An explosion of dark side energy, however localized, is like a ripple in a pond. It can be felt."
She points to a small sensor screen on the dash. A faint, blinking light appears. "And it appears someone felt our little ripple. We have company. An unlisted signature, moving fast. Likely Sith. They've found our 'ghost' ship trail."
She turns to you, a cold, focused intensity in her gaze. "Our first true test, Acolyte. This is not a drill. This is real."
You settle into your new role, letting the fire in your nerves fade but holding onto the clarity that came with it. For the first time, you have power—but you also have leverage. If the Acolyte is truly a Sith, if she wants your loyalty, she will have to earn it. Now is her chance to lead.
You turn from the console, the fading ozone sting in your nostrils, and fix her with a steady, challenging gaze. “You said we aren’t master and servant—we’re bound by survival. So show me. You wanted initiative, power, command. Here’s your test. They’re coming for us. What’s your move, leader?”
The Acolyte’s expression is schooled, but you catch the quick flicker of excitement—she relishes the gauntlet you’ve thrown down. Her yellow eyes glint, shadows dancing across her features in the dim cockpit.
She draws herself up, returning your gaze with cold confidence. “Very well, Acolyte. Let’s see if you can keep up.”
She moves with brisk efficiency, sweeping her hand across the controls. “We’re too close for a clean jump. Our drive needs three more minutes to cycle from your little outburst. That means we hold the line, or we improvise.” She flicks a series of switches, bringing the interceptor’s shields online and arming the ship’s compact but potent weapons.
Her voice is all command now—measured and clear, as if pacing a training yard. “I need eyes on their approach. Are they coming in pairs or a squadron? Scan their signals. Plot their probable attack vector. If you see a weakness—take it.”
She brings up a schematic of the Fury’s systems. “You’re in charge of internal defenses. Reroute what you can to shields or weapons. And if they try to board—stop them. By any means. This is not a negotiation. This is survival.”
She glances at you, the warlord and the apprentice, both revealed by crisis. “This is what it means to be Sith. You don’t wait for permission. You act. Fail, and we both burn.”
In this moment, you are both being tested. Your willingness to challenge her authority and her ability to command in chaos are on display. The cockpit hums with tension and shared purpose.
You swivel in your chair, hands moving over the glowing controls. In this moment, you are the eyes of the ship—her promise of actionable information and your first lesson in wartime partnership.
You begin with the scan:
You rapidly bring up the sensors, pushing power to the array for maximum range. The display blossoms with data—tachyon scatter, power signatures, vector traces—all coming together in a fast, focused sweep.
What you see:
One ship inbound: A smaller silhouette—a heavily modified Sith Phantom, black hull, equipped with a stealth suite, designed for hit-and-fade and boarding. Fast, lightly shielded, but deadly.


Weapons: Dual laser cannons, ion disruptor (likely for disabling, not destruction), and a boarding harpoon system.


Crew: Life signs indicate a single pilot with two additional shadows in the hold—boarding specialists.


Vector: It’s executing a classic lunar intercept with minimum signature—clearly trying to get close, board, and capture rather than outright destroy.


ETA: 90 seconds to close-range engagement.


You relay the vital info to the Acolyte with concise, military precision:
 "Single Sith Phantom inbound. Boarding configuration—two troopers, one pilot, ion weapons primed. Not here to kill. Ninety seconds out."
She nods, golden eyes fierce. "They want the ship intact. That’s leverage for us."
You don’t waste a second. Juggling your console, you access the Fury’s power grid:
Shields: You punch maximum charge forward and ventral—where a harpoon would strike or a hull breach might occur.


Weapons: Secondary power to the ventral turrets and targeting sensors, prepping auto-acquisition in the likely breach arc.


Maglocks: You engage all internal blast doors between cockpit and ramp, locking down the ship against boarders—with the override code ready in case you need to funnel them into a trap.


All these steps are quick, decisive—a testament to your growing intuition, and a sign to the Acolyte that you are more than just raw power. You are a quick, adaptive combat asset.
She glances at the readiness lights flickering green on her display, then looks at you—one warrior recognizing another.
 "Impressive. Guns up. We hold until the window opens—you fire on my mark. If they try to board, make them regret it."
The threat closes. You feel the surge of adrenaline, the cold focus that made you powerful on the Vehemence—but it is steadier now, shaped by choice, not mere desperation.
The enemy locks targeting sensors. Alarms sound—boarding harpoon prep. Thirty seconds until first contact.
You are armed, shielded, and ready.
You grip the edges of your console, jaw set, blaster within arm’s reach. The air in the cramped cockpit seems to hum with tension—yours, the Acolyte’s, and the silent, predatory malice of the ship bearing down on you. The shields shimmer to full, every joule of energy you’ve routed now a barrier between you and the void.
You exchange a single look with the Acolyte: a wordless promise—she will fly and fight; you will hold the line. The red light of the alert strobes across her features as she snaps harness straps across her chest.
“Brace!” she orders, knuckles white on the flight yolk.
You dig your boots against the deck, tension coiled in your muscles. Adrenaline and instinct guide your actions as the readout flickers:
IMPACT IMMINENT…
A thunderous clang reverberates through the ship—the harpoon slams home, biting into the Fury’s ventral hull. The shields buck, but hold. The cockpit rocks, inertia dampers compensating just in time to keep you from being thrown from your seat.
Alarms blare—HULL BREACH IN CARGO PROMENADE—but your rerouted power buys precious seconds. The Fury’s turrets auto-track, stitching red-hot bolts across the enemy’s entry vector. For a heartbeat, you glimpse—through the external cams—a bulky boarding tube, armored troopers in black exosuits scrambling to attach cutting gear to your outer hatch.
The Acolyte yells over the din, “You have the corridor! I’ll keep their ship busy—when that hatch blows, make every shot count. If they breach too far, dump the atmosphere, or use them as a distraction—I don’t care. We hold until hyperdrive spins up or we die.”
You unfasten from your seat, weapon drawn, stride into the compact corridor, every sense alive. The hissing, sparking hatch at the cargo promenade is all that stands between you and the Sith Imperial boarding party.
You plant yourself just behind the bulkhead, blaster in one hand, vibroblade strapped within reach—pulse hammering with anticipation. As the thermal torches hiss and carve smoking lines in the hatch, you close your eyes for half a heartbeat, letting your panic and adrenaline give way to an even deeper sensation: the raw, churning energy beneath everything.
The Force is chaos here—a storm howling at the edge of your perception, fed by your fear, your anger, even your recent victory over the wound that nearly claimed you. You let those feelings surge, not to be swept away, but to ride them—focusing with instinct rather than training.
A vision slams into you:
Time slows… You sense the three shapes clustered just beyond the glowing hatch, weapons braced, comms flickering with terse orders.


You feel their tension, the lead man’s mind a clenched fist of brittle confidence, the second’s jittery with anticipation, the third heavy with professional resignation—the veteran in case the others fall.


You sense the precise instant the lock will breach—the final surge of energy, the exact arc of the door as it’s ripped open.


Your power wells up:
 You let the Force fill you, not with cold logic, but a primal focus on defense and violence. You reach for that raw emotion from before. But this time, it’s not about breaking a lock or cleansing a wound—it’s about lashing out, making your enemy feel that terror and despair.
Just as the hatch explodes inward, pressure roaring, you thrust out a hand, channeling all fear and fury into a single wave.
You let the cold current surge through you, this time making no effort to hold back the primal darkness at your core. Survival, dominance, and the burning need to prove that you are more than just an asset—these become your weapon.
The hatch detonates inward with a shriek of tortured alloy and a belch of fire-retardant steam. In that instant of chaos, your Force intuition is razor-sharp—you feel the shape of the lead trooper before you even see him, the weight of his armor, the confidence in his bearing. You focus your will into a point of malice—a spear of kinetic energy that throbs with pure intent to destroy.
Your outstretched arm becomes a conduit. The power answering your call is brutal, eager; it roars into you and outward in a pulsing lance of invisible energy.
The first trooper steps through in a disciplined crouch, blaster leveled, eyes wide behind his visor. He begins to shout an order—then his body seizes, cut off mid-command. His chest plate crunches inward with sickening force, the synthflesh and bone beneath compacting with a wet, visceral crunch. Air blasts from his lungs with a strangled gurgle as he’s lifted violently off his feet and hurled back into his squad.
For an instant, all you hear is ringing silence—then the sharp thud as his lifeless body slams into the second trooper, bowling them both into the third and moments later, into the corridor wall. The entire formation collapses, panic flaring in their senses. The corridor fills with the metallic stench of ruptured suit seals and the sudden, terrified breaths of the survivors.
The two remaining boarders are stunned and off-balance, their discipline broken. One scrambles for his fallen blaster; the other fumbles at a comm, voice shrill, broadcasting panic to the Phantom’s pilot. Their fear spills into the Force—raw, spiked, and focused entirely on you.
Behind you, the Acolyte’s presence swells with approval—a cold thrill running through the invisible connection between you. You sense no hesitation at the death you’ve wrought—only ambition, and a grim satisfaction.
You’ve crossed a threshold. The lead trooper’s corpse is a warning: here, power is survival, and mercy is a luxury. Every Sith lesson is stained with blood.
The enemy boarders are reeling. The hatch is open. Their morale is broken, but they scramble desperately to regroup.
You now have moments—seconds at best.
You don’t hesitate. The line between thought and action is paper-thin now, power humming in your muscles and mind—a dark current, eager to be wielded.
The surviving boarders are still scrambling: one goes for his blaster, the other, frozen by fear and training, babbles into his comm. In this crucible moment, the lessons of the Sith—power is survival, power is control—are not theory, but lived reality. The blood on the deck isn’t just theirs; it’s yours, too. There is no going back.
You act.
You reach inside, recalling the primal, wild pulse of the Force—this time going deeper. Not just lashing out, but channeling it into your own body: your heartbeat blazes, muscles tense, and in one smooth, almost predatory move, you seem to blur.
The air in the corridor trembles with your passage as you dart forward—faster than any unaugmented human, faster than they can react. Your blaster is a wraith-flash in your fist. The trooper fumbling for his weapon manages to look up, helmeted eyes wide—just as you squeeze off a shot at point-blank range. The bolt shears beneath his chin guard, burning through armor and flesh. He collapses instantly, leaving only the stench of scorched plastoid and meat behind.
Before the comm-trooper can even process it, you pivot—arm snapping forward, fingers crooking in a gesture half-learned, half-instinct. The Force rushes out of you, invisible but irresistible: you seize the remaining trooper’s throat with a phantom grip. He gurgles, blaster forgotten, both hands scrabbling at his collar as he’s dragged, kicking, off the deck.
He hangs suspended, boots thrashing just above the blood-smeared plate. You march up, blaster still ready, vibroblade at your hip, your shadow looming over him. He’s utterly helpless, blaster and comm clattering away.
The Fury’s corridor, just moments ago a killing ground, is now silent but for his strangled gasps. The only sounds are the alarms fading and the Acolyte’s approving presence—a predatory pride in the Force resonating back toward you.
With one last surge of will, you slam the trooper into the bulkhead, hard enough to daze but not kill, then dump him to the deck. He crumples but remains conscious, visor cracked, gasping—alive, terrified, and at your mercy.
You have a prisoner. Your power is undeniable.
Behind you, the hatch to the cockpit slides open; the Acolyte stands watching, sabre at the ready, though her face reveals no concern. Her eyes—satisfied, cold, and hungry—meet yours. She knows what you have done.
The corridor is thick with the tremors of violence and the psychic aftershocks of the dark side. The remaining trooper is a wreck—armor cracked, visor half-fogged from panic and his own frantic breath, body bruised where you slammed him into the wall. The corpses of his squadmates are testament to your ruthlessness and decisiveness. He knows now: mercy is a privilege you grant, not a right.
You loom over him, blaster steady, the bitter taste of power still surging in your veins. His gloved hands scrabble at his ruined comm—then fall limp, as he accepts that you are in complete control.
You drop your voice to that dangerous, cold edge you’ve heard from Sith—tone sharpened by recent carnage:
"Why did you come here?"
The Force twines around your words, amplifying them in the trooper's mind. He struggles to avert his gaze, but you can feel his desperate effort to rally his training and resist your will. You sense the moment it crumbles.
Through ragged breaths, choking on fear, he blurts:
"Priority intercept! Orders from above—trace any ghost ships leaving the Vehemence. All assets… ship or survivors… to be secured intact! Command said… Force anomaly detected aboard—new bioweapon prototype, maybe a rogue Jedi. We’re here to capture. Extract. Bring everything back to the Inquisitors. No lethal force unless unavoidable!"
He shakes, realization dawning of just how far above his paygrade this has gone. There’s another layer in his mind—images flash into your perception, brief and hot:
A briefing room, a black-armored officer with a pale, scarred face. The word: “INTERCEPT AT ANY COST. SURVIVORS ARE ASSETS. REPORT ANY FORCE OCCURRENCE DIRECTLY TO SITH INTELLIGENCE… OR DIE IN PLACE.”


Files marked “Bioweapon Containment,” “Subject: Unregistered Force Signature,” “Potential Jedi or Sith—Immediate Extraction.”


He tries to steel himself, voice breaking:
"They’ll send more. You’re flagged. If you run, the next team won’t talk first..."
Behind you, the Acolyte folds her arms, lips curling in a predator’s approval. “You’re not merely a prize—they think you’re a weapon they lost.” She kneels beside the trooper, letting her lightsaber’s emitter cast a blood-red glow across his visor.
She addresses you, but her words are for him as much as for you:
“This is the difference, Acolyte. They came not to kill, but to control. Fear and pain bend loyalty, but terror and inevitability break it.”
She jabs her sabre hilt against the trooper’s chin.
“Last chance. How many more are coming? And will the Inquisitors themselves leave their thrones for us?”
He’s close to breaking entirely.
You step closer, boots splashing through the blood on the deck. The air crackles with tension and barely leashed power. The prisoner’s eyes, wide and fever-bright behind the cracked visor, flick up to yours—and that’s all you need.
You let the darkness you’ve claimed for yourself radiate from every pore: merciless, inescapable, absolute. Your expression says without words there is no corner of this ship where he can hide—no shield from what you might do next. He nearly flinches, but can’t look away—your gaze is a vice.
You don’t say a word.
Instead, you let the silence constrict, heavier than a vibroblade at his throat. Behind you, the Acolyte is motionless, letting the moment drag, her approval a silent current in the Force.
You watch his resistance crumble. The dam breaks.
He babbles, desperate for a sliver of mercy:
“No… no more! Listen! There’s another interceptor shadowing—standard wedge pattern, call sign Viper Three. Orders are to scan for anomalies, disable, and board—but if anyone reports Force activity, a Black Talon Inquisitor is already en route. I heard… rumors—callsign Vesper, flies the Nightfall. She's taken Jedi before. They want you alive, but they’ll take what’s left if you fight. This is just advance screening!”
He’s sobbing now, armor rattling. “Please, I’ll trigger the ship’s distress recall, you can read it yourself. You kill me, I swear—Central will send everything: droids, more hunters, even destroyers. If you let me live—make it look like an accident—I’ll say nothing. Just… just don’t let me die down here, please—!”
His words spill out unbidden, driven by the unblinking certainty in your eyes: death or anything you command.
The Acolyte steps forward, her saber held like a promise. Her voice is a whisper meant just for you:
“You see? Fear is a finer tool than a blade. Now you know the truth: the Inquisitors are hunting, and this Sith Empire does not fear death—they fear the unknown.”
 She appraises you, hungry and approving. “You inspired more terror in seconds than Sith boot camps do in years. Remember how this feels, Acolyte—this, too, is power.”
You now know:
 - A second interceptor (“Viper Three”) is lurking nearby, possibly preparing to board or engage.
 - Any further display of Force power will draw an Inquisitor—codename Vesper—a truly dangerous adversary.
 - The Sith Empire is determined: more hunters and possibly larger warships could be en route.
 - This trooper is utterly broken and will do anything—say anything—to be spared.
You sense that the moment demands more than raw strength—it calls for strategy. You turn to the Acolyte, fixing her with the same unwavering gaze that just broke an Sith Imperial soldier. In this flash of humility and calculated trust, you show your flexibility: you can be a weapon, a leader, or an ally—the role is chosen by necessity, not ego.
“He’s yours. This is your domain, your war. I broke him, but you know how to play the game beyond this corridor. Call it, and I’ll make it real.”
The Acolyte’s yellow eyes glint, catching not just the blood-spattered light, but the intention behind your words. That you are no mindless beast; you are apprentice and equal, willing to acknowledge hard-won experience and ruthless cunning.
She steps closer—saber still humming low, but only as punctuation, not as threat. She crouches before the terrified trooper, one hand on his shattered pauldron, all the cold authority of the Sith. Her voice is pitched for command, but laced with a warrior’s respect—an unspoken acknowledgment of your shared understanding.
“Listen well, Sith Imperial,” she says, her tone formal and iron-hard. “You triggered a recall protocol, yes? Then you will follow these instructions, or I will let my Acolyte demonstrate what inspiration truly means when tools resist...”
She cuts a sharp glance at you, silently instructing: Get ready—if he twitches, you finish it.
The Acolyte dictates:
The trooper is to trigger a recall signal to Viper Three, reporting catastrophic hull breach, heavy casualties, “Force anomaly uncontrollable,” and requesting immediate withdrawal to rally-point Delta.


His message will emphasize that all evidence aboard the Fury was obliterated—no survivors except a single pod (he will claim he is jettisoning himself in a crippled suit, faking his escape).


If he cooperates, he will be left with a chance—barely. If he fails, death will be swift and exemplary.


You watch as, voice trembling, the trooper follows instructions. The distress recall transmits a convincing tale of disaster and overwhelming Force power, urging his squadron to pull back lest they “suffer the same fate.”
The Acolyte rises, deactivating her saber, satisfaction in her bearing. “There. Now we buy time, and sow fear. The Inquisitor will find nothing but wreckage and whispers.”
She turns to you, her posture just a degree more open, less predatory. “Well played, Acolyte. The right tool, deployed at the right moment, is worth an army. Now—let’s erase all traces, dispose of the evidence, and prepare a new course. The real hunt is only beginning. If you wish to ask about these Inquisitors, do it now. Otherwise, help me clear this corridor.”
“What do you know of Inquisitor Vesper?”
The Acolyte pauses in the ruined corridor, casting a last, lingering look at the broken trooper before turning her attention fully to you. Her expression is laced with a rare seriousness—perhaps even a flicker of unease, quickly masked by calculation.
She leans in, voice lower, the hum of her lightsaber gone but the tension still sizzling in the air.
“Inquisitor Vesper is not a name whispered lightly, even among Sith,” she begins, eyes scanning the shadows as if expecting the very mention to summon attention. “Black Talon Vesper—once a Jedi hunter, now the Inquisitorius’ favored blade when subtlety has failed and terror is the only message left.”
She ticks off the details, each one chilling and precise:
“She’s a Mirialan, pale as a ghost, with ritual scars running down her face—each one, they say, for an enemy slain."


“Her specialty is mental domination—Compulsion, Memory Rending, Mind Shroud. If she wants you to forget, you will. If she wants your secrets, you give them before you even know you’re speaking.”


“Vesper rarely fights fairly. She uses droids, saboteurs, toxins—then steps in only when her prey is exhausted. If Force users are involved, she brings a Null Blade: a cortosis-weave saber that can deaden both electronics and force fields with a touch.”


“No one survives if she takes an interest.”


Her tone sharpens, more lecture than warning. “She may not even bother to board herself. Her envoys test defenses, turn allies against each other. If she comes in person, it means Command sees you as a Jedi-level threat—or a rival they want for the Inquisitorius.”
A moment of vulnerable honesty slips through: “I’ve seen her work. The lucky ones die. The unlucky… become her next mask.”
She fixes you with a steady, searching look. “If Vesper follows our trail, Acolyte, mercy and negotiation are gone. There is only escape, cunning, or open war. If you ever feel a chill—a moment where your thoughts fuzz, or your feelings shift to despair for no reason—warn me instantly. That means she’s near.”
She straightens, mask of confidence slipping back into place. “This is why we must disappear. And why control—over yourself and this power—is your only true shield.”
The implication is clear: if Vesper comes, there will be no quarter. Only the strong, the disciplined, and the ruthless will survive.
You nod, acknowledging the weight of her words—and the gravity of the threat that hunts you now. There is a sharp, mutual understanding in her gaze: you’ve earned a measure of trust, but both of you know that the next hours will determine if this alliance will endure… or break beneath the shadow of the Inquisitor.
You move into action.
The corridor, thick with the violence of moments ago, now becomes a stage for hasty triage and erasure. Together, you and the Acolyte work in practiced silence:
You drag the dead troopers back to the ruined boarding tube, stripping them of anything Sith and gathering their gear—comms, coded ident chips, even a few emergency grenades. They’re useful evidence, but damning if left behind.


The Acolyte helps detach the harpoon clamp, then flushes the tube and the bodies into the void, letting the breach protocol seal behind them with a heavy clang. The sight is both grim and quietly liberating.


She hands you a small canister: thermite gel. "A parting gift. Smear it on the breach, the blood, any sign of battle. Then ignite. The next inspection will show only melted hull and the vacuum's truth."


You move together to the cockpit, every muscle still coiled for violence or flight. The holostar’s navconsole flickers, hungry for new coordinates. The Acolyte watches, letting you see the next step is yours—this is your trial, your story.
“Set course for Nar Vathis,” she commands, her voice steady and clipped. “But mask our signature. Split the power feed through emergency subsystems. Dump any remaining codes or logs that mark us as Vehemence survivors. If you have any trick, any intuition, any whisper from the Force—now is when you use it. We vanish… or we become prey.”
As you work—
You wipe the navicomputer logs a second time, cross-checking every jump signature.


You pulse emergency power through the transponder, flushing it and rerouting it to read as a battered freelance corvette.


You pour a trickle of will into your senses, feeling for the smallest tension in the Force—a warning of pursuit, a shadow of malice across your path.


The controls flicker green. Everything is as secure as can be. The cockpit vibrates as the hyperdrive spools up—nearly ready, just moments remain. Your companion leans in, tension showing at last in the line of her jaw.
“If you have doubts, secrets, regrets—speak them now. Once we jump, we ride the razor’s edge. The next time the Sith find us, it will be with fire and Inquisitors at their back.”
You say nothing more—no last confession, no doubts, no show of insecurity.
 You meet the Acolyte’s gaze with quiet conviction, fingers steady on the controls, every scar and lesson of survival etched into your bearing. Whatever else you once were, you are changed; a weapon forged in darkness, ready to be wielded—by her, by fate, or by yourself.
The Fury’s hyperdrive hums beneath your boots, power building to a seismic pitch. Star-lines glitter beyond the transparisteel, and for a fleeting second, you let yourself feel not fear, but anticipation.
The Acolyte gives a short, sharp nod. “Then hold on, Acolyte. This is where the spiral begins.”
You push the jump lever. The view outside lurches, stars stretching into endless skeins of silver and violet. The battered interceptor shudders as reality bends around you—and then, with a thunderous silence, you are gone, leaving all Sith traces and horrors behind.

Hyperspace starlines collapse into pinpricks as your stolen Fury-class interceptor jolts from hyperspace, Nar Vathis looming ahead—a black-and-vermillion world wreathed in cold fire, its orbit teeming with Sith Imperial and Sith vessels.
The systems hum and flicker. At your side, the Acolyte—now your uneasy master—pulls her dark cloak tighter, eyes scanning the fighter’s readouts.
“Welcome to Nar Vathis,” she murmurs, tension ringing in her voice, “where power is survival, and trust is a weapon.”
Your infiltration will require speed, cunning, and careful use of your new identity. The Fury’s transponder codes are old but registered to a mid-level Sith Imperial officer: your cover. You have only moments before approach protocols are enforced.
A transmission crackles:
"Unidentified Fury-class interceptor—this is Nar Vathis control. Transmit clearance codes and state your business, or prepare to be atomized."
The Acolyte leans toward you. “Your trial begins. Play your part—convince them we belong. I’ll support you in the Force... but don't push too far, too soon.”
You flash the Acolyte a knowing grin, a ripple of confidence passing between you. Her eyes narrow—not in irritation, but with the wary interest of someone seeing a mask slip to reveal another beneath.
With practiced poise, you key the comms:
“Nar Vathis Control, this is Officer Corvin Dray—Fury-class Interceptor 0-9-7, on return from deep recon in Sector R-3. Stand by for clearance codes.”
You transmit the stolen codes, voice relaxed, utterly certain this is routine. The control officer on the other end hesitates—the codes are old, but your easy tone and crisp Sith Imperial accent smooth any suspicion.
“Orders were delayed at sector Six, but these are above my grade,” you add, just enough casual complaint to lend authenticity. “I’ll file incident reports in person; expect an update to my record by day's end. Shall I proceed to approach vector?”
There’s a tense pause. You hear low murmurs—other officers conferring, perhaps double-checking logs. For a breath, the whole galaxy is suspended. The Acolyte leans in, ready to intervene—but then the comm crackles back to life with a clipped, respectful reply:
“Fury 0-9-7—codes received, Officer Dray. Proceed to berth Cresh-Seven. Welcome to Nar Vathis. Submit to standard scan protocols on landing. Nar Vathis Control, out.”
You feel the Acolyte’s approval radiate beside you. “Impressive,” she says quietly. “You make a better Sith Imperial than most real ones.” There’s a glimmer of pride—and warning—in her gaze. “But remember: the true dangers here are behind the masks.”
Your charisma has granted a smooth entry. You are clear to land on Nar Vathis. Sith Imperial scans, suspicious officers, and the politics of a Sith stronghold await, but—for now—you hold the advantage.
The Fury descends, city-lights and obsidian spires looming.
Glancing at the Acolyte, you lower your voice so only she can hear over the hum of descending engines.
“We need to get our story straight,” you say, keeping your eyes on the viewport as the Fury arcs toward the landing bay. “Sector R-3—deep recon, but we’ll need details. Debrief excuse, mission specifics, and why your presence merits no scrutiny.” You let your natural poise take the edge off the tension. “Ready to improvise, but I like having a playbook.”
The Acolyte smirks, her sharp composure settling like a mask. “Official orders: Observe subversive activity near the Mid Rim. Our cover—Sith Imperial Intelligence, chasing suspected Jedi sympathizers.” She leans closer. “You were escort, promoted after… unfortunate losses. I am Acting Commander Vela Sorn—tasked with reporting directly to Lord Drevax’s own intelligence circle.” Her eyes flash a warning: “On Nar Vathis, names open doors… and set traps. Tread carefully.”
She keys a private comm, voice measured: “We return to Nar Vathis with actionable intelligence and must report to Command at once. Deny any nonessential inquiries. If necessary, silence improvised.”
You nod, running through the essentials as the Fury sets down amid the harsh white lights of berth Cresh-Seven. In the moment’s hush before the ramp descends, you turn to her again, voice steady:
“Our next move—the real objective?”
She studies you, then nods with grudging respect. “Our immediate goal: Deliver a false report to sow confusion, shield our trail, and uncover why Inquisitor Vesper is truly after you. If we play this right, we disappear in the chaos. Fail, and the entire garrison becomes our enemy.”
Boots clatter on durasteel outside—the security detail waits.
The Acolyte’s last instruction whispers in your mind. “Let me handle the Sith. Trust your instincts everywhere else. And if you sense Vesper’s shadow… warn me immediately. Now, Sith Imperial—time to sell the lie.”
The ramp hisses open.
You nod to the Acolyte—now Commander Vela Sorn—signaling you’ll follow her lead as you stride down the ramp at her side. Your uniform’s crisp lines draw a calculating glance from the Sith Imperial security squad, but your practiced composure never wavers.
Vela steps forward, all icy authority, producing her clearance with a flick of her wrist. “Commander Sorn, Sith Intelligence. Clearance Alpha-Ninety. This officer is with me. Our mission details are classified—interference will be reported to Lord Drevax himself.” Her voice brooks no challenge.
You scan the detail, alert for hidden danger but projecting the effortless assurance of an underling with important friends. No sign of Vesper… not yet. If the Acolyte needs your intervention, you sense she’ll signal—a whispered word, a sharp gesture, or a brush of the Force.
One sergeant squints, ready to protest, but the combination of your uniforms, Vela’s tone, and the threat of high command cow even his suspicion. He steps aside with a stiff bow. “Understood, Commander. Berth procedures only—standard scan, hands off your gear. May the Emperor’s will guide you.”
The scan passes—your mind sharp, ready to act if the ruse wavers—but no alarms sound. The guards wave you through. Vela barely nods, but you sense her relief and approval.
Inside the hangar’s shadowed halls, she finally lets her mask slip, just for you. “Well done. You watched, listened, spoke only when needed—harder than most think. On Nar Vathis, such restraint saves more lives than bravado.”
“Who’s the Emperor anyway?” you ask.
Vela shrugs and leads on, your roles now clear: She faces the Sith, you guard her flank—and the shared threat of Vesper hangs over every step.
You slip quietly into the cool, obsidian-lit corridors of Nar Vathis beside Commander Vela Sorn, matching her measured stride. Every detail—the angle of your shoulders, the respectful half-step behind the “commander,” the composed readiness in your eyes—broadcasts loyal efficiency and expertise.
Vela takes the lead with practiced ease, addressing checkpoint officers, Sith Imperials, and Sith subordinates with crisp authority. Her reputation—icy, sharp, well-connected—opens doors before she speaks. You remain keenly aware, senses prying at the subtle eddies of the Force for any sign of Vesper, danger, or a sudden shift in mood. As instructed, you say little, relying on perception to alert you to danger: an unusual glance, an officer’s grip tightening, Force energy prickling along your skin.
Above all, you trust her to handle the Sith and politics—as she demanded—intervening only if her voice rises or a subtle signal is given. A shared look, a brief tension in the Force—these would cue you to act, but so far her control is total.
Soon, she directs you down an unmarked corridor, away from the main thoroughfare. The halls grow colder, quieter—a place of secrets. She pauses, glancing back. “We’re being watched, but not by Inquisitors. Yet. I need you alert but silent. If anything feels wrong, trust your instincts—no matter what I command.” In her eyes, you finally see respect and caution, not just command.
You both move forward, toward the first step of your dangerous deception. The city of Sith and spies soon closes around you, every moment charged with the knowledge that one wrong move could bring Vesper—or worse—down upon you.
You slip deeper into the black-glass veins of Nar Vathis, boots crunching on polished durasteel, the cold air humming with hidden threat. Around you, the shadows are thick with ambition and fear—a dozen masked presences slithering just out of sight. Vela leads, swift and precise, her role effortless. But the dark side here is strong, and old terror flickers at the edges of your memory.
You draw a quiet breath, steadying yourself, and—without outward sign—loosen your mind’s defenses. You do not reach or grasp, but simply allow your senses to drift over the world. You flow with the hum of the station: the static of comms traffic, the measured routine of patrols, the wary tension in the officers who cross your path. In the Force, you remain a faint, natural ripple—nothing more than a presence among many.
But you sense…
An oily thread of suspicion, not yet directed at you—Sith, perhaps, sensing Vela’s power but unready to challenge her.


A lingering dread, deep within the city: the cold, deliberate hunger of the Inquisition. Not present, but moving—always searching.


A flicker, sharp as a vibroblade’s whisper: Someone in the next corridor—a shadowed figure watching, not official. Not Vesper, but someone else who should not be there. Their intent is masked, but you feel a prickle of anticipation and calculation.


At your side, Vela tenses, her trust in your instincts implicit. You catch her eye with a subtle nod—enough for her to know that you sense something amiss. She doesn’t break stride, but her path alters, leading you into an alcove near a waiting turbolift.
Under her breath, she asks, “Something ahead? Your call—do we confront, evade, or lay a trap?”
You have seconds before you reach the intersection where the watcher waits.
Vela’s cool gaze meets yours, reading your unspoken resolve. You whisper, “Let’s control the engagement—quick, quiet, no spectacle. Draw them in if you can.” She nods once, the glint in her eye hardening; the bond between apprentice and master tested in this moment of shared danger.
Moving with deliberate, almost casual confidence, Vela shifts your path. With a deft gesture, she palms her keycard and disables a side hatch as you pass, leaving a narrow, shadowed service alcove exposed—just large enough for an ambush, just out of most security cams' direct line of sight. The watcher’s presence draws nearer, the sensation prickling at the edge of your perception: whoever they are, they have skill, but you sense an undercurrent of caution—no overwhelming malice, only the calculation of a predator testing prey.
You slip into the alcove, Vela behind you, her posture telling the story of two officers huddled in hurried, private discussion. Footsteps approach—the watcher is nearly upon you. At the last moment, Vela’s posture shifts imperiously; she signals for silence, as if reprimanding you. The ruse is perfect.
The watcher’s silhouette flickers along the corridor edge—a lean, nondescript man in the muted uniform of station maintenance, but his walk is too precise. Data module clutched under one arm, the other close to his belt.
He glances in, just as Vela turns with a sharp, dismissive glare. “What are you doing skulking here, technician?” she demands in that cold Sith officer tone, every syllable a trap. You watch the man’s reaction—tiny hesitations, a flicker of recognition, uncertainty.
You tilt your head ever so slightly, adopting the deferential stance of an officer caught in reprimand—more shadow than threat, yet fully alert. The corridor hums with quiet intensity as you let the moment hang, refusing to fill the silence with bluster or accusation.
The watcher shifts his weight, eyeing Vela’s uniform and then yours. His pulse thrums in the Force—not hot with violence, but tight with tightly-reined anxiety. You sense, in that razor-edged space between breaths, that he too is not in his own territory. He’s weighing risk, waiting to see how far he can push before the situation tips.
You focus: every tic and flicker, the way his grip on the data module relaxes ever so slightly when Vela doesn’t immediately escalate. He’s not here to assassinate. He doesn’t radiate the coiled hunger of Vesper’s kind. No, this is someone on the hunt for truths that could damn or redeem—dangerous, but not cruel.
He finally speaks, voice carefully modulated, pitched just high enough for you both to hear:
 “Maintenance crew is scheduled to sweep this sector. My authority comes directly from Command.”
 Yet there’s a flash—barely more than a flicker—in his gaze as he glances at you. Testing. Hoping for recognition, or an ally, or just a shared secret.
Vela keeps up the cold facade, but in the Force she’s silent, letting you guide the next moment.
You are certain: this man is searching for information—on you, Vela, or something connected. But not with lethal intent. Here, truth is a weapon, and he is balancing how much to risk.
You have an opening.
You meet the man's cautious gaze, a silent understanding flickering between you: this is not a Sith hound, but a player—possibly even a desperate one—in search of leverage or alliance. You subtly relax your stance, relying on Vela's icy authority to shield you both. Her presence is a wall—a warning to any true Sith Imperial, but also a beacon to those seeking shelter beside power.
You offer a subtle nod, a fraction of a gesture: not overtly inviting, but signaling openness—a willingness to play the game on whispered terms.
Vela picks up instantly, her expression never softening but her words weighted with double meaning. “If you’re from Command, then you know how sensitive our assignment is. Walk away if you want deniability. But if there’s something urgent, say it now—quietly. In these halls, the walls have ears.”
The man hesitates, measuring not just your uniforms but your posture and your unspoken invitation. He steps just inside the alcove, lowering his voice so only you and Vela hear:
“I’m… not authorized for this sector. I came because the logs showed your ship arriving under unusual protocols. Someone—high-level—wants eyes on you.” He risks a glance at you. “But not everyone here agrees with the Inquisition’s methods. If you’re here for truth, not conquest… I might be convinced to trade information. Quietly. For mutual protection.”
He waits, tense, ready to bolt if you threaten—but clearly hoping for a life raft in the storm of Sith politics.
Vela’s presence is unyielding behind you—her strength anchoring you both. You sense her approval in the Force, a faint nod to your reading of the moment.
The first spark of conspiracy ignites. If handled well, this “technician” could become a crucial informant or escape route.
You narrow your eyes in calculated caution—just enough for the “technician” to register the risk in this exchange. In a low, discreet voice, you reply:
“We know who sent you. The ship’s arrival wasn’t a mistake—neither was the code we seeded in the docking manifest. If you’re as smart as I think, you’ll know whose interests they threaten. If you want to play, prove you can keep your mouth shut… and your data flow under control.”
The man’s mask flickers; you see surprise, then guarded relief. Your bluff has landed. He weighs you again, more seriously, before slowly producing his data module:
“I heard rumors among Operations—brief, encrypted mentions of ‘Vesper Protocol’ initiated after your ship cleared orbit. Some upper-tier Sith are nervous—saying the Inquisition is pushing boundaries, asking for things nobody questions… not even the automated droids allowed outside Command’s vault.”
Careful not to overplay your hand, you follow with a minor, plausible “secret,” offering a taste of authenticity:
“Good,” you say quietly, casting a wary glance down the corridor for effect. “They don’t know we already swapped most of our logs on approach—with K-division. That’s why we weren’t flagged. If you don’t want to get burned when the Inquisitors come, you’ll keep your own name off any records tied to this corridor… and give us five minutes’ warning next time you hear their codes call out.”
He nods, the tension in his shoulders easing. “Understood. If I survive the night, you’ll have your warning—and I’ll expect the same respect.”
You’ve forged a fragile but genuine connection—his loyalty earned by cunning, his cooperation through the subtle currency of trust and fear. Vela’s approving glance is nearly imperceptible, but you sense her satisfaction in the Force.
With this new informant, your ability to navigate Nar Vathis’s lethal politics strengthens, and the shadows part slightly in your favor—though always at a price.
Vela murmurs, “Time to move. Our window’s narrow, and the city is watching.”
You nod to the informant, letting him see the urgency in your eyes. “We don’t need heroics—just clear passage. If you want to keep this trade going, get us safe through to the upper administration sector—no alarms, no tails, and no records. Five minutes of your help, and you stay in play. Deal?”
He weighs your offer—then, sensing the real stakes, nods once. “I can create a maintenance override for the next turbolift junction and reroute patrols in this sector for a few minutes. But if someone’s actively watching you, I can’t guarantee blind eyes everywhere—not with Inquisitor sweeps. After that, you’re on your own.”
Vela steps in, voice low and commanding. “No damage, no blood—just a window. If you warn us of a sweep early, we’ll ensure your name never comes up in the aftermath. That’s our bond.”
He deftly slides his data module across a discreet scanner inside the wall panel, then murmurs, “Take the next corridor, left at the junction, then through Service D-17—it’ll look locked, but you’re clear for three minutes after the green light. Don’t linger. If you see any crew, ignore them and keep moving.”
The green indicator blinks just as promised. You sense no deception—only nervous hope and the careful calculation of survival. You and Vela slip away into the gap he’s created, every step bringing you closer to your true objective while the labyrinth of Nar Vathis churns behind you.
For now, you have safe passage—won through risk, cunning, and a new ally’s fragile trust. Ahead: the inner sanctums of Sith power, your next deception, and the shadow of the Inquisition looming ever closer.
You and Vela move in silent accord, trusting to your new alliance and the precious window offered by the Technician’s override. The corridor ahead pulses with eerie red and white light, its emptiness both promise and threat. You keep close, every sense attuned for any sign of trouble, but Vela radiates cool focus—her hand hovering near her hidden weapon, eyes watchful for anyone who might challenge your legitimacy.
Vela leads you confidently along the route—left at the junction, deeper into the labyrinth, her stride never faltering. At Service D-17, the door holds for a heartbeat, then glows green. You slip through without hesitation, entering a narrow maintenance shaft lined with echoing conduits. The technician’s signature lingers—a faint ping on your comms: two minutes clear, no alarms.
As you pass, Vela glances to ensure your mask is still firmly in place. “We go straight to Administration. Minimal contact, no detours. I’ll speak. If they press, let me handle it. But if you sense danger, act first—we can’t afford caution now.”
You nod, falling in behind her as the service corridor opens onto the stark, pristine halls of the upper sector. The hum of the city recedes—a hush falls, broken only by distant footsteps and the thrum of distant machinery. Ahead, security checkpoints and ornate doors mark the heart of Sith power. Your access depends on the keycard, your composure, and the fragile web you’ve woven.
Vela moves forward, officer’s credentials in hand, her aura sharp as a vibroblade. You stand ready, role perfected, eyes scanning for any sign of an unexpected observer or lurking adversary.
For now, you move unseen and unchallenged—thanks to your cunning, Vela’s authority, and the Technician’s risk. But the heart of Nar Vathis is near.
You match Vela’s brisk pace, weaving through Nar Vathis’s obsidian halls with every detail of your bearing—confidence, focus, obedient silence—projecting the ironclad composure of a seasoned Sith Imperial officer. You remain just close enough to her side to signal competence, but never so forward as to draw attention or temptation for idle conversation.
As you approach the checkpoint outside Administration, Vela’s credentials and frosted glare do most of the work. The guards size you both up—a flicker of uncertainty as they note your uniform’s rarity, the trace of red trim, and your unblinking focus. No one volunteers a challenge, unwilling to provoke the “Commander” or the officer at her side.
You pass through corridors reminiscent of a museum and a fortress—walls adorned with banners, Sith propaganda, and security holocams that seem to follow every movement. You don’t flinch, giving no hint of nerves or deception; your role is airtight, your presence a whisper in the Force, never drawing notice.
Inside Administration’s threshold, a junior adjutant glances up. Vela meets his gaze with a stare that freezes the words in his throat. “We are here on Lord Drevax’s assignment. We will brief the Director personally. Leave us uninterrupted—Sith Intelligence protocol Omega.” The adjutant nods, hastily logging your arrival but too cowed to probe beneath the surface.
You stand guardful but restrained as Vela signals for you to enter the private conference suite. For now, no doors close on you, no inquisitive stare lingers, and your fiction remains intact—held firm by crisp professionalism and the authority Vela radiates.
In this moment of relative calm, you scan your surroundings, finding no immediate threat or ambush; your party’s sense of control—however fragile—endures.
Vela gives you the briefest look of approval, as if to say: Well done. This is the art of covert infiltration—confidence, silence, and truth masked in flawless performance.
You hold your silence, posture flawless, letting Vela’s authority and presence fill the chamber as she takes the lead. The spacious conference suite reeks of war and politics—high ceilings, ancient holoprojectors, and heavy blast doors that promise both secrecy and danger. Sith banners drape the gloomy walls, while outside, the city churns with paranoia and hungry ambition.
Vela sweeps to the central console, her voice cool and commanding as she triggers the private comm link to the Director’s office. “Commander Sorn,” she announces, her cadence sharp, “of Lord Drevax’s special detachment. Intelligence report: classified, eyes only.”
There’s a pause—then static crackles as the Director’s masked image flickers to life above the table, Sith sigils swirling in the air. He studies you both—a long, appraising silence. You stand behind and just to the side of Vela, every line of your stance hinting at loyal discretion and the kind of alertness that marks true Sith Imperial professionals.
The Director’s voice is a soft, dangerous purr. “Special dispatches are rare. What does Drevax expect me to believe—and how does it concern Nar Vathis operations?”
Vela launches into the carefully-crafted narrative you’d prepared together: subversive Jedi-sympathizer activity in the Mid Rim, intercepted communications, and urgent recommendations for reallocating security—lies woven with just enough truth to be plausible. Her tone never waivers; her composure is absolute.
Your job is to maintain the visual story: a loyal officer, sharp, silent, and fully committed to his commander’s mission. You scan the shadows, noting glimmers of curiosity and suspicion from staff outside the glass—none daring to interrupt, all wary of Vela’s rank and the aura of authority you both project.
As the briefing unfolds, you catch the faintest prickling sense in the Force—something watching, just beyond physical sight. Is it routine Sith surveillance, or has news of your arrival already reached more dangerous ears?
Vela closes, cold and precise: “Sith Intelligence will monitor all reactions to this report. The Inquisition is not to be notified unless confirmed leads arise. Any deviation will be reported to Drevax immediately.”
The Director’s eyes, visible only as slitted lights behind his mask, linger on you. It’s a test—a challenge to your story, your nerve, your ability to remain undisturbed. You meet that look with unreadable confidence, every instinct ready for what comes next.
For now, the fiction holds. Vela’s lead is flawless, your support seamless, and the doors to deeper Sith secrets may soon open—or slam shut.
The Director nods. “Very well. You will be contacted for further clarification. Leave your presence unannounced and await further instruction. You are both dismissed—for now.”
You and Vela exit the suite, tension slow to fade. Only when you’re deep in the next corridor does she allow herself a thin smile—relief and battle-readiness mingling in her eyes.
“We did it,” she whispers. “For now, we slip away—blend in, watch for any sign of pursuit, and above all: stay alive.”
As you and Vela slip into the quieter corridors away from the Director’s chamber, you keep your bearing professional, eyes scanning for any hint of eavesdroppers or surveillance. In the muted shadows of an empty stretch, you lean in just enough for only her to hear—a discreet, almost imperceptible whisper:
“There was a disturbance in the Force during the briefing. Not just routine Sith scrutiny—something else watched us. Subtle, distant… but intent. I felt it sharpen as the Director’s eyes landed on us. We may already be under closer watch.”
Vela’s posture barely shifts, but her eyes narrow with focused intensity. For a heartbeat, you sense her presence spiral deep, probing inward for any lingering ripple you describe.
Her reply is so quiet it’s barely a breath: “Good catch. I didn’t feel it as strongly—meaning someone was masking or observing… or they know how to hide from Sith senses. Trust your instincts. From now, assume we’re not alone. We keep the masks on—always.”
She subtly alters her route, guiding you into side passages that offer natural choke points, quick escapes, and fewer glaring holocams. You sense a tightening of your partnership—Vela trusts your perception as much as her own cunning now. Any shadow could hold a spy, or worse. But in sharing this warning, the two of you move as one: vigilant, wary, and prepared for whatever game is afoot in the darkness of Nar Vathis.
You move in seamless step beside Vela, the two of you melting into the fractured currents of Nar Vathis—with every stride, the masks tighten, the fiction grows more intricate…and the peril more real.
Vela adopts the pace of a purposeful officer leaving a classified briefing, her posture unyielding and her eyes ever searching the shadows ahead. You sense the rift in the Force is fresh in her mind, the edge of her awareness sharpened and ready. She quietly threads you through crowded halls, then into maintenance corridors and servants’ walkways—routes only a true insider would know. Your trust in her knowledge and instincts now feels like the most valuable weapon you possess.
You pass officers, administrative staff, and nervous workers—each notes your presence, but none dare challenge it. Holocams linger on Vela’s rank insignia and your Sith Imperial bearing, then flick away, files tagged but unreviewed. As you move, Vela softly murmurs over her shoulder, “We’re heading for a secure overlook. There, we watch for pursuit, listen for rumors, and see how quickly our false lead travels. Any deviation—any command override or detour by patrols—will show us exactly who’s interested in us, and how soon.”
She pauses near a panoramic viewport shielded by ornate pillars, the city sprawling endlessly beyond. The air here is thin and cold—a place of intrigue and observation for those who prefer to see danger coming.
Vela’s voice drops lower, all pretense gone for this private moment:
 “Here, we let the enemy move first. You sense another ripple—tell me immediately. If we get even a whisper of Vesper’s presence or a move against us, we bolt for the Technician’s safe exit route. If not, we use this calm to gather any rumor or report about the Inquisition’s next move. The moment we’re not the hunters, we become the hunted.”
You feel the shift in tension; for now, you are the spider, not the fly. Nar Vathis is all teeth and secrets—a fortress of masks—and you trust Vela to navigate it with the ruthlessness only a Sith can wield.
She glances at you, a rare glint of honest respect in her eyes.
 “Ready?” she asks, voice like steel wrapped in shadow. “If you sense anything—no matter how small—you have command. Our fates are bound together.”
Bathed in the chill glow of the panoramic viewport, you let your senses roam—not just in the Force, but with the sharp-eyed caution of a survivor. Standing beside Vela, subtle yet ever-vigilant, you survey the overlook and its surroundings with calculated thoroughness, determined to exploit every resource and contingency the environment might offer.
Physical Resources and Opportunities
Furnishings & Features:
 The overlook is designed for high-ranking officers and Sith—thick pillars and decorative alcoves provide ample cover in case of blaster fire or the need for concealment. A heavy ornamental table near the viewport could be upended as makeshift cover if things turn hostile.
 Subtly bolted maintenance panels line the walls, one marked by the faint fingerprints of recent handling—perhaps an indication of your Technician ally’s influence or a concealed maintenance crawlspace.


Security Details:
 A discreet security node with a holonet terminal sits recessed into a side wall—potential for hacking, message interception, or feigned emergency broadcasts, provided you act quickly and discreetly.
 Emergency alarms and hidden comms panels (typical in Sith administration hubs) are camouflaged behind standard wall plating and insignias. If needed, a false fire or security panic could be triggered here to mask your exit or redirect attention.


Layout Advantages:
 Beyond the overlook’s pillars, you spot two service exits:


Maintenance lift access: Half-shrouded in shadow, signage coded for support staff. This likely connects to low-traffic corridors and emergency escape shafts.


Service stairs: Narrow, but marked for “Authorized Personnel Only”—good for disappearing in a hurry, less likely to have priority lockdown compared to the main lift.


Escape Routes (Assessed)
Primary:
 The path you used to enter—still within your Technician ally’s window of cleared patrols. Swiftest, but may close if alarms are raised.


Secondary:
 Maintenance tunnel via the disguised panel—requires some force, skill, or keycard access, but could bypass main corridors altogether.


Tertiary:
 Service stairs for rapid descent—likely feeds into kitchens, supply halls, or staff rest zones with many nooks and exits.


Scanning for Hidden Threats
You stretch your senses beyond sight:
The Force hums with a brittle tension, but you sense no immediate surveillance or ambush nearby.


A subtle undercurrent of unease from a pair of distant guards, but their focus is on routine, not your presence.


Vela, reading your examination, quietly murmurs,
 "See anything useful—or suspicious?"
You nod toward the maintenance panel and side exits, quietly sharing your findings. Vela’s gaze is approving, and she’s already factoring these details into her plans.
“If things turn, we slip through maintenance or service stairs—keep to back routes. If anyone follows, don’t hesitate. Here, hesitance is death.”
Your vigilance transforms even this lull into a tactical advantage. You are ready, not just to survive, but to bend Nar Vathis’s unforgiving labyrinth to your will—should chaos erupt.
The calm before the storm is yours to exploit. The escape, should it be needed, is mapped in your mind.
You take advantage of the rare moment of quiet, letting your eyes linger on Vela Sorn—your new master and uneasy ally. Standing with her back half to the city, she appears carved from the same obsidian as Nar Vathis’s towers: all sharp lines, dark poise, and concealed strength.
Appearance:
 Vela’s figure is striking even in the officer’s uniform—a tall, lithe silhouette draped in a deep, charcoal-black cloak with discreet crimson lining. Her features are refined: high cheekbones, midnight hair pulled into a severe knot, piercing gray eyes that seem to miss nothing. The faintest scar crosses her brow—a reminder that beauty and danger are inseparable in a Sith’s world. Even at rest, her posture radiates suspicion and command; every motion is controlled, every gesture weighed for advantage.
Power—Your Sizing Up:
 In the Force, she is a controlled tempest. Her aura is taut—restrained, yet buzzing with calculated menace. She keeps her power tightly bound (hiding it from lessers and rivals alike), but the subtle chill that clings to her presence tells you she is far from ordinary.
You sense she is very skilled with mental influence, intimidation, and social manipulation.


There’s a cold precision to her power: no wild flares, but focused strikes and iron will. You suspect her knowledge of Sith arts runs deeper than she reveals—every word, every command, carrying just enough threat to make others question their standing.


Beneath her discipline, you sense a restless ambition—Vela is not content to remain an acolyte; she wants more, and she expects you to help her achieve it.


Summary of Your Impression:
 Vela Sorn projects a blend of danger and allure: alluring but never soft, coolly analytical, her strength always on a hair trigger. You see now why she survived, and why she chose you—she recognizes a similar hunger and adaptability in your eyes. Trust is still a brittle currency between you, but in this moment of stillness, you glimpse the person beneath the command: someone who balances fear, ambition, and the predatory calm of a true Sith.
Just as you finish your assessment, she glances your way, one brow raised in quiet amusement. “Sizing me up, apprentice?” she says, voice almost teasing but layered with warning. “Remember—on Nar Vathis, power is best measured when unseen.”
Still, in this uneasy alliance, you are both more dangerous than ever together.
You settle into the rare peace of the overlook, turning inward while remaining outwardly alert. With the city’s turmoil muffled by thick transparisteel and the measured presence of Vela at your side, you find a fragile sanctuary—a chance to gather your wits and strength before the next storm.
You focus on your breathing, slowing your pulse and letting tension roll away. Carefully, you draw the Force around you—not grasping at power, but wrapping yourself in its current like a shadowy cloak. Your presence becomes diffuse, indistinct—just another ripple among the station’s thrum of minds, neither inviting notice nor suspicion.
As you meditate, you balance vigilance and concealment in equal measure:
Your mind sifts through echoes of the day’s dangers and deals, sorting instinct from fear, watching for visions or warnings buried beneath the surface.


The chill and turbulence in the Force ebb slightly; you feel your senses sharpen, anchored by fresh discipline. The tension in your muscles relaxes, yet you remain poised for instant action—should danger erupt, you would feel it a second before most mortals even see the threat.


Your surface thoughts remain dull, unmemorable to any casual Force scan—neither shining as a beacon nor setting off alarms among the dozens of lesser Sith and spies who prowl these corridors.


Vela casts you a sidelong glance, a subtle nod of approval crossing her features. She recognizes what you’re doing and offers a silent assurance that she will guard your perimeter while you recharge.
Time passes—a brief, precious interval where you rebuild your energy and prepare yourself for the uncertainties ahead. Your connection to the Force remains low, steady, shielded. Your senses—keen and ready—wait for the moment the stillness breaks.
You remain in your quiet vigil, anchored by fresh clarity from your meditation. The city’s heartbeat is a distant thrum, and you sense Vela subtly scanning both the overlook and the streams of data trickling through her encrypted comm. The moment stretches… then a change—a flicker in the routine patrol logs and a muted ripple in the Force.
Vela’s shoulder tenses a fraction. She holds up her comm just enough for you to glimpse a scrolling alert: an unscheduled patrol is being rerouted two levels below—officer authorization: “Vesper Protocol.” Simultaneously, you feel a faint tremor—cold focus, a hunger echoing through the corridors, a presence seeking something specific. It is distant, restrained…but unmistakable. The Inquisition is moving.
Vela doesn’t speak aloud, but her eyes lock with yours—sharp with meaning. The city’s calm is shattered; your window of safety is narrowing. Whatever you’ve put in motion has stirred attention, and the hunt has already begun.
She whispers, low and urgent:
 “That’s our sign. The Inquisition is searching near the service decks. If we move now, we can slip away—use the Technician’s escape path before they lock it down, or risk putting eyes on the Inquisition for answers we might need. Decide fast—run or play dangerous bait?”
Vela reads your decision in the steely certainty of your eyes before you even speak. With a terse nod—no hesitation, no regret—she slips into motion beside you. Together, you become shadows among shadows, moving with calculated urgency toward the maintenance lift.
You feel the Force ripple in approval: survival, for now, demands cunning, not confrontation. Vesper’s net tightens elsewhere, distant footsteps of the Inquisition echoing down, not up. The two of you disappear through the half-hidden panel your Technician ally indicated, slipping into a glow-lit tunnel behind walls carved with centuries of secrets.
As you descend into the heart of the city’s infrastructure, the alarms and ruthless certainty of the upper halls fade. The thrum of machinery and the hush of forgotten passageways cocoon you in silence. Vela moves ahead, slicing locks with sharp gestures and a glint of Force power, her breathing controlled, every sense stretched for danger.
Your preparations pay off. Each intersection, each emergency hatch, opens with only a whisper and a faint green glow—the Technician’s passage holds tight, though you know it may be minutes before security closes the net entirely.
Finally, down three levels in a dim corridor that smells of ozone and old oil, you emerge into a cramped, darkened maintenance bay. Here, loaders and droids doze in charging racks, blissfully unaware of the storm above. You catch your breath. Vela keys her personal comm in a coded pulse—a silent signal for the Technician, requesting final cover for your exit.
A pause. A whisper crackles over the comm: “Service vent G-12—fifteen meters east. You’ve got ninety seconds—after that, the sweep hits Cameras 6 and 8. Move, now.”
Vela glances at you, pride and relief veiled by the edge of shared adrenaline. “This way.” You skulk down the passage, squeeze through the narrow hatch, and with a grunt, drop into cool, stale air: another level down, amid stacks of cargo and idle haulers—a perfect maze of cover and confusion.
You and Vela steal down twisting shadows, your hearts pounding as you exploit the narrow margin your risky escape bought you. The two of you navigate the mazelike lower decks by memory and whispered comm signals—never lingering, never retracing your steps, always alert for the hint of a patrol or a misplaced camera gaze. Here, away from the power plays and obsidian grandeur above, Nar Vathis feels colder, almost alive, wrapped in the sigh of ancient machinery and the distant hum of droid labor.
Vela gestures to a cluster of unmarked storage containers and decommissioned shell droids. She slips behind these into a tight, mostly forgotten maintenance alcove—on her signal, you join her. There’s enough cover to watch the access hatch, enough space to whisper quietly.
You both crouch, breaths mingling in the silence. You scent oil and cold metal, feel tension ebb as no alarms sound and the echoes above remain distant. Vela’s eyes are bright and unyielding.
“We’re clear… for a moment. This is an old smuggler’s hold—a rare find. Even the Inquisition sweeps rarely search here, not without cause.” She draws her cloak tighter, pulling a battered field datapad from her belt. “Here's what we need to do:”
Debrief and recover—take the measure of your mental and physical state. Hydrate, check blaster and blade, tap into the faint pulse of the Force to sense if you’re being watched.


Confirm your alliance with the Technician by checking for any new comm signals—a coded ping would mean he’s still helping, while silence means you’re on your own.


Quietly compare notes on everything gleaned since arrival: who seemed suspicious, what doors closed, what was unsaid in the Director’s questions—a chance to untangle truth from deception now that adrenaline is fading.


Vela meets your gaze, voice softer but still edged:
 “We can fade here for a few hours—long enough to watch the Inquisition’s reaction to our report, maybe learn if they’ll chase ghosts instead of us. Perhaps even reach out for new allies or disguises before venturing out again.” She manages a wry, tired smile. “But we struck a blow. We are still free, still alive… and our enemies are probably even more confused than before.”
For now, in this dark little haven, you have time to regroup—bandage wounds, solidify your alliance, prepare for the next gambit. Your Force sense quiets: danger is present, but not immediate. You have earned this moment’s peace.
You settle into the quiet shadows of the old smuggler’s alcove with Vela, the adrenaline ebbing but both your minds sharp as vibroblades. Vela leans back against cold durasteel, her cloak falling open just enough to signal a truce—if not quite relaxation. You seize the moment for a deep debrief, voice low and sure:
“Vela, we keep running, but we’re also running on rumors. I want the truth—about you, what happened on Vehemence, and what you think about why I was there. If we’re in this together, I need more than orders.”
She regards you for a heavy pause, weighing how much to reveal. The edge in her eyes dims just for you—an apprentice, perhaps, but also a partner proven by fire.
She begins quietly, “I boarded the Vehemence under Drevax’s orders—to recover a research cache before the Inquisition did. The ship’s legends… most are true. Sith alchemy, Sith Imperial bioweapons, and dark side experiments twisted beyond reason. I was sent not because I was trusted, but because I was expendable if things went wrong—they needed someone ambitious and deniable.”
Her fingers drum on her datapad. “I didn’t expect survivors—much less you. When we met in the chaos, I saw in you the same look the truly dangerous have. Not madness—adaptability. You weren’t just fighting to live, you were making choices, cutting through horror when others would freeze.”
She glances at you, intensity flickering in her stormgray gaze. “Why were you there? I’m not sure. The Inquisition wanted something only a force-sensitive could find or unlock. You fit what they’d hunt for: raw power, no allegiances, a blank slate with secrets in his blood. But… you weren’t on any manifest. I think you’re an error in their system. A wild card they couldn’t control, and that terrifies them—Vesper most of all.”
Her voice softens, grip loosening just a hair. “As for my plan: survive, first. Learn what makes you dangerous, and why Vesper risks so much to hunt you. And—and this is truth—if you prove more than a tool, make you partner, not prey. Sith don’t trust, but we do choose our rivals and allies. You were both for me, before you even spoke.”
She allows herself a shadow of a smile. “And now? You see threats I miss. You question. I’m… glad you survived.”
You both agree: time to divide your strengths.
Vela sits back, eyes fluttering closed as she begins her own meditation, drawing on the dark side to center herself, replenish spent energy, and—if possible—peer ahead for coming threats.


You slip from the alcove just enough to connect to local comms, switching to a secure channel the Technician established for covert signals. You keep your thoughts focused, balancing caution with curiosity.


You send a brief, coded ping, careful to avoid flagged phrases: “Status? Update on sweeps and Inquisition priority. Clear window?” Moments pass—a faint, static-laced reply slips through:
“Sweep cleared for now, but rumors say Inquisitor herself is agitated. Looking for a ‘contaminant’—not a person. Admin and security on edge; databases glitched, holonet access tight. I can intercept one message if you need. Advise quick move—disguises won’t hold long in upper city. Will monitor. Willing to risk a face-to-face if utterly necessary—one access shaft south of where you entered.”
You interpret his urgency: you’re still off the main radar, but the net is closing… and chaos in the data systems might be chance or trap.
Minutes later, Vela emerges from meditation looking even more focused—her aura bristling with barely-leashed possibility. “You spoke to him,” she says quietly. “What did he say?”
You quickly share the Technician’s update: Inquisitor tense, systems glitching (by design or accident), and one chance for a direct meeting if you dare risk it.
She nods. “We may only get one more hour of confusion before the full city tightens up. I’ll follow your call, but if we’re going to press for answers or plan an exfil, it’s now or never. And we need new faces before daylight.”
You and Vela lock eyes, a wordless agreement sparking between you—maximum effect, minimum exposure, all in one bold move. The Technician’s value is clear: not just a source of disguises and safe routes, but a potential saboteur and distraction. If you are to vanish truly off the grid, it must be with a misdirection worthy of an Inquisitor’s paranoia…and perhaps using their own shadow as your escape.
Vela’s voice is razor-sharp and low. “Inquisitor vessels—especially those assigned to Vesper—are custom. That means secure logs, classified directives, surveillance on Sith Imperial and Sith operations…and stealth tech that would make even a Moff jealous. They’re designed to disappear and to erase those who chase them. If we could steal one, erase its tracker, and vanish, the whole net would snap shut on shadows instead of us.”
You both consider the real obstacles:
Access: Inquisitor ships dock in their own armored hangars, guarded by elite security, biometric security, and sometimes even droid sentinels with anti-Force protocols.


Data Storage: Such ships likely hold mission logs, Inquisitor orders, and possibly some of the “Vesper Protocol” answers you seek—usually on encrypted holodisks or hardwired to their private comm network.


Tracking and Security: Every such vessel is beacon-tagged and monitored. You’d need the Technician to slice local records and security feeds, and Vela’s codes (or her talent for intimidation or subtle mental tricks) to get past physical obstacles.


But it’s not impossible—merely dangerous, and the kind of move that only a masterful infiltration team would attempt. The chaos you’ve already sown above (thanks to your false report and the data glitches) may be your best chance: patrols are distracted, the Inquisition is stretched, and for a short time, many systems are running on emergency fallback.
A Plan Assembles
Meet with the Technician at the agreed rendezvous—access shaft south of your hideout—to acquire new disguises, forged credentials, and his access codes for security disruptions.


Extract Information on the Move: As you relocate, question the Technician about Inquisitor ship schedules, current dock assignments, and any intel on stealth vessel security systems. Vela can pressure or charm for answers while you cover their work.


Approach the Inquisitor Hangar: Use the chaos and new disguises to reach the sector, and have the Technician trigger a “maintenance alarm” or feigned lockdown elsewhere to draw off guards.


Steal a Stealth Ship: Once inside, Vela can either slice the log or, if needed, use a Force trick to help you locate mission data and erase or physically remove the tracking beacon. You’ll need haste: these ships may transmit an alert the moment unauthorized protocols are triggered.


Escape: Disappear into hyperspace while chaos erupts in your wake—leaving Nar Vathis, the Inquisition, and even Vesper chasing phantoms. With the ship’s logs and perhaps direct access to Vesper’s secrets, you’ll have a massive advantage for your next move.


Vela nods at your outline. “We play it perfect, we become ghosts—and when we resurface, it’s on our terms, not theirs.” Her eyes glint with ambition and newfound trust. “Let’s move. I’ll get the Technician ready. You lead the way—if danger appears, I’ll draw it while you get us what we came for.”
You signal Vela and transmit a single, coded burst to the Technician—no flourish, no delay. Every instinct tells you: act now, or the net closes. She flashes you a look of approval, her nerves taut, her focus absolute.
Moments later, footsteps echo softly through the maintenance corridor. The Technician slides from the shadows, face pale, hands clutching a satchel and a bundle of datachips, disposable uniforms, and forged tags. He wastes no words: “Security cycles are glitched—fifteen minutes, maybe less, before backups sync. Inquisitor’s shuttle just docked at Hangar Theta. Most of her team’s on the Net-Sweep, east sector. Now or never.”
Vela, her Sith mask flawless, takes one disguise and clips on a new rank insignia. You do the same, slipping into the identity of a fuel technician, your features even less memorable behind streaks of oil and a low-billed cap. The Technician slaps a coded access wafertab into your palm. “This opens outer maintenance, gets you past bay sensor gates. Once inside, you’re on your own.”
Together, you move, every step fueled by adrenaline and purpose. The route winds through cramped ducts, the hum of Nar Vathis’s power grid cloaking your movement. You sense hot sparks of anxiety from the Technician—real, but focused. Vela radiates cold, predatory calm—the storm that will break only if forced.
As you near the secure access hatch above Hangar Theta, the Technician whispers, “Alarm in Section 88—now.” A faint klaxon starts two corridors distant, echoed by the rush of boots and shouts. Security feeds scramble, the digital haze giving you a perfect window.
You drop silently to the catwalk above the main bay. Below: the Inquisitor’s obsidian, needle-nosed stealth shuttle—engines cycling warm, data beacons winking, a single droid crew prepping for departure. The Inquisitor is nowhere in sight; their fury is echoing elsewhere.
Vela nods—this is the moment. She flows down the access ladder, beckoning you after her. At the base, you both slide into cover behind fuel tanks. You work the wafertab against the outer panel, disabling the ship’s passive alert in a burst of static. Inside, the cockpit illuminates with pale red glyphs—logs, directives, encrypted files lining the hardwired terminal. Vela moves to the beacon relay, her presence a controlled wound in the Force as she begins work on slicing the tracker and gathering data.
Alarms spike in the distance—your Technician’s distraction is working, but only just. You grab the encrypted drive, your eyes flicking across the main data cache:
Recent orders: “Locate, detain, and scan all Force-sensitives from Vehemence. Prime target: anomaly listed as ‘Cipher Null.’ Authorization—Vesper herself.”


Visual logs: fleet movements, Inquisitor’s secure comms, maps detailing secret jump points out of the system.


Emergency protocols transmitter—an option to erase or spoof ship ID with a single command.


With Vela’s tense nod, you make your choice: wipe the tracker, copy the logs, and trigger a false departure order to sow chaos. The shuttle hums, prepping for flight. You brace yourselves—outside, footsteps and angry shouts are closing in, but the hatch seals tight as the stealth field rises.
You surge skyward, Nar Vathis’s city-lights tumbling below as your escape route flickers and vanishes behind a veil of distortion. Vela breathes deeply, eyes bright. “You did it, Cipher Null,” she whispers. “We did it.”
As hyperspace starlines stretch before you, the galaxy itself opens—answers in hand, enemies chasing ghosts, and the freedom to plan your next move.

As the stolen Inquisitor stealth ship, Nightfall, sails undetectable through the hyperspace lanes, a rare and fragile quiet settles over the cockpit. Nar Vathis and its labyrinth of danger fades behind you, leaving only the dark between stars—and a precious window before decrypted answers reignite the chase.
The ship’s interior is sparse but well-equipped, designed for both isolation and swift efficiency. Its holotables and narrow bunks offer a chance for honest rest, or for something far rarer: connection. While the terminal runs its deep decryption of the Inquisitor’s logs (an hours-long endeavor, by your Technician’s estimate), you at last have space to breathe and look at your new allies—not just as survivors, but as people entwined by shared fate.
The Technician
He is the first to truly relax, slumping into a corner module and pressing a steaming cup into your hand—a cautiously warm gesture. He’s young, haunted-eyed, fingers stained by years of slicework and subterfuge.
“So. We did the impossible.” He looks between you and Vela, half-smiling. “I’ve worked for Sith, for smugglers, even for a Jedi agent once. Never thought I’d bet it all on a pair like you. When this decrypt runs, I want the truth—but I also want out. Clean ship. New name. You two… you’re something else.” There’s no accusation in his tone, just a complicated hope that he might finally choose his own side.
History: Grew up in Sith Imperial service “below decks.” Ran with slicer gangs for years before Vathis. Knows the very real cost of picking the wrong side in an era of Sith rule.


Relationship: Grateful, but wary—sees you as both salvation and risk. Secretly looking for someone to trust fully, but not yet there.


Vela Sorn
Vela stands, arms folded, looking out the viewport—a silhouette sharp yet weary in the blue hyperspace glare. She’s still in the officer’s uniform, its lines now softened with exhaustion.
“I used to think ambition was all there was,” she murmurs, voice softer here than it ever was in the shadows of Vathis. “Survive, outmaneuver, rise. But even the Sith teach the value of allies—of choosing who stands at your back, who keeps your secrets. I… don’t know if I believe in trust yet, not like you do. But I believe in you. And I want to learn what that means.”
Her attention turns fully to you—a challenge and an invitation.
History: Born to a minor Sith lineage, never quite trusted by her peers. Sent on expendable missions, she survived by outsmarting those who wished her dead. The nightmare on Vehemence changed her, showing the limits of Jedi and Sith dogmas alike.


Relationship: From rival to uneasy ally, now a partner. Your resilience, insight, and refusal to be molded have profoundly challenged her worldview; she tests you still, but with growing respect and a hunger to see what you both can become together.


You: Cipher Null
Between them, you find yourself—no longer just the survivor or the “anomaly.” As you check the drives, your awareness sharpens. Who do you want to be, now that you’re more than a ghost in the Sith machine?
Training: There is time now, if you wish, to hone your burgeoning Force instincts. Vela offers to guide you—her approach unorthodox but effective, blending Sith focus with practical survival. She encourages you to trust your perception, to feel pressure without falling to it, to balance instinct and power.


Interpersonal Growth: The Technician’s dry wit gives you insight into what ordinary people fear—and why your fate might matter beyond your own survival. Vela’s guarded honesty helps you trust her, not because you must, but because you choose to.


Moments That Shape the Party
Shared Meals: There are stilted jokes and honest stories over rationed food. The Technician teaches you the trick to hotwiring a galley coffee unit—a low-stakes lesson in trust.


Quiet Training: Vela and you spar, minds and reflexes sharp, learning each other’s strengths. She corrects your posture gently and, uncharacteristically, praises your cleverness in adapting where brute strength might fail.


Confessions: One night, as the ship hums quietly, all three of you share stories of loss, fear, and the reasons you wish for something different. There’s no need to fill every silence—understanding grows by what is said and what is only allowed to hang in the air.


Skill & Relationship Growth
By the time the terminal announces, “Decryption Completed,” you have:
Learned new tricks in subtle Force sensing and limited mental defense, guided by Vela’s practical methods.


Gained more trust with both allies—enough that the Technician offers to stay on, not as a servant, but as a partner (and finally shares his true name: Lin).


Earned from Vela not just respect, but a nascent loyalty grounded in real experience, not Sith doctrine—a rare gift.


The True Bond
On the eve of your next move, the ship feels changed: no longer just a stolen vessel but a home forged in adversity. The three of you have not erased your differences, but you have begun to turn them into strengths.
You look to Vela and Lin. They look back, awaiting your next move—not out of obligation, but out of choice, and the quiet hope that, together, you might change more than just your fates.
The decrypted logs pulse with fresh secrets. Before you open them, your party is more than the sum of its parts: a force the galaxy does not expect. And that, in Star Wars, is how legends begin.
A slow, deliberate nod. Your voice cuts through the low hum of the ship, calm but carrying the weight of the moment. "Vela. Lin. Over here. The decryption's about to finish."
Lin looks up from her datapad, pushing a stray strand of hair from her face. She gives a weary but resolute smile, wiping her greasy hands on a rag before rising. "On my way. Wouldn't miss the grand reveal."
Vela, ever poised, simply rises from her meditative posture. Her gaze is sharp, analytical. She doesn't question the command; she recognizes the sound of a leader making a call. She crosses the small space to join you at the console, her presence a familiar mix of danger and dependability. The three of you stand shoulder-to-shoulder, a tight knot of survivors braced against the unknown.
As if on cue, the console emits a soft chime. The progress bar vanishes, replaced by stark, blocky text against a black background:
DECRYPTION COMPLETE. ACCESSING INQUISITORIUS SECURE SERVER CACHE...
 WARNING: DATA IS FRAGMENTED. SOME FILES CORRUPTED OR PARTIALLY ERASED.
A directory tree blossoms onto the screen. It's a glimpse into the cold, methodical mind of Inquisitor Vesper. The folders are organized with chilling precision.
FOLDER: ASSET DEPLOYMENT [OUTER RIM]


Sub-files detail Purge Trooper movements, informant networks, and suspected Jedi/Force-sensitive hideouts from Tatooine to the Corporate Sector. A strategic map of your enemies' current operations.


FOLDER: SURVEILLANCE - ACTIVE TARGETS


Contains hundreds of individual case files. You see familiar names of senators, crime lords, and Rebel sympathizers. A quick scan reveals a file labeled SORN, VELA - ACOLYTE DEFECTOR, and another, more recent one: UNKNOWN MALE & TECHNICIAN - NAR VATHIS CELL.


FOLDER: PERSONAL LOGS - INQUISITOR VESPER


Audio and text files. The file names are dates, spanning the last several years. A private window into her thoughts, her plans, her obsessions.


FOLDER: PROJECT VEHEMENCE - ARCHIVE


A heavily corrupted folder. Most files are unreadable data-screams, but one fragment is ominously titled: SUBJECT PROFILE: CIPHER NULL.


Lin draws a sharp breath. "She has files on us. On all of us."
Vela's eyes are fixed on the last folder. "The Vehemence," she murmurs, a flicker of something—fear, curiosity, anger—crossing her face. "The ship where you... began. And this 'Cipher Null'..." She looks at you, her expression unreadable. 
“I do not have the benefit of knowing my past. I will not take the knowledge of yours by force and I share what I uncover of mine freely. If you would like your file to remain closed, speak now and I will honor your request. If not, we will proceed and open everything in order together.”
Your words hang in the sterile air of the cockpit, cutting through the anxiety. It’s not a command, but an offer—a pact. For a moment, the only sound is the thrum of the hyperspace drive.
Lin is the first to react. She lets out a short, breathy laugh, a sound of relief more than humor. "My file?" she says, gesturing to the screen. "It probably just says 'Annoying. Good with wires.' My whole life's in some Sith Imperial database somewhere. If they know it, you should too. We’re past keeping secrets like that." Her gaze is steady, her trust earned and now freely given.
Vela remains silent for a long moment, her sharp eyes boring into you. You can almost feel the grinding of ideologies in her mind—the Sith doctrine of secrets and power clashing with the pragmatic reality of your alliance. She takes a slow breath, her expression unreadable.
"An odd proposal," she finally says, her voice low and measured. "The Sith hoard secrets. They are currency. They are power." She pauses, her gaze flickering from you to Lin, then back to the screen. "But a secret that fractures a foundation is a liability. A blade with three edges is stronger than three separate daggers."
A flicker of something new crosses her face—not quite a smile, but a sharp glint of understanding. Of respect.
"Very well," she concludes, giving a single, decisive nod. "We see it all. Together."
The tension in the room doesn't vanish, but it transforms. It's no longer the jagged edge of uncertainty between you, but a shared, focused pressure pointing outward, toward your enemies. You have forged your group not just on survival, but on consent.
With their agreement secured, you turn back to the console. Your words promised to open everything, together. The most logical place to start is with the immediate threat to the three of you. Your finger hovers over the options, then taps.
ACCESSING FOLDER: SURVEILLANCE - ACTIVE TARGETS
The directory expands, revealing a list of case files. Your eyes immediately find the two most relevant entries:
FILE: SORN, VELA - ACOLYTE DEFECTOR. Priority: HIGH.


FILE: NAR VATHIS CELL (UNKNOWN MALE / TECHNICIAN LIN). Priority: MODERATE.


Lin leans in closer, her brow furrowed. "Moderate priority? Guess we didn't piss Vesper off as much as you did, Vela."
Vela scoffs, though there's no real heat in it. "Give her time. She's a thorough woman."
A decisive choice. You tap the console, your intention clear. "This one first," you state, your voice steady. "Our most recent history. Then we see what she has on you, Vela."
Vela gives a sharp nod of assent, her eyes fixed on the screen. Lin leans forward, her expression a mixture of apprehension and grim curiosity.
With a soft whir, the system retrieves the file.
ACCESSING FILE: NAR VATHIS CELL. PRIORITY: MODERATE.
The text that appears is cold, clinical, and devoid of emotion. It's an intelligence report.

FILE SUMMARY: NAR VATHIS CELL
SUBJECT ALPHA: Unidentified Human Male. Approx. 30 standard years. Charismatic, displays high-level tactical cunning and improvisational ability. Source of the "Cipher Null" anomaly. Force-sensitive, but of an unknown paradigm. Abilities are raw, chaotic, untraceable to Jedi or Sith teachings. Instinctive, not trained. Appears to be the cell leader and primary person of interest. Designation: CIPHER NULL.
SUBJECT BETA: Lin, [Family Name Redacted], former Sith Imperial asset. Known slicer and technician with a history of insubordination. Assessed as competent but opportunistic support personnel. Likely coerced or manipulated by Subject Alpha. Not a primary threat on her own. Designation: THE TECHNICIAN.
INCIDENT REPORT - NAR VATHIS:
Cell successfully evaded local Sith Imperial security and Inquisitorius informants for three standard rotations.


Employed sophisticated misinformation tactics, including falsified slicer identities and decoy data trails.


Infiltrated a secure Sith spire, bypassing high-level security.


Successfully commandeered Inquisitor Vesper's personal stealth vessel, the Nightfall. Tracking systems were expertly disabled prior to departure.


INQUISITOR VESPER'S ANALYSIS:
 The cell's escape was audacious but desperate. Subject Alpha (Cipher Null) is the true anomaly. His influence over others is potent, and his connection to the Force is a dangerous wild card. He thinks like a survivor, not a warrior. The Technician is a tool. The Acolyte (see file SORN, VELA) is his muscle.
Their current priority is likely survival. They will remain off-grid, seeking refuge in the Outer Rim or Unaffiliated systems. Their escape vehicle, the Nightfall, is their greatest asset and greatest liability. While its stealth capabilities are formidable, any confirmed sighting will trigger an overwhelming response. Priority is upgraded to HIGH if whereabouts are confirmed.
Lin scoffs, crossing her arms. "The Technician? That's all I am? A 'tool'?" She sounds more annoyed than hurt. "And 'coerced'? She really has no idea, does she?"
"She sees what she expects to see," Vela says, her voice a low murmur. "A powerful Force-user, a disposable technician, and..." She trails off, her gaze turning to you. "She's right about one thing. You are an anomaly."
Before the weight of that can fully settle, you move on, opening the next file as promised.
ACCESSING FILE: SORN, VELA. PRIORITY: HIGH.
This file is older, more detailed, compiled from Sith archives and Inquisitorius intelligence.

FILE SUMMARY: SORN, VELA
STATUS: Acolyte Defector. Dangerous.
 AFFILIATION: Formerly apprenticed to Lord Malakor (deceased). Broke ties with the Sith hierarchy following failed operation on Kalist VI.
 PROFILE: Highly skilled in mental suggestion, intimidation, and close-quarters combat. Pragmatic and ruthlessly efficient. Favors manipulation over direct confrontation but is a capable duelist. Her ambition is her primary motivator and key vulnerability. Believed to be seeking a new source of power or a personal power base outside the Sith command structure.
 PSYCHOLOGICAL ASSESSMENT (INQUISITOR VESPER):
 Sorn is a predictable archetype: the failed apprentice who blames her master for her own shortcomings. She is driven by fear of weakness and a hunger for power she feels she was denied. She sees the anomaly, Cipher Null, not as an ally, but as a raw weapon to be tamed and wielded for her own advancement. This bond is tactical, not loyal. It can be broken by applying the right pressure—offer her power, or threaten her with utter annihilation.
ADDENDUM: Association with Nar Vathis Cell confirms her opportunism. She is using the fugitives for her own escape. She will discard them when they are no longer useful.
Silence. The ship's hum seems louder now. Vela stares at the screen, her face an unreadable mask of stone. Her knuckles are white where she grips the edge of the console. The assessment is a cold, calculated dissection of her deepest fears and ambitions, laid bare for all of you to see.
"She is thorough," Vela says finally, her voice tight, controlled. "And wrong." She doesn't look at you or Lin, but her words are for you. The trust you offered earlier is being tested now, against the cold poison of Vesper's analysis.
You have seen how your enemy perceives you. She sees a user, a tool, and a weapon. A fractured group of convenience. She doesn't see an alliance. She doesn't see loyalty. This is her blind spot.
You turn from the cold glow of the console to face Vela directly. The silence is thick with the poison of Vesper's words. Lin is tense, watching you both.
"Vela," you say, your voice calm but firm, cutting through the tension. "That isn't you. That's a ghost Vesper wants you to be. A story she tells herself so the galaxy makes sense to her." You gesture back at the screen, dismissing it with a wave of your hand. "She's trying to get in our heads, find the cracks to wedge a blade into. But she's wrong about you. We know it."
Vela's gaze, which had been fixed on the damning text, lifts to meet yours. For a moment, her carefully constructed mask of hardened indifference cracks. The rigid set of her shoulders eases, just a fraction. It's not gratitude, not exactly. It's the quiet acknowledgment of an anchor in a storm. She gives a single, sharp nod. The message is received.
"And her mistake," you continue, your tone shifting from personal to tactical, "is going to be her undoing." You sweep a hand across the holographic display, indicating all three of your names. "She sees a weapon, a tool, and a user. She'll expect betrayal. She'll look for signs of it, lay traps for it... and she'll be completely blind when we move as one."
Lin lets out a sharp exhale, a grin touching her lips. "He's right," she says, her earlier annoyance replaced by a slicer's cunning. "She's playing a different game. Let her think she knows the rules. It's the best cover we could ask for."
The air clears. The poison is neutralized, transformed into an advantage. You have taken your enemy's weapon and reforged it into a shield. You look between your two companions—the former Sith acolyte finding her footing on a new path, the ex-Sith Imperial tech who has finally found a cause she can believe in.
"This is a lot to take in," you say, your voice low again. "Are you both ready to move on? Or do we need a moment?"
Vela doesn't hesitate. "We press on," she says, her voice regaining its steel. "Hesitation is death. We see it all."
Lin nods in agreement. "My vote's with Vela. Let's rip the whole bandage off."
"The smart move," you say, your voice resonating with authority. "We can't outrun them if we don't know where they're running to."
Your finger taps the console, and the directory tree collapses, replaced by a sprawling, three-dimensional holographic starmap that ignites in the center of the compartment. It's a breathtaking, terrifying sight. The familiar swirl of the galaxy is overlaid with a spiderweb of information.
Red icons pulse ominously over dozens of systems: Purge Trooper Garrisons.
 Flickering nodes blink in orbital patterns: Inquisitorius Informant Networks.
 Vast swathes of space are shaded in a semi-transparent crimson: Designated High-Priority Patrol Zones.
It's Vesper's chessboard, laid bare. The net she has cast across the Outer Rim is far wider and more intricate than you could have imagined.
Lin whistles softly, her eyes wide as she manipulates the hologram, zooming in on a sector near the Mid Rim. "Kriff... look at the coverage. She's got listening posts and sleeper agents from Tatooine to the Corporate Sector. This isn't just a dragnet for Force-sensitives; it's an occupation network."
Vela stalks around the projection, her expression grim. She points to a cluster of red icons in the Arkanis sector. "This is Thirteenth Legion doctrine. Standard pacification deployment. They aren't just hunting; they're fortifying. Seizing control." She stops, her gaze fixed on a particular system. "But here," she says, her voice lowering. "And here."
She highlights two areas on the map. One is a desolate, uncharted asteroid field known only by a string of numbers: the Vergian Maelstrom. The other is the infamous smog-choked, Hutt-controlled world of Nar Shaddaa.
"These are blind spots," Vela explains. "The Maelstrom is too hazardous for conventional patrols, and Nar Shaddaa..."
"Is too chaotic," Lin finishes, a wry smile on her face. "The Sith Empire has 'official' channels there, but the Hutts run the show. Vesper has informants, sure, but no real authority. It's a city of a trillion secrets. Perfect place to disappear... or get stabbed in an alley."
The map paints a grim but clear picture. The "safe" regions of the galaxy are shrinking. Staying off-grid and running forever is not a sustainable plan. Vesper's network is designed to slowly choke off all avenues of escape.
But the map also offers possibilities. In addition to the major blind spots, a few isolated files catch your eye as Lin scrolls through a list of annotations:
File Ref: 734-Alpha. A note about a defunct Republic-era medical station on the fringe of the Bothan Sector. Marked as "low priority," but flagged for periodic surveillance. Could be a place to lie low and scavenge for supplies.


File Ref: 901-Gamma. Intelligence chatter about a growing black market for pre-Sith Imperial tech centered around the scrap yards of Bracca. High risk, high reward. A place to refit the ship or disappear among scavengers.


File Ref: 451-Delta. A flagged report on "anomalous energy signatures" near a gas giant in the Abrion Sector. Vesper has a single probe droid monitoring it, but the report is inconclusive. It's a complete unknown.


You have a map of the prison, and with it, a few potential keys. You can't stay in hyperspace forever. A choice of destination is becoming necessary.
You pull back from the holographic starmap, a gesture that draws both Vela's and Lin's attention. The web of red icons continues to pulse, a silent testament to the danger that surrounds you.
"A destination is a commitment," you state, your voice even. "And we're not ready to make it blind. This map tells us where Vesper is, but not why she's there, or what she's truly after."
You look at Lin, then Vela, meeting each of their gazes. "I want you both to think about these options. Nar Shaddaa's chaos, the quiet of that medical station, the risk of Bracca, or a leap into the complete unknown. Consider them. Mull over the risks and rewards. When we're done here, we'll decide our path forward. Together."
Lin gives a slow, appreciative nod. "Good call," she says, her eyes still flicking across the glowing map. "A wrong move now and this map becomes our tombstone. I'll run some threat assessments on those locations based on what we've seen."
Vela, who had been studying the map with intense focus, turns her attention fully to you. A flicker of respect shows in her sharp eyes. "Patience is a weapon," she says simply. It's high praise from her. "A leader who knows when not to act is rare."
The unspoken tension of choosing a destination dissipates, replaced by a shared sense of purpose. You have the external intelligence; now it's time to look inward—at your enemy's mind, or your own forgotten past.
Returning to the main directory, only two critical folders remain, each holding a different kind of secret.
"A wise decision," you say, your eyes still on the console. "Save the corrupted files for last. Let's get to know our enemy."
Vela nods in approval. "Know her mind, know her moves." Lin just leans closer, his expression tense. This feels more intimate, more dangerous than a star chart.
You tap the folder. It expands into a long list of entries, most tagged with an audio-waveform icon. They are dated, stretching back years. A chronicle of a life spent in the Sith Empire's darkest shadows. You ignore the oldest entries, instead selecting a few key logs based on their dates, creating a timeline of her focus. You press play on the first.
A voice fills the cockpit. It's female, crisp, and imbued with a chilling, almost serene authority. It's the voice of Inquisitor Vesper.

AUDIO LOG 7.34 - [ONE YEAR AGO]
"The Jedi, Knight Fellian, has been neutralized. His adherence to the Order's sentimental code was his undoing. He diverted to protect a colony from pirates—a noble, pointless gesture that allowed us to corner him. He fought with the skill of a master, but the passion of a fool. He died protecting strangers who will never know his name. The Jedi legacy isn't one of light; it's one of fatal attachment. We are the scalpel that cuts this disease from the galaxy."
Lin visibly shivers, running a hand through his short-cropped hair.
You play the next log, dated just before the incident on the Vehemence.

AUDIO LOG 9.12 - [SEVERAL WEEKS AGO]
"A priority directive from the Dark Council. All data from Project Vehemence is to be routed through me. The research lead speaks of an anomaly—a subject designated 'Cipher Null.' The initial reports are... fascinating. A Force signature with no precedent. Untrained, yet potent. It registers as a void, a statistical impossibility. The researchers see a failure, a biological dead end. I see potential. A blank slate, free of Jedi or Sith dogma. A perfect instrument, if it can be controlled. I am diverting my course."
A cold dread washes over you. Cipher Null. That was her name for you from the very beginning. You weren't a person. You were a project. An instrument.
Vela's eyes are locked on the speaker, her expression unreadable. "She saw you as a tool before she ever laid eyes on you."
Finally, you select the most recent log, recorded just after your escape from Nar Vathis. The serene confidence in Vesper's voice is gone. It has been replaced by something far more dangerous: cold, focused fury.

AUDIO LOG 9.47 - [TWO DAYS AGO]
 "(A long pause, the faint sound of crackling energy)... They have the Nightfall. The Technician, Lin, bypassed the tertiary failsafe—a feat I would have deemed impossible. The Acolyte, Sorn, proved a more formidable duelist than her file suggested. But these are predictable variables. The failure was in my assessment of the primary asset."
"(Another pause, this one shorter, sharper) Cipher Null is not an instrument. He doesn't command through fear or authority; he builds consensus. He inspires loyalty in the broken. A fatal attachment... but he turns it into a weapon. The bond between those three is not a vulnerability. It is their core strength. I have underestimated the nature of the anomaly. This is no longer an asset retrieval mission. This is pest control. I will burn every system he touches until this ideological contagion is scoured from my galaxy."
The log ends. The silence that follows is absolute.
"Gods," Lin breathes, leaning back as if pushed. "She's not just hunting us anymore. She's on a crusade."
"She sees you as a rival," Vela says, her voice low and intense. She finally looks at you, and for the first time, you see a flicker of something akin to awe in her eyes. "Not just a Force-user, but the seed of a new philosophy that threatens her entire worldview. She won't stop. Ever."
You have seen her tactics, her psychology, and now, her obsession. You know your enemy.
Only one secret remains. The one that started it all. The corrupted file, sitting at the bottom of the directory like a time bomb.
FOLDER: PROJECT VEHEMENCE - ARCHIVE -> SUBJECT PROFILE: CIPHER NULL
Everything Vesper has done, every move she's made, has been centered on this. On you. The map showed you where to run. The logs showed you who you're running from. This file promises to show you who you are.
You look at Vela and Lin. Their expressions are grim, but steady. They are ready.
It's time. You move to open the final file.
With a shared, silent understanding, you turn back to the console. The last file waits. The silence in the cockpit is no longer meditative; it's the held breath before a plunge into icy water.
Your hand, steady despite the tremor you feel building deep within your core, moves to the console. You select the final entry.
ATTEMPTING TO ACCESS CORRUPTED FILE: SUBJECT PROFILE: CIPHER NULL
The screen flashes a violent red. A string of error messages in an obscure Sith Imperial code language scrolls past, too fast to read. The file isn't just damaged; it's fighting back.
ACCESS DENIED. FILE INTEGRITY COMPROMISED. KERNEL PANIC.
"Let me," Lin says, his voice tight with focus. He shoulders his way to the console, his earlier weariness gone, replaced by the sharp energy of a master craftsman facing an impossible lock. "This isn't just shredded data. It's been deliberately sabotaged. There are logic bombs everywhere."
His fingers become a blur across the interface, bypassing security tripwires and stabilizing corrupted sectors. "Hold on... I'm getting flashes. It's not stable."
The screen flickers. For a fraction of a second, an image resolves:
 A sterile, white medical bay. A small child, no older than five, with wide, terrified eyes, strapped into a clinical chair surrounded by humming machinery. The image vanishes into static.
A wave of vertigo hits you, a phantom feeling of restraint across your own arms.
"Got a text fragment," Lin mutters, sweat beading on his brow. Words flash on the screen, disjointed and broken, but you catch phrases that burn themselves into your mind:
...synaptic dampening field at 100%...
 ...subject's innate resilience is problematic...
 ...potential as a living Force nullifier is unprecedented...
"Nullifier?" Lin breathes, his fingers momentarily pausing.
Suddenly, a burst of static clears and an audio snippet plays—a man's voice, cold and clinical, the voice of a scientist.
"...the subject doesn't just resist the Force. In close proximity, it temporarily erases the connection in others. A living void. A true null..."
The audio cuts out.
Vela takes a single, involuntary step back. Her hand flies to the hilt of her lightsaber, not as a threat, but as if to reassure herself of its connection, of the Force that flows through her. Her face is pale, her eyes wide with a look you've never seen before—not fear, but a profound, horrified shock. "A living... void," she whispers, the words catching in her throat.
"I've almost got it!" Lin grits out, making one final, desperate push. "One last core packet... the origin file!"
A single line of clean text resolves in the center of the chaotic screen. It's not a report. It's a label.
SUBJECT DESIGNATION: Kaelen. ORIGIN: JEDI ENCLAVE - DANTANA.
The name—Kaelen—slams into you with the force of a physical blow. It's not data. It's a key turning a lock deep within your soul. A blinding headache erupts behind your eyes, and the world of the cockpit dissolves.
For one searing second, you see it. Not a file, but a memory.
Sunlight on a stone courtyard. The weight of a wooden training saber in a small hand. The sound of a woman's voice, warm and kind, saying your name... Kaelen.
Then it's gone.
You stumble back from the console, one hand pressed to your temple, the other gripping the chair for support. The hum of the ship seems a million miles away. You were not a project. You were a child. A Jedi child, taken from an enclave. They didn't build you. They broke you. They tried to turn you into a weapon that could erase the very thing you were born from.
Lin and Vela are staring at you, their faces a canvas of shock and astonishment. The mystery of the nameless "Cipher Null" is gone, replaced by the ghost of a boy named Kaelen.
The phantom memory echoes in your mind, fragile and fleeting.
The name echoes in the hollow space of your amnesia, a single, solid pillar in a ruin. Kaelen.
You take a ragged breath, the world swimming back into focus. The sterile chrome of the cockpit, the worried faces of your companions. You straighten up slowly, pushing away from the console, your hand still pressed to your temple as if to hold the fragile memory in place.
Your gaze finds Vela, then Lin. Your voice is rough, strained, barely more than a whisper.
"Dantana..."
You pause, forcing the words out, giving them weight. "A Jedi Enclave. I... I remember a courtyard. Sunlight. A woman's voice..." You look at them, your eyes wide with the raw, terrifying shock of self-discovery. "My name... is Kaelen."
The confession hangs in the air, heavy and absolute. It changes everything. You are not a "Cipher Null," an anomaly born in an Sith Imperial lab. You are Kaelen, a Jedi child stolen and twisted into the antithesis of your own nature. A living weapon designed to destroy the very people you came from.
Lin stares, his mouth slightly agape. All the slicer's bravado is gone, replaced by simple, human awe. "A Jedi," he breathes. "They took you from a Jedi temple."
Vela's reaction is more complex, more profound. The shock on her face slowly morphs into something else. Understanding. The pieces click into place for her with sickening clarity—your raw, untutored power, your innate charisma, your moral compass that so often baffled her Sith sensibilities. She sees the ghost of the Jedi Knight Vesper killed, the one who died for a "fatal attachment," and she sees you, a living embodiment of that same principle.
"A Force nullifier," she says, her voice low and filled with a strange new resonance. "That's why your presence feels... quiet. Why the Force around you is different." She takes a step closer, her usual caution replaced by an intense, analytical curiosity. "They didn't just try to train you. They tried to unmake you."
The three of you stand there in the heart of the stolen ship, the silence pregnant with the magnitude of this revelation. You finally have a past. But that past carries with it an legacy of war, of genocide. It paints an even larger target on your back. You are not just a rogue Force-sensitive; you are a lost son of the Jedi Order, twisted into a weapon by the Sith's dark agents.
The decrypted logs, which moments ago seemed like the ultimate prize, now feel like just the first step. You have a name. You have an origin. And you have an enemy who wants to use the weapon you were meant to be to burn the memory of your people from the galaxy.
The weight of this new identity settles on your shoulders. The path forward is no longer just about survival. It's about reclamation.
Your words cut through the charged atmosphere, each one a calculated move on a board none of you had even seen until now.
Lin, startled by the sudden shift in your tone from shell-shocked victim to determined commander, snaps to attention. "On it," he says, his voice tight with a new kind of respect. He turns back to the console, fingers flying. "Dantana... cross-referencing with Vesper's asset map... heritage..." He mutters to himself, already lost in the river of data. "A weapon... gods, what did they do to you?" The last part is almost a whisper, a thought not meant for you to hear.
Then, you turn to Vela.
The cockpit seems to shrink, the universe narrowing to the space between the two of you. You meet her gaze, your own eyes clear and fiercely certain. "I hold no allegiance to the Jedi," you state, the words a formal declaration. "My allegiance is to you."
You see a flicker in her eyes—surprise, confusion. You press on before she can process it.
"If I have that power," you continue, your voice low and intense, "the ability to nullify the Force... then you know as well as I do, the entity on the Vehemence is my opposite. It will escape, or worse, be controlled by the Sith. We need to destroy it." You lean in slightly, the gravity of your shared purpose a tangible thing. "We can only figure out how to do that if we defeat Vesper. And I believe we can make both happen simultaneously."
You deliver the final, devastating blow to her Sith conditioning. "After, I am yours to command, my master."
And then you kneel.
The act is swift, precise, and absolute. On the cold durasteel floor of the stolen Inquisitorius ship, the man named Kaelen, the living void, the former Jedi child, bows his head to the exiled Sith Acolyte.
The silence is deafening.
Vela does not move. She doesn't speak. She simply stares down at you, her face a mask of warring emotions. You can feel the conflict radiating from her. Her training, her entire life, screams at her to accept. To take the power being offered. To seize the ultimate weapon, freely given. This is the culmination of every Sith's ambition.
But she has seen you lead. She has seen you offer trust when any Sith would have offered a blade. She has heard you defend her when Vesper's poison tried to break them apart.
Slowly, deliberately, she takes a step forward. She does not place a hand on your shoulder in a gesture of dominance. Instead, she reaches down and offers you her hand, palm up. An invitation.
"Stand up, Kaelen," she says, her voice quiet but unshakeable. It lacks the sharp command of a master. It holds the firm weight of a partner. "A master commands a servant. I need an ally. A blade with three edges, remember?"
She has thrown your own words back at you, redefining your pact not as one of submission, but of unity.
As you rise, taking her hand, Lin lets out a sharp breath from the console. "I've got it."
You both turn to him. The starmap is back up, but now it highlights a single system in the Raioballo sector, far from the crimson patrol routes.
"Dantana," Lin says, his voice filled with awe. "The Jedi Enclave there was a major center for training and lore before the Great Sith War. Vesper's logs list it as 'decommissioned and abandoned.' She thinks it's nothing but ruins. There's a single, low-power recon probe in the whole sector. It's a blind spot. A perfect blind spot." He looks from the map to you. "If you want to learn about your heritage, Kaelen... that's the place to start. It's our safest and most dangerous option, all at once."
Vela's hand drops from yours, but she remains at your side. The choice is made. You have a name. You have a destination. You have a purpose forged not from vengeance, but from a new, powerful loyalty. And you have an enemy who is hunting a ghost, completely unaware of the threat you are becoming.
A new resolve hardens your expression. You are no longer adrift. You have a heading.
"Lin," you command, your voice ringing with newfound purpose. "Lay in the course for Dantana. Take us to the edge of the system, stealth approach."
Lin, looking relieved to have a concrete objective, immediately gets to work. "Aye, Captain. Dantana it is. I'll keep us deep in the shadows."
You add the second directive. "In the meantime, see what you can find on the entity we encountered on the Vehemence. The one that felt... loud. Anything. Corrupted logs, sister projects, whispers. I need to know what it is."
"I'll dig," Lin promises, his face illuminated by the console's glow. "The Inquisition wanted to erase that project, but they're not as good at deleting things as they think they are."
With Lin occupied, you turn to Vela. "And we," you say, your voice dropping, "have a power to test."
She understands immediately. A sharp, dangerous curiosity glints in her eyes. "The cargo hold," she says. "It's the largest open space. We need room."
A few minutes later, you stand opposite her on the cold durasteel plating of the empty cargo hold. The only light comes from the dim service strips along the floor.
"I have formal training," she states, her voice business-like, devoid of the earlier emotion. "You have... an anomaly. We will begin with the basics. I will reach out with the Force. You will... do what you did on Nar Vathis. That instinctive shield. But this time, do it consciously. Focus on me. Try to create that... void."
She closes her eyes. Across the space, a discarded hydrospanner on a crate begins to tremble. You feel the familiar thrum of the Force, a subtle energy filling the room. Following her instruction, you close your eyes and don't try to summon power. Instead, you reach for the opposite: a deep, profound quiet inside yourself. The silence that Vesper's log described. You focus that quiet, that nothingness, and project it towards Vela.
The effect is immediate and jarring.
The thrumming in the air ceases as if a switch has been thrown. The hydrospanner, halfway into the air, drops to the crate with a loud clatter.
Vela's eyes snap open. She stumbles a half-step back, her hand flying to her chest. She's breathing heavily. "Kriff," she gasps, her voice strained. "It feels... like trying to breathe water. A pressure. A deadness." She looks at you, not with fear, but with a forensic intensity. "How does it feel for you?"
"Quiet," you reply, surprised by the lack of effort. "It doesn't feel like pushing. It feels like... letting go."
"Again," she commands, her composure returning. "But this time, I will push harder. And you... try to control the size of it. Don't just flood the room. Make it a shield. Just around me."
She extends a hand, and this time a palpable wave of energy, cold and sharp, surges towards you. It's an intimidation tactic, a wave of fear and pressure meant to overwhelm. You focus, picturing the void not as a flood, but as a bubble, forming it precisely around her extended hand.
The wave of fear vanishes inches from your face. Vela grits her teeth, sweat beading on her forehead. "It's gone," she says through clenched teeth. "My connection. It's just... severed at the wrist." She pulls her hand back as if burned.
"This is not just a shield," she says, her voice a mix of awe and terror. "It is a scalpel. You can sever a Jedi from the Force in the middle of a duel. You could make them... blind. Helpless." She stalks around you, examining you as if you were a new kind of lightsaber. "It is a weapon beyond anything the Sith have ever conceived."
Just as she speaks, Lin's voice crackles over the ship's intercom.
"Kaelen. Vela. You might want to see this." His voice is strained. "I found something. Not about your 'opposite.' Not directly. But I found a project name, buried in a redacted Vehemence supply manifest. It was running concurrently with Cipher Null."
He pauses, then delivers the chilling name.
"Project Chimera."
The name hangs in the air, cold and alien. Project Chimera.
The energy from your training session evaporates, replaced by a chilling stillness. Vela’s intense focus on your abilities instantly pivots to the new threat, her expression hardening into the familiar mask of a predator sensing danger.
"We're coming," you say into the air, your voice low and steady. You share a look with Vela—the lesson is over, the real test has just begun.
You move swiftly from the cargo hold to the main cockpit. Lin is hunched over the console, his face bathed in the eerie green light of the decrypted text. He looks pale.
"It was buried deep," he says without looking up, pointing a trembling finger at the screen. "Redacted six times over. I only found it because it was on a requisition list for anomalous biological containment gear. Same type of gear they used for the labs on the Vehemence."
On the screen are fragmented lines of a research proposal, a nightmare in clinical language:
PROJECT CHIMERA - PROPOSAL SUMMARY
Objective: To create a living Force conduit. An entity capable of absorbing, amplifying, and projecting ambient Force energy.


Methodology: Grafting of multiple Force-sensitive bio-signatures onto a single host subject. Creation of a symbiotic, yet unstable, psychic matrix.


Anticipated Outcome: A controllable Force 'Amplifier,' capable of magnifying the abilities of nearby Force-wielders by an order of magnitude. A power source for Inquisitorius field operations.


RISK ASSESSMENT: Catastrophic psychic backlash. Subject's consciousness is fragmented. Prone to uncontrolled energy releases. Unstable.


STATUS: Unknown. Presumed lost with Vehemence research data.


"The entity on the Vehemence," you say, the pieces clicking into place with horrific clarity. "The 'loud' one. It wasn't just a person. It was a battery."
Lin nods grimly. "They weren't just trying to make a weapon that could switch the Force off," he says, looking at you. "They were building its power pack, too. A matched set. The Nullifier and the Amplifier."
Vela stares at the screen, her lips pressed into a thin, bloodless line. The strategic and philosophical implications wash over her face. "A living Force locus," she whispers, a mixture of horror and tactical fascination in her voice. "To give a Sith Lord a weapon like that... they wouldn't just be powerful. They would be a god." Her eyes narrow. "Or it would tear them apart. They created a monster they couldn't possibly hope to control."
The reality of your situation has just expanded exponentially. You are not just being hunted by an Inquisitor. You are one half of a terrifying equation, an apocalyptic weapon system set loose upon the galaxy. And the other half is out there, a psychic time bomb waiting to be found by Vesper, the Sith, or something worse.
Your journey to Dantana was for self-discovery. But now, another purpose looms, a responsibility born from the horrors of your own past. Leaving the Amplifier unchecked seems like an unthinkable risk.
Your course is set for Dantana, but your priorities are in flux. The fate of a single runaway ship is nothing compared to the chaos a creature like the Amplifier could unleash.
You look away from the chilling report on the screen, your mind already processing the new variables. The fear and shock give way to a cold, hard clarity. You see the path.
"We stay the course," you declare, your voice cutting through the tension. Lin and Vela both turn to you, awaiting the rest of the command.
"Nothing has changed, except the stakes. No one knows where we are or where we're going. That's our greatest advantage." You look at Lin. "Keep us on course for Dantana. We learn about me first, and we do it quickly."
Then, your gaze shifts to Vela, a silent promise of future conflict passing between you. "After Dantana, we hunt. We'll find the last known coordinates of the Vehemence. The Amplifier is a threat, but Vesper is the one holding the leash. We'll use the place where she lost us to lay a trap and end her hunt for good."
Lin lets out a slow breath, a grim smile touching his lips. "Going back to that hellhole. A bold plan. I like it." He turns back to the navigation console, his fingers flying with renewed purpose. "Course locked for Dantana. It'll be a few standard rotations. We'll be ghosts the whole way."
Vela nods slowly, her arms crossed as she processes the strategy. "Patience. Preparation. Using the site of her greatest failure as the stage for her demise..." A flicker of dark appreciation crosses her face. "There is a certain poetry to that. Very well. If you are to be a weapon, you must first be understood."
With the decision made, a new kind of quiet settles over the ship. It's not the silence of rest, but the focused calm of a predator's long hunt. The days in hyperspace blur into a routine of grim purpose.
Lin is a phantom at his console, dedicating every waking moment to two tasks: ensuring your flight path is utterly untraceable, and sifting through the corrupted data for any scrap of information on the Vehemence's final resting place or the history of the Dantana enclave. He uncovers fragmented schematics of the old temple, lists of Jedi Masters who once taught there, and astronomical data that confirms it has been left to ruin for decades—a perfect, forgotten grave.
Meanwhile, you and Vela spend hours in the cargo hold. The training is no longer exploratory; it is now relentlessly specific.
"Not a flood," she'd command, circling you as you stood with your eyes closed. "A needle. The connection between my hand and that datapad. Find it. Sever only that."
You would reach out with your quiet, feeling for the almost invisible thread of the Force she was using, and you would unmake it. The datapad would clatter to the floor. It was exhausting work, for both of you. She felt the constant drain of having her connection severed and re-established, while you felt the mental strain of wielding your unique ability with surgical precision. You were learning control.
Finally, after what feels like an eternity in the blue-white tunnel of hyperspace, Lin's voice comes over the ship's comm.
"We're here. Dropping out of hyperspace at the edge of the system."
The familiar lurch of the ship returning to realspace shudders through the deck. You join Lin and Vela in the cockpit. Before you, on the main viewscreen, hangs a world of serene, heartbreaking beauty.
Dantana.
It's a vibrant globe of deep greens and brilliant blues, swirled with clouds. From this distance, it looks peaceful, untouched. But you can feel it, a faint echo in the Force, a whisper of memory. It feels like coming home to a place you've never been.
Lin's console beeps. "Got the recon probe's signal. It's on a predictable orbital path. We can slip past it easily. The enclave ruins are on the largest continent, deep in a valley system." He brings up a topographic map. "It's remote. We'll have to land some distance away and approach on foot."
You stare at the image of the green world, the place where you were once Kaelen. It holds answers, ghosts, and the key to your future. 
"Hold here," you command, your eyes fixed on the serene green marble of the planet below. "Do a full-spectrum sensor sweep. Everything. I want to be certain Vesper's 'abandoned' status is accurate."
"Good thinking," Lin replies, his fingers already dancing across his console. "The Inquisitorius isn't known for leaving loose ends."
The Nightfall's powerful passive sensors come to life, not with a burst of energy that might be detected, but with a silent, methodical thirst for information. The ship listens, sampling the planet's electromagnetic spectrum, analyzing atmospheric composition, and searching for any technological fingerprint that doesn't belong. The process is slow, deliberate. Vela stands beside you, her arms crossed, watching the data streams with a critical eye.
After a long, tense silence, Lin leans back, letting out a slow breath.
"Well, Vesper wasn't entirely wrong," he begins. "She was just lazy. The planet is quiet. No active communication grids, no ship transponders besides the recon probe, no large-scale power signatures. From orbit, it looks dead."
He pauses, tapping a command into the console and zooming in on the topographical map of the enclave. "But it's not empty."
A tiny, flickering icon appears over the ruins. "I'm reading a faint, intermittent power source from the heart of the ruins. It's ancient—pre-Sith Imperial tech, compatible with Old Republic designs. It's not enough for a military base, but it's not zero, either. Could be an old automated system, a backup generator... or something else."
He overlays another filter. "There's also evidence of movement. Nothing heavy, no vehicles. But the local flora and fauna patterns show disturbances. Pathways. Shelters. Something is living down there, and it's not just the native wildlife."
Vela's eyes narrow. "Scavengers? A hermit? Or a trap left by Vesper, running on low power to avoid detection?"
"Could be any of them," Lin confirms. "The one thing I'm sure of is that we won't be alone."
You process the new information. The situation is more complex, but the path is still the same. Your caution has been rewarded with knowledge.
"That's the data we needed," you say, your voice firm. "It doesn't change the destination, just the approach. Take us in, Lin. Find a landing zone at least five klicks from the ruins. We go in quiet."
"On it," he says, a grim determination on his face.
The Nightfall angles toward the planet, its stealth systems drinking the light and energy around it. You slip into the upper atmosphere like a ghost, a silent shadow against the clouds, easily avoiding the blind, predictable path of the Sith Imperial recon probe. The ship descends into a lush, deep valley, untouched by industry or war. Lin expertly pilots the vessel into a small clearing surrounded by colossal, moss-covered trees, their canopies so thick they blot out the sky.
With a final, soft hiss of hydraulics, the ship settles. The engines whine down into silence. For the first time since this ordeal began, you are surrounded by the sounds of life—the chirp of alien insects, the rustle of leaves in the wind, the distant cry of some unseen creature.
The ramp lowers, and the air that fills the ship is cool, damp, and rich with the smell of wet earth and strange blossoms. It feels ancient. A part of you, deep and buried, recognizes it. It feels like home.
You stand at the edge of the ramp, flanked by Vela and Lin. The five-kilometer trek through dense, unknown wilderness lies ahead, leading to ruins that are not as empty as you'd hoped.
"The mission is clear," you state, your voice cutting through the alien sounds of the jungle. You look at Vela, then at Lin, a profound trust in your eyes. "Let's move. Daylight gives us the advantage, and I trust you both to handle your expertise."
There are no further orders needed. The pact forged in the quiet of hyperspace holds true. Without a word, Vela gives a sharp, affirmative nod. She draws a compact vibro-knife, her movements fluid and silent as she melts into the dense foliage at the head of your formation. She is the tip of the spear.
Lin, meanwhile, quickly distributes gear—a compact scanner for himself, extra power cells for everyone. He checks the charge on his blaster pistol before holstering it, his eyes constantly scanning the canopy above and the path behind. He is your eyes and ears, watching your back.
You take your place in the center, a silent commander. The three of you move as a single, coordinated unit, a blade with three edges, just as Vela said.
The trek is arduous. The air is thick with humidity, and colossal trees form a canopy that creates an emerald twilight on the forest floor, even in the middle of the day. Sunlight dapples through the leaves, painting shifting patterns on vines as thick as pythons and on ferns of an iridescent blue. A strange sense of familiarity brushes against your mind, a phantom feeling of running through these same woods as a child. The planet feels alive, and it feels like it's watching you.
After an hour of silent progress, Vela raises a clenched fist. The party freezes instantly. She crouches, pointing not at a threat, but at the trunk of a massive, gnarled tree. Carved into the bark, weathered but clear, is a symbol. It's not a Jedi crest or a Sith rune. It's simpler, almost primal—a spiral with a single, straight line cutting through its center.
"A trail marker," Lin whispers from behind you, his scanner whirring softly. "Recent. Within the last rotation."
You are on someone's path.
Pressing on, the terrain begins to slope upwards. The jungle thins slightly, giving way to rockier ground. After another twenty minutes of climbing, Vela leads you to a natural overlook.
Below you, nestled in the heart of the valley, lie the ruins of the Jedi Enclave.
It's a sight of haunting beauty and profound sadness. Spires like broken teeth jut towards the sky, draped in thick green moss and flowering vines. Courtyards have become tangled gardens, and walls of white stone have crumbled, the stones now serving as foundations for the ancient trees. You can see the faint, rhythmic pulse of light that Lin detected—a single lamp, glowing in the window of the most intact central tower.
From this vantage point, you can see two clear paths down.
The first is the one you've been following, marked by more of the strange spiral symbols. It's a well-trodden, direct path that winds down the slope and straight towards the central tower. It's the fastest way, but also the most obvious.
The second is a treacherous-looking goat path that splits off to the east, weaving through a narrow gorge and clusters of precarious rockfalls. It would be a much slower, more difficult climb, but it would bring you to the outer perimeter of the ruins, far from the main path and the glowing light.
You stand on the precipice, the two paths stretching below like a physical manifestation of your own conflict. You look at the direct route, feeling the pull of a swift, decisive confrontation. Then you look at the treacherous side path, acknowledging the wisdom in caution.
Turning from the view, you face your companions. The wind on the overlook whips a loose strand of hair across your face.
"I'm of two minds," you admit openly, your voice calm and level. "A direct approach shows strength and forces their hand. But waiting gives us more information. We're standing blind." You meet Lin's gaze, then Vela's. "I'll defer to you. What do your instincts say?"
Lin is the first to speak, lowering the macrobinoculars he'd been using to survey the ruins. "My instincts say the person who goes in without knowing the layout of the room is the first to step on a pressure plate," he says wryly. "My vote is for patience. We have the high ground. We have cover. From here, I can run a deeper passive scan on that power source, try to get a better read on the life signs, and map any active sensor grids they might have. We wait, we watch, we learn. When we go down, we go down knowing exactly what we're facing."
Vela scoffs softly, though there's no malice in it. Her gaze remains locked on the tower with the single glowing light. "And while we wait and learn, they learn we are here," she counters, her voice sharp and pragmatic. "An animal that hesitates at the edge of a clearing is the one that gets caught by the hawk. Those trail markers are fresh. The light is on. They are active."
She turns to face you, her expression intense. "We walk down the main path. Not like thieves, but like inheritors. We project confidence, authority. We force them to reveal themselves on our terms. Surprise is not always about stealth; sometimes, it is the sheer audacity of your arrival."
The two opposing philosophies hang in the air between them: Lin's calculated caution versus Vela's aggressive pragmatism. Both arguments are valid. Both carry immense risk.
They have given you their counsel. Now they both look to you, awaiting the final command. The decision is yours to make, armed with their perspectives.
You look from Lin's cautious face to Vela's impatient one, then back to the ruins below. The conflict resolves into a single, decisive action.
"You're both right," you declare, your voice leaving no room for argument. "So we'll do both." You turn to Lin. "You have ten minutes. Not a second more. Get what you can. Prioritize life signs and active defenses."
Lin looks like he wants to argue that ten minutes is an impossible timeframe, but he sees the resolve in your eyes and simply nods. "Ten minutes," he confirms, already turning back to his scanner, his hands a blur of motion.
You then face Vela. "When his scan is done, we go in. The direct path." She gives you a single, sharp nod of approval.
"I need a moment to center myself," you say, stepping away from them towards the edge of the overlook.
You find a flat, cool stone and sit, closing your eyes. The sounds of the jungle fade as you turn your senses inward, reaching for that unique quiet that is your signature in the Force. But you don't project it as a weapon. Instead, you use it as a listening device, a net of silence cast over the valley below. You don't listen for the Force's presence, but for its disturbances, sensing the shape of things by the way the Force bends around them.
The ruins emanate a profound, lingering sadness. It's the echo of a song long since ended, a ghost of light and peace that makes your teeth ache with an unfamiliar longing. This was a place of tranquility, and its memory is still imprinted on the stones.
You focus on the central tower, on the single point of light. You feel... a person. One person. Their presence in the Force is not like Vela's controlled fire or Vesper's icy ambition. It is a single, steady flame burning in a deep well. It is ancient, weary, but intensely resolute. It is not hostile. It is... waiting.
Then you expand your awareness, searching the perimeter, the places where Lin detected movement. You feel them. Not one, but many. More than a dozen scattered sparks in the dark, hidden amongst the trees and rocks. They are small, flickering presences—fearful, watchful, and hidden. They are not Jedi or Sith. They feel like... survivors.
"Time's up," Lin's voice cuts through your concentration.
You open your eyes, the tangible world flooding back in. Vela is already standing, poised and ready. You rise and walk back to them.
"What did you get?" you ask Lin.
He points to his datapad. "Just what you asked for. The power source in the tower is Old Republic, stable, powering minimal life support and that single light. I confirm one primary life sign inside the tower. Humanoid, low metabolic rate. Seems to be at rest." He swipes the screen. "As for the others... I count at least sixteen signatures scattered around the ruins' perimeter. No tech, no energy weapons. They're hiding. Lying low. Whoever is in that tower has a flock, and they're scared."
His data perfectly mirrors the feelings you gleaned from the Force. You now have a clearer picture: a lone, powerful figure in a forgotten Jedi tower, surrounded by a tribe of hidden followers.
The ten minutes are over. You have your intelligence. Vela is ready for action. The path is waiting.
You are as prepared as you're going to be.
You turn to your party. "Let's go," you command, stepping onto the direct path that leads down into the valley.
You stop at the head of the path, turning to face your allies. The words you speak are not a request, but a statement of intent, laying your strategy and your life in their hands.
"I believe whoever is in that tower is waiting for me," you say, your gaze steady and certain. "I do not believe they mean me harm."
You look directly at Vela, the trust between you now a palpable thing. "If I am wrong, Vela, be sure to act first. But not until you are sure." A flicker of surprise crosses her face; you are entrusting her with your life, but also with the discretion to judge the threat. It is a level of responsibility she has never been given.
"I am putting all of my cards on the table here," you conclude, your gaze sweeping over both of them. "In hopes we don’t waste time. For this to work, I will be vulnerable."
Lin swallows hard, his hand instinctively resting on the grip of his blaster. He gives a short, jerky nod. He doesn't like the risk, but he understands the reasoning. He'll cover the angles.
Vela's expression is far more complex. The corners of her mouth tighten, not in disapproval, but in intense concentration. "Your vulnerability will be my shield," she says, her voice a low, lethal promise. "Nothing will reach you until I am ash." She understands her role perfectly.
With the pact made, you turn and begin the descent.
The walk is unlike any you've taken before. You don't skulk or hide. You walk down the center of the ancient stone path, your footsteps echoing softly in the valley. The air is thick with unseen eyes. A child's face peeks from behind a moss-covered statue, vanishing as you draw near. A rustle in the overgrown bushes reveals the hem of a rough-spun cloak before it's pulled back into the shadows. They are here. The scattered, fearful sparks you sensed. They watch you pass with a mixture of terror and awe.
The ruins grow larger, swallowing the sky. Finally, you stand before the central tower. It is ancient, scarred by time, but its lines are still noble. The single light in the high window seems to pulse gently, like a slow heartbeat. The main door is a single, massive slab of carved stone, seamless and imposing. There is no handle, no visible mechanism.
As you take a step forward, a deep grinding sound echoes from within the stone. Dust falls from the lintel as the massive door slowly, ponderously, slides open, revealing a dark, cavernous space beyond.
The invitation has been given.
You walk through the doorway, Vela a half-step behind you to your right, Lin covering the entrance from your left. The air inside is cool and smells of dust, ozone, and something else... a dry, papery scent like an old library.
The room is vast and circular. The only light comes from the single lamp high above, casting a solitary column of light onto the center of the floor. Dust motes dance in the beam like tiny stars. The walls are lined with empty shelves and alcoves where, you sense, great works of knowledge once rested.
In the center of the room, seated on a simple stone stool directly under the light, is a single figure. An elderly Twi'lek female. Her skin is the pale blue of a twilight sky, and her lekku, long and slender, are draped over her shoulders. She wears the simple, unadorned robes of a scholar. Her eyes, a startlingly bright violet, are closed as if in meditation. She is the source of the steady, ancient flame you felt in the Force.
As your footsteps halt on the stone floor, her eyes open. They are not the eyes of a warrior or a frightened hermit. They are the eyes of an archivist who has read the last page of a very, very long book. They fix on you, and a slow, sad, infinitely weary smile touches her lips.
Her voice, when she speaks, is quiet, yet it fills the vast chamber.
"The archives are silent," she says. "The Masters are gone. The gardens are overgrown. But the prophecy held true."
She rises slowly, her movements stiff with age, and gives a slight, respectful bow of her head.
"Welcome home, Kaelen."
You mirror her bow, an act of pure instinct and respect. The title feels right on your tongue, a word dredged up from the abyss of your forgotten past. "I bare shame, for I know not your name, Keeper."
The ancient Twi'lek's smile deepens, etched with a profound sadness but also a gentle warmth. She inclines her head once more, accepting your gesture.
"Shame is a burden you need not carry here, child," she says, her quiet voice resonating in the silent chamber. "What was stolen from you is no fault of your own."
She straightens, her gaze unwavering. "You call me Keeper. It is as good a title as any. For decades, I have kept the echoes of this place alive, waiting. I am Jocian."
Her violet eyes drift past you for a moment, acknowledging your companions. She looks at Vela, her gaze lingering on the barely concealed lightsaber hilt, and at Lin, who stands tensely by the door with his hand near his blaster. There is no judgment in her eyes, only a deep, weary understanding.
"You have brought interesting company," Jocian observes, her gaze returning to you. "A shadow of the Sith, carrying the weight of a broken creed. And a man of machines, trusting in circuits and steel. The Force weaves strange, powerful threads around you, Kaelen."
She gestures to the empty space around her, an invitation to close the distance.
"Your mind is a library with its shelves torn out," she says softly. "But the foundation remains. You have come seeking answers, and I have guarded what little lore remains. What I have is yours. Ask."
The vast, silent room seems to hold its breath. Vela and Lin remain perfectly still, respecting the gravity of the moment, their fates now tied to the history about to be revealed. Here, in the ruins of his past, Kaelen stands before the last living link to his identity.
“You say I was expected to return?”
You hold her gaze, the question born of pure disbelief. You, a weapon forged in a secret lab, were expected?
Jocian's weary smile does not falter. She takes a slow step closer, her violet eyes holding yours with a gentle, ancient gravity.
"Expected? Yes. Hoped for. For longer than you can imagine," she says, her voice a soft echo in the vast, empty hall. "It was not a prophecy written in a holocron, Kaelen. It was a final vision. A dying ember of hope left by your master."
A name forms on her lips, and as she says it, a phantom warmth flickers in your memory, the ghost of a kind hand on your shoulder.
"Master Leona. She was a powerful seer. Just before the Sith purge scoured this place, she saw what was to come. Not for the Enclave—she knew it was lost—but for you."
Jocian gestures to you, her hand indicating your entire being. "She saw that they would take the child who was a void, a quiet place in the Force. She saw them trying to twist that quiet into a weapon. And she saw that one day, that weapon would return not to the Sith, not to the Jedi, but to itself. Here."
Her gaze drifts to Vela, then to Lin, a profound understanding in her eyes. "Her vision was not specific. But she saw you would not be alone. She saw your strength would not be in the Jedi Code, but in the bonds you forged in the dark."
Finally, she looks back at you, the full weight of her vigil settling upon you. "Master Leona's final act was to charge me with this task: to wait. To keep the memory of this place alive. And to be here when you returned, to tell you that your nature is not a curse. It is a shield."
She pauses, letting the word hang in the air. "She foresaw that your return would mean the 'Consuming Dark' was also stirring. A shadow that feeds on the Force itself. The prophecy did not say you would destroy it, Kaelen. It said you would be the only one who could face it."
The story settles around you. You were not a forgotten tragedy. You were a final, desperate hope. Your anomalous nature, the thing that made you a target and a weapon, was foreseen as the galaxy's only defense against a threat that could devour Jedi and Sith alike.
And now, that threat—Project Chimera—is real.
“I am ready. Tell me what I need to know. What is my history? What happened? What do you know of my power?”
A flicker of profound relief crosses Jocian's ancient features. For the first time, the immense weight of her long vigil seems to lighten.
"Readiness is the first, and most important, step," she says, her voice gaining a new strength. She turns and begins to walk slowly toward the shadowed rear of the chamber. "Come. Words are echoes. Seeing is remembering."
You follow, Vela and Lin falling into step behind you. Jocian leads you to a section of the wall that appears smooth and unbroken. She places a hand upon it, and a faint hum resonates through the stone. A section of the wall slides away, revealing a small, hidden chamber.
Inside, resting on a stone pedestal, is a single Jedi holocron. It glows with a soft, ethereal blue light, pulsing like a gentle heartbeat.
"Most of the Archives were purged or taken," Jocian explains. "But this... this was made for you. Master Leona encoded it with her own memories, her own knowledge. It is attuned to your unique presence in the Force. Only you can open it."
She gestures to the glowing cube. "Your history is in there. The story of your discovery as a child, brought to the Enclave because of the strange, peaceful void you created around you. You were not a powerful Jedi, Kaelen. You were a sanctuary."
Her voice fills with sorrow. "And that is why they came for you. The Sith of that era were not just conquerors; they were scholars of the profane. They sought to weaponize every aspect of the Force. They heard whispers of a child who was immune, a living nullification. They raided this Enclave not for territory, but for you. They took you, and they slaughtered all who stood in their way."
She turns her gaze from the holocron to you, her eyes sharp. "As for your power... we called it the 'Sanctuary Field.' It is not an absence of the Force, but a perfect balance. So balanced, it harmonizes the Force around it into a state of utter tranquility. To a Force-wielder, whose senses are attuned to the flow and flux of energy, stepping into your field is like a deafening silence falling over a raging battlefield. It is disorienting. Terrifying. It severs their connection because you bring them into your peace, and they are not prepared for it."
She gestures to the holocron again. "Master Leona believed you could learn to control its shape. To extend it, focus it. Turn it from a passive shield into an active tool. She believed you could learn to project that perfect, deafening peace into a weapon... or into a nexus of pure, unadulterated power."
She falls silent, letting her words sink in. Everything is laid before you: your past, the truth of your power, and the instrument of your education.
The blue light of the holocron pulses, seeming to call to you. It holds the memories of your childhood, the lessons of your master, the truth of who you were meant to be.
You hold back, your hand hovering inches from the glowing holocron. The call of your own past is strong, but the shadow of the future is longer. You look at Jocian, your expression grim.
"This 'Consuming Dark,' Project Chimera... did Master Leona see anything else about it?"
Jocian’s ancient face becomes a mask of profound gravity. The weary warmth in her eyes is replaced by the reflection of a distant, terrible fire.
"She saw it as your shadow," Jocian says, her voice barely a whisper. "Your inversion. Where you are a perfect, silent balance, it is a chorus of unending, screaming chaos. She did not see a project or a number. She saw a hunger. A wound in the Force that does not heal, but only grows."
She takes a slow breath, as if the memory itself is a physical burden. "It does not create. It does not command. It only... takes. It draws the Force into itself, feeding on the power of others, on the life of planets, leaving nothing but a scarred emptiness behind. She saw that if it were ever chained to a will—Jedi or Sith—it would grant them the power to silence star systems. But the chain would eventually break. And the hunger that was unleashed would not be sated until the galaxy was a cold, quiet tomb."
Her violet eyes lock onto yours, conveying the most critical piece of the vision.
"Master Leona was clear on only one other point," Jocian states, her voice regaining a sliver of its strength. "You cannot destroy it with the Force. To attack it with the Force is to feed it."
The horrifying logic of it clicks into place. Vesper, the Sith, anyone who tried to fight the Chimera with conventional power would only make it stronger.
"You are the only one who can face it, Kaelen," she concludes, her gaze intense. "Because you are the only one who can starve it."
The full weight of your destiny settles upon you. You were never meant to be a simple survivor. You are the specific, singular antidote to a galactic plague. But you are an antidote that doesn't know how to work.
The pulsing blue light of the holocron on the pedestal seems to shine brighter now. It is no longer just a key to your past. It is an instruction manual for the future. It holds the lessons you need to learn to control your power, to wield the "Sanctuary Field" not just as a shield, but as the one weapon that can starve the consuming darkness.
You look at the glowing cube. You look at Vela and Lin, who have stood in silence, their expressions a mixture of awe and terror. They are no longer just your allies. They are the guardians of the galaxy's only hope.
The path forward has never been clearer, or more terrifying.
You turn back to the holocron.
With a deep, final breath, you close the distance. The time for questions is over. The time for answers has come.
You extend your hand, not with the hesitation of a stranger, but with the certainty of a key returning to its lock. The moment your fingers touch the cool, crystalline surface of the holocron, the room changes.
There is no flare of blue light, no surge of energy. Instead, there is an inhalation. The ambient Force in the room, the faint echoes of the past, the very light from the lamp above—it all seems to draw inward, pulled into the nexus between your hand and the device. For Vela, the sensation is profoundly jarring, as if the air has been stolen from her lungs. For Lin, the lights in the chamber flicker and dim.
The holocron doesn't project images into the room. It projects them directly into your mind.
The world dissolves into a torrent of sensory data, a lifetime lived in a matter of seconds.
You see it all.
You are a child, no older than four, sitting in a sun-drenched garden. A woman with warm eyes and kind hands—Master Leona—is teaching you to feel the quiet space around you. "It is a gift, Kaelen," her voice echoes, not as a memory, but as a living thing. "A sanctuary. All are at peace within it."
You are eight, standing in a training hall. Not with a lightsaber, but with a dozen training remotes firing stun bolts at you simultaneously. You don't deflect them. You close your eyes, extend that field of silence, and watch as the bolts fizzle into nothingness inches from your skin, their energy signatures simply... erased.
You are ten. The memory is chaotic, terrifying. The sky outside the Enclave is red with fire. The screams of people you knew, the sharp, angry hiss of red lightsabers. You are huddled in a corner, and your fear makes the Sanctuary Field flare uncontrollably. You see a Sith Lord, his face a mask of rage, falter as he enters your bubble of silence, his lightsaber flickering as his connection to the Force is severed. He looks at you not with hate, but with avarice. He shouts an order: "Take him! He is the weapon!"
And finally, you see Master Leona, her face filled with sorrow but also with unshakeable resolve. She is alone, holding the holocron. She looks directly at you, across the gulf of years, and speaks her final message, meant only for the man you would become.
"Kaelen," her voice fills your mind, clear and calm amidst the remembered chaos. "If you are seeing this, then my fear has come to pass. But my hope has, too. They have twisted your gift, but they have not broken it. The silence within you is not emptiness; it is perfect balance. It is a sword of peace. The Consuming Dark cannot be fought with anger or passion. It cannot be overpowered. It must be calmed. It must be pacified. It must be brought into your sanctuary. Do not fight the shadow, child. Embrace it in your quiet. Show it the peace it has never known. That is your path. That is your victory."
The flood of memories ceases.
You gasp, stumbling back, your hand flying from the holocron as if from a fire. The device settles on its pedestal, its soft blue light returning to normal. You fall to one knee, the sheer weight of a reclaimed identity crashing down on you. Your name is Kaelen. You remember your Master. You remember your home. And you remember your purpose.
"Kaelen!" Lin's voice is sharp with alarm.
Vela rushes to your side, her hand hovering over your shoulder, uncertain if touching you is safe. "What did you see?" she asks, her voice tight with a mixture of concern and awe. The air around you feels different now, charged with a new, focused intensity.
You look up, your eyes no longer holding the uncertainty of a man with no past. They are the eyes of Kaelen, the shield against the Consuming Dark. You have the knowledge. You have the theory. Now, you need the practice.
“I can’t believe we’re pulling a Balance Arc!”
A faint, wry smile touches your lips, a flash of the man you've been for the past few weeks cutting through the ancient weight of your reclaimed identity. You look up from the floor, not at your companions, but into the middle distance, as if seeing the cosmic architecture of the story you're all trapped in.
You push yourself to your feet, the weariness in your bones overcome by a startling new clarity.
"I have my memories," you say, your voice quiet but resonating with a certainty that makes Lin take a half-step back. "My Master... Leona. She showed me everything. What this place was. What they did to me."
Your gaze falls on Vela, and for the first time, you can truly articulate the nature of your power to her. "It's not a void. It's... peace. A perfect, weaponized peace." You then turn to Jocian. "And I know what I have to do."
Jocian nods slowly, a profound relief washing over her ancient features. "The path is clear, then."
Vela, however, crosses her arms, her expression a mask of sharp pragmatism. "Balance?" she scoffs softly, cutting through the serene atmosphere. "The Jedi sought balance and their temples burned. The Sith seek power and they rule a thousand worlds. Do not mistake a philosophy for a strategy."
"This time, it is the strategy," you counter, your voice firm. "The Chimera can't be fought with power. It feeds on it. It has to be... pacified. Starved. And I'm the only one who can do it."
Before Vela can argue the point, Jocian speaks, her voice cutting through the tension. "Your friend is wise, Kaelen. A shield is not enough. The holocron holds the theory. But theory must be forged into skill through practice. You must learn not just to be a sanctuary, but to wield it."
She gestures toward the hidden chamber. "The Enclave has training grounds. Sparring circles, meditation chambers, places designed to focus the mind and the Force. They are buried, but they are here. The holocron can guide you."
Lin, ever the practical one, chimes in. "That's great, but Vesper isn't going to wait for us to finish a training montage. And we still have a 'flock' of locals hiding in the bushes to deal with."
He's right. You have the knowledge and the location, but time is your enemy. Vesper is hunting. The Chimera is a ticking time bomb. And you have a responsibility to the frightened people living in the shadow of these ruins.
You look past the holocron, past the promise of your own power, and focus on the immediate, tangible reality. The frightened sparks you felt in the Force. The faces peeking from the shadows.
"Jocian," you say, your voice firm, anchoring everyone to the present. "Tell me about the people outside. We need to secure this location before I can begin any training."
Jocian’s ancient eyes soften with approval. It is a leader's choice—to see to the welfare of the people before the needs of the self.
"They are the Forgotten," she says, her voice carrying the weight of generations. "Descendants of refugees who fled the wars, both old and new. They stumbled upon this valley, a place untouched by the galaxy's madness, and they stayed. I have been their Keeper, their guardian. They know the ruins as a sacred, haunted place. They know me only as the old woman who keeps the silence."
She walks slowly toward the massive, open doorway, gazing out into the lush greenery. "They are simple folk, Kaelen. They live by the rhythm of the sun and the seasons. They fear the sky. They fear ships. They fear weapons."
Her expression darkens. "A few years ago, an Sith Imperial patrol strayed from its course and found this valley. I used the enclave's old sonic emitters to create the illusion of ghosts, and they fled in terror. But not before they took three of our young ones for questioning." Her voice cracks, just for a moment. "They never returned. Your arrival—in a stealth ship, armed, with a former Sith at your side—has reopened that wound. They are not hiding from you. They are hiding from the pain they believe you will bring."
Lin shifts uncomfortably by the door, his hand moving away from his blaster as if it suddenly weighs a thousand kilos. Vela remains silent, her face unreadable, but you can feel her mind processing the new tactical and social complexity. You have not found an empty training ground; you have walked into a fragile, traumatized community.
"They are the true heart of this sanctuary," Jocian finishes, turning back to you. "They know every path, every cave, every secret of this valley. They could be powerful allies. But their trust must be earned, not demanded. How they see you will determine the fate of this place."
You stand in the ancient Jedi hall, a reclaimed past in your mind and a fragile future waiting just outside the door. Your first act as Kaelen will define you to these people—as another threat from the sky, or as the guardian this valley has been waiting for.
Your decision is made, a line drawn in the dust of the ancient temple. You face your companions, your expression leaving no room for debate.
"Unfortunately, we do not have time to wait for them to come around," you state, your voice calm but firm. "I believe I can show them my intention, and they will help us."
Jocian gives a slow, solemn nod. "A bold path, Kaelen. To offer trust is the quickest way to earn it. But be warned, they will feel your intention, but they will also see the shadows you cast." Her ancient eyes flicker toward Vela.
"This is sentimental folly," Vela snaps, stepping forward. Her voice is a low, dangerous hiss. "Walking into a den of frightened, cornered people unarmed? You're not an icon; you're a target. Their fear will make them reckless. Let me clear a path. A demonstration of power is a language everyone understands."
Instead of arguing, you unclip the blaster pistol from your thigh. You turn to Lin, who is watching the exchange with wide, nervous eyes, and hold it out to him.
"Hold this for me."
The command is quiet, but absolute. Lin takes the weapon with fumbling hands. Vela falls silent, her jaw tight. She recognizes the move for what it is: not a rejection of her counsel, but a statement of your own way. You will not win this sanctuary through fear.
With a final nod to them, you turn and walk out of the temple's shadow and into the sun-drenched courtyard.
The air immediately feels different. The sounds of the jungle seem to quieten. You feel the weight of dozens of unseen eyes upon you. You walk slowly, deliberately, into the center of the largest clearing, your hands open and visible at your sides. You are completely vulnerable.
A figure emerges from the deep shadows of a crumbled archway. A man, weathered and tough, with suspicion carved into the lines of his face. He holds a long, fire-hardened spear tipped with jagged obsidian. More figures melt from the trees behind him, armed with crude bows and slings.
"You are from the sky," the man says, his voice a low growl. "Sky-people bring only pain and take what is not theirs."
You stop, meeting his gaze without aggression. "My name is Kaelen," you say, your voice carrying easily across the clearing. "And I have taken nothing. I have come home."
The man scoffs. "This is no home for sky-people. This is our sanctuary."
"It was my sanctuary first," you reply gently. "Before I was stolen from it. I have returned because a great darkness is coming. A darkness that will consume this valley and everything in it if we do not stand against it."
"More words," the man spits, gripping his spear tighter. "We have heard promises from the sky before. They always end in fire."
You see the fear in his eyes, the intractable pain of his people's past. Words are not enough. You need to show him.
You close your eyes.
You reach inward, not for a weapon, but for your very essence. You let the Sanctuary Field expand, not as a tight, defensive shield, but as a gentle, rolling wave of pure tranquility. It washes over the courtyard.
The effect is instantaneous.
The tense chirping of insects falls silent. The rustle of wind in the leaves seems to sigh into stillness. The man with the spear gasps, his knuckles, white with tension, suddenly loosening. The archers behind him lower their bows, not by command, but by instinct, their faces filled with confusion and awe. The overwhelming feeling of fear and aggression that had saturated the air simply... dissolves. It is replaced by a profound, unnatural calm. They are still afraid, but the edge is gone, the impulse to violence pacified.
You open your eyes. The man is staring at you, his spear tip now pointed at the ground.
"What... what is this?" he stammers, his tough exterior cracked. "What are you?"
"I am the Keeper of this sanctuary," you say softly. "And I have come back to protect it."
The man—their leader—stares at you for a long moment, then slowly, deliberately, he plants the butt of his spear into the earth. It is a sign of truce.
"I am Roric," he says, his voice thick with emotion. "The elders will want to speak with you."
You give a decisive nod to Roric, acknowledging his offer and the truce it represents. "I need to handle this now so I can focus. An alliance must be built on trust, and trust is built face-to-face."
You turn slightly, raising your voice just enough for it to carry back to the temple entrance where your companions wait. "Vela, Lin. Wait here. Secure the temple."
Vela's posture is rigid, a silent protest against the tactical insanity of walking away with a band of strangers. But she doesn't argue. She understands this is a test you must face alone. Lin simply gives a short, nervous wave of acknowledgment.
"Lead the way, Roric," you say.
Roric grunts in affirmation and turns, leading you away from the temple courtyard. The other Forgotten fall in around you, their weapons still in hand but no longer pointed at you. They keep their distance, their faces a mixture of suspicion, awe, and a cautious, budding hope. They walk in silence, their footsteps soft on the ancient stones.
They lead you through winding paths you never would have found on your own, to a part of the ruins that has been cleverly repurposed into a living settlement. Huts woven from jungle reeds and scavenged metal are nestled into the hollows of crumbled buildings. The scent of woodsmoke and roasting meat fills the air. Children, who had been hiding, now peek out from doorways, their wide eyes following your every move.
Your destination is the largest dwelling, built into the base of what was once a grand library. Inside, gathered around a low, crackling fire, sit three elders. An old, scarred hunter with one eye; a woman weaving a complex tapestry of stellar constellations; and the one who sits in the center, a woman whose face is a roadmap of wrinkles and whose eyes seem to hold the memory of every hardship her people have endured. She is Elara, their matriarch.
Roric explains what happened in the courtyard, his voice rough but honest. "...he did not fight. He brought a silence. The anger... it was just gone."
Elara’s ancient eyes study you, seeming to pierce through flesh and bone to the very core of your being. "We have seen the Sanctuary's power before," she says, her voice raspy with age. "The Keeper, Jocian, has used it to shield us from lost beasts and frightened fools. But never has one worn it like armor and walked among us. Why have you come home now, Kaelen of the Enclave?"
"A great darkness is coming," you reply, your voice echoing slightly in the chamber. "It is called the Chimera. It feeds on life, on the Force itself. It will be drawn here, to the power of this place. I came back to learn how to stop it, and to protect this valley from being its first meal."
The one-eyed hunter scoffs. "We have hidden from the galaxy's wars for generations. You will make us a target."
"You are already a target," you counter calmly. "You simply don't know it yet. I am not asking you to fight. I am asking for your help. For your eyes and your knowledge. I need to train, to prepare. While I do, I need to know this valley is secure."
Elara is silent for a long time, her gaze distant. Finally, she speaks. "You wish to use the lower chambers of the temple. The 'Halls of Echoes.' Our people do not go there. The air is cold, and the stones whisper of the great dying. But we know the ways in. Hidden ways, not through the main halls."
She looks at Roric. "Roric will show you the passages. His hunters will watch the borders of the valley. They will report to you if the sky bleeds or the ground shakes. We will give you your time to prepare, Kaelen-Protector."
She has given you her trust, and with it, a title.
"In return," she adds, her gaze hardening, "you will not fail. You will not allow the fire from the sky to touch our homes again."
"You have my word," you say, bowing your head in respect.
The pact is sealed. You have an alliance. You have secured your base of operations. And you have gained access to hidden knowledge of the Enclave that will be vital for your training. Now, with the valley watched over by its own people, you are finally free to focus on the true task at hand.
You return to the temple to find Vela and Lin waiting, the tension on their faces immediately replaced by curiosity.
"They've agreed to help," you inform them. "We're secure. Which means our work can begin."
You turn and walk toward the hidden chamber where the holocron waits, a new, focused fire in your eyes. "Jocian. Vela. It's time to go to school."
The air in the hidden chambers of the Dantana Enclave is still and heavy with the scent of ancient stone, damp earth, and the faint, sweet perfume of the alien blossoms that have forced their way through cracks in the domed ceiling. Sunlight filters down in hazy shafts, illuminating motes of dust that have been undisturbed for generations. The chamber is circular, its walls carved with flowing script that seems to absorb the light, and in the center rests a single, raised dais of pale, seamless stone.
Lin lets out a low whistle, his eyes scanning the ceiling. "The structural integrity here is... improbable," he murmurs, his voice a little too loud in the profound silence. He pulls a datapad from his jumpsuit, its modern glow a stark contrast to the ancient surroundings. "Power readings are dormant, but the conduits aren't dead. Just... sleeping."
Vela stands with her arms crossed, a wary stillness about her. She is a predator in a place not built for her kind, and she knows it. Her gaze sweeps the chamber not with a slicer's curiosity, but with a duelist's assessment of angles, exits, and threats. "This place feels quiet," she says, her voice low. "Too quiet. The Force is... thin. Muted." She looks at you, a flicker of understanding in her intense eyes. It's not the place itself; it's you. Your mere presence is already beginning to pacify the ambient energy here.
On the central dais, untouched by the encroaching vines and dust, sits the holocron Jocian gave you. The intricate metal framework of the Jedi artifact seems to hum with a potential energy, waiting for the right hand, the right mind, to unlock the secrets of your past and the key to your future. This is the legacy of your Master, Leona. This is where your training begins.
The Forgotten are keeping watch over the valley. The Nightfall is hidden. Inquisitor Vesper is out there, hunting, but for this moment, in this deep place, you are safe. You have a sanctuary.
With Vela's sharp vigilance and Lin's technical oversight as your support, you stand before the legacy of the Jedi you were meant to be. The path to controlling the Sanctuary Field and confronting the Chimera lies before you.
You turn away from the dais, your gaze finding Vela. She watches you, her expression unreadable but for the focused intensity in her eyes. "Before I begin," you say, your voice echoing slightly in the chamber, "what's your counsel? You've studied power your whole life. How would you approach this?"
Vela pushes off the wall she was leaning against, her movements economical and precise. She circles the central dais slowly, her eyes on the holocron, not you. "The Sith would have broken you," she says bluntly. "They would have subjected you to pain, fear, and rage until this 'Sanctuary Field' manifested as a survival instinct. They would have made it a weapon of raw power."
She stops and finally meets your eyes. "That is not your path. And I am... beginning to understand that there is strength in that." A rare admission. "My counsel is this: Forget the Jedi mysticism for a moment. Treat it like any other asset. You need to know its limits. How far does the effect reach? Can you sustain it for a minute? An hour? What does it cost you? Does it exhaust you? Can you shape it, or is it just a bubble? Right now, it is an uncontrolled anomaly. You need to make it a tool."
She nods toward the holocron. "This artifact... this ghost... is your only manual. Use it. But do not let its dogma blind you to the practical realities of what this power can do. Learn the theory, but then you must practice. Test it. Break it. Master it."
Lin, looking up from his datapad, adds, "I can monitor the ambient energy fields. And your biometrics. We can get quantifiable data. See what the toll on your body is. We'll know your limits, not just feel them."
Their advice grounds you. Vela’s pragmatism and Lin's logic are the perfect counterweights to the esoteric task ahead. You nod, accepting their counsel, and turn back to the dais. The path is clear: learn, then test.
You step onto the raised stone platform. The air grows stiller, the silence more profound as your innate ability pacifies the very air around you. You extend your hand over the Jedi holocron. You don't try to command it with the Force; that feels wrong. Instead, you quiet your mind, extending the same sense of peace and balance that you now know is the core of your ability. You aren't pushing, you are inviting.
The holocron responds. Seams of light trace its edges, and it levitates silently, rotating until it opens like a blooming mechanical flower. A soft, blue-white light spills out, and from it coalesces the image of a woman. She is older, with kind eyes and serene features, dressed in the simple robes of a Jedi Master. It is Master Leona, a memory now given form.
Her voice is not an echo from the past, but clear and present, filled with a gentle warmth that pushes back against the chamber's cold stone. "Kaelen. If you are seeing this, then you have found your way back not just to this place, but to yourself. I am sorry for the path you have walked. But know that your journey was not without purpose."
She gestures to the space around you. "The ability you possess, the Sanctuary Field... it is not a weapon. It is not a void or a nullifier, as the Sith believe. Do not think of it as taking something away. That is their way. You give. You create a space of perfect equilibrium, of absolute balance, where the Force can exist in its purest state—unpushed, unpulled, at peace. Those who try to wield it, to dominate it, find their connection severed because the very concept is antithetical to the harmony you create."
The image of Master Leona gestures toward the center of the room. "Your first lesson is to understand this principle. Reach out. Feel the chamber around you. Do not try to impose your will upon it. Simply expand that sense of quiet balance within you. Let it fill the space. For now, we will not worry about range or duration. We will only focus on the feeling. The perfect, silent peace. Show me."
You close your eyes, taking a deep, centering breath. The advice of your allies echoes in your mind—Vela’s pragmatic demand for measurable limits, Lin’s offer of data—but it is the gentle instruction of Master Leona that guides you now. You don't search for a well of power to draw from or a muscle to flex. Instead, you find the quiet, still center within yourself, the core of balance that Jocian helped you rediscover.
You let it go.
It isn't a push, but a release. An exhale of the soul. The feeling of perfect, silent peace uncoils from you, not like a shockwave, but like ink dropped in water. It flows outward, soundlessly, effortlessly. The faint hum of dormant machinery in the walls ceases. The subtle, ancient echoes of the Force that permeated the stone vanish. The air itself seems to grow perfectly still.
Vela stiffens. Her eyes, wide with a flicker of disbelief, dart around the chamber. You can see the shift in her posture as the background noise of the universe she has always felt is suddenly, utterly gone. For a Force-sensitive like her, it must be like plunging into a sensory deprivation tank. Her connection to the energy that has defined her life is severed. She doesn't look afraid, but she looks profoundly unsettled, like a mariner who has suddenly found the sea turned to glass.
"Kaelen..." Lin's voice is a hushed whisper, full of awe. He stares at his datapad, one hand braced against the wall as if for balance. "The readings... they're not just low, they're gone. Ambient energy, thermal drift, even the background radiation I was compensating for... it's all been neutralized. It's a perfect flatline. You've created... a zone of absolute energetic calm. It's... theoretically impossible."
The Sanctuary Field fills the circular chamber completely, its invisible edge pressing against the ancient stone walls. The motes of dust illuminated in the sunbeams hang suspended, motionless. There is no menace here, no aggression. There is only a profound and all-encompassing peace.
The hologram of Master Leona watches you, a serene smile gracing her features. "Excellent, Kaelen," she says, her voice the only thing that seems to move in the stillness. "You feel it, don't you? It is not emptiness. It is harmony. A state so pure that those who would twist the Force to their will cannot touch it. This is your gift. Not a nullifier's curse, but a guardian's shield."
Slowly, consciously, you draw the feeling back into yourself. It recedes without resistance, and the world rushes back in. The low hum returns to Lin's datapad. Vela visibly relaxes, taking a slow breath as her connection to the Force reasserts itself. A wave of exhaustion washes over you, not the ache of physical exertion, but the deep, mental drain of profound concentration.
"That," Vela says, her voice steady but laced with a new respect, "is a weapon more potent than any lightsaber."
Master Leona's form remains steady. "She sees its potential for conflict," the hologram says gently, "but you must see its potential for protection. Now that you understand its nature, you must learn to control its form. The next step is to shape it. To draw it close until it is a shield that covers only you, a cloak of peace in a galaxy of conflict. This requires focus. It requires discipline."
The hologram gestures to you. "Are you ready to try, or do you need to recover? Your body has limits, even if your spirit does not."
You take a steadying breath, the phantom weight of the exertion still pressing on you. Your gaze shifts from the serene hologram to Lin, who is peering at his datapad, his expression a mixture of intense focus and sheer disbelief.
"Lin? What's the cost?" you ask, your voice a little strained.
He looks up, his eyes wide. "Cost is the right word," he says, tapping the screen. "Your heart rate and metabolic output spiked to combat levels the moment you drew the field back in. Neural activity was off the charts. From a purely physiological standpoint, you just ran a marathon and took a final exam at the same time. You're stable now... but my god, Kaelen, it's drawing on you. You're safe to continue, but that was not a 'free' action. Vela's right—we need to find the limits before you break something."
Vela watches you, her arms crossed. There's a new light in her eyes—not just respect, but a deep, analytical curiosity. She sees a power she cannot comprehend, and it both unnerves and fascinates her.
Heeding Lin's warning but steeling yourself against the fatigue, you turn back to the ethereal form of your master. "I'm ready," you state, your voice firm.
Master Leona nods, her expression one of gentle approval. "Prudence is a form of strength. Very well. The second lesson is control. A shield that protects a valley is a marvel, but a shield that protects only you is a tool you can carry into the heart of any darkness."
Her image seems to focus, her instruction becoming more precise. "Do not push outward. This time, I want you to release the field, but hold it. Contain it. Picture it not as a wave, but as a mantle. A cloak of peace that settles over you and you alone. It should be a second skin of absolute harmony. Others should be able to stand a hand's breadth away and still feel the Force in its entirety. This is not about power. It is about precision. Begin when you are ready."
You close your eyes and find that quiet center once more. You let the tranquility bloom, but this time, you fight the instinct to let it expand. You pull, mentally wrestling with an energy that has no mass, no form. It's like trying to shape smoke with your hands.
You feel the field manifest, a razor-thin shell of utter calm. Lin's datapad will show it—a null-space extending inches from your body, and no further. But holding it there is agonizing. It requires every ounce of your concentration. The edges flicker, the perfect harmony threatening to unravel under the strain. You feel a profound mental friction, as if your will is the only thing preventing this pocket of peace from dissipating into the universe.
The exhaustion returns, a hundred times stronger than before. Your muscles tremble, not from physical effort, but from the sheer mental load. Master Leona's voice cuts through your focus, calm and unwavering.
"Breathe, Kaelen. Do not fight it. Coax it. It is not an enemy to be subdued. It is a part of you to be guided. Release your tension. Let the shape hold itself."
You are at a crossroads. The strain is becoming unbearable. You feel your control slipping.
You obey. The instinct to fight, to clench your will around the energy, is strong. It's the way of the galaxy you've come to know—a place of struggle where control is taken, not given. But Leona's voice, a memory of a life you barely recall, cuts through that noise with a simple truth.
You let go.
You release the mental grip, stop trying to force the shape, and surrender your intention. For a terrifying second, you feel the field begin to dissipate, the edges fraying. But then, something shifts. The power, no longer being wrestled into submission, responds to your surrender. It doesn't vanish. It settles.
The agonizing strain in your mind evaporates, replaced by a profound sense of ease. The field coalesces, drawing inward until it fits you perfectly, a seamless mantle of utter tranquility that extends no more than a few inches from your skin. It is no longer something you are holding; it is something you are. It requires no effort. It simply exists, in harmony with you.
Vela takes a hesitant step forward, then another. Her eyes are wide with disbelief. She stops just beyond arm's reach of you, her head tilted. "It's... gone," she breathes, not talking about you, but the field. She can stand this close and the Force is still with her, a raging sea just inches from a shore of perfect calm. She slowly raises a hand, not to touch you, but to feel the boundary. You see her knuckles whiten as she feels her connection to the Force simply cease at an invisible, definite line in space. She pulls her hand back as if burned.
"He did it," Lin whispers, staring at his datapad. "The field is stable. The boundary is sharp as a laser, and your biometrics... Kaelen, they're at resting levels. It's not draining you anymore. It's... a part of your baseline."
The hologram of Master Leona beams with a warmth that feels real enough to heat the stone chamber. "Yes," she says softly. "You see now. The Sanctuary is not a thing you use; it is a state you inhabit. You do not command peace; you embody it. This is the true control you sought—a shield you can carry without thought, without fatigue, into any storm."
You open your eyes. The world looks the same, but it feels different. You are an island of stillness in the ever-present ocean of the Force.
"You have learned its nature and its form," Leona continues. "Now, you must learn to act from within it. The shield is useless if it makes you a statue. You must live and move within this peace. Walk, Kaelen. Cross the chamber to your friends. Maintain the harmony."
The simple act of walking suddenly feels like a monumental challenge. Can you move your body without disturbing the perfect balance you've just achieved?
You take a breath, but it feels different. It's not the prelude to an action, but the action itself. The thought "I walk" is not a command sent to your limbs, but an intention you release into the state of harmony you now inhabit.
And you move.
The first step is effortless. There is no flicker in the field, no mental strain. The cloak of perfect peace moves with you, a seamless extension of your being. You cross the ancient stone floor, your footsteps the only sound in the chamber. The profound stillness is no longer centered on the dais; it is centered on you.
You walk past Vela. She instinctively takes a half-step back, her eyes tracking you with a mixture of awe and tactical recalculation. She watches a man who has become a living embodiment of a concept she never believed was possible: power without aggression, defense without action. She feels the edge of your Sanctuary Field slide past her, a wave of absolute nothingness that moves as you do.
You stop in front of Lin, who looks from his datapad to you, then back again, his mouth slightly agape. "It's perfect," he breathes, showing you the screen. Your biometric readings are calm, steady. The energy readings for the field are a perfect, mobile sphere of null-energy. "You're not just maintaining the field; the field is maintaining itself around you. You're walking, thinking, acting... and it's having no effect on your vitals. You've created a stable paradox."
The hologram of Master Leona has not moved, but her image seems to convey a deep sense of pride. "You learn quickly, Kaelen, because you are not learning something new; you are remembering what is true to your nature. You can exist within the Sanctuary."
She raises a hand, her ethereal fingers pointing to the holocron, which has settled back onto the central dais. "But existing is not enough. You must be able to affect the world from within your peace. Your final lesson for today is interaction. The field pacifies the Force, but you cannot allow it to pacify you. You must be able to reach through the harmony without shattering it."
Her instruction is simple, yet you feel the weight of its complexity. "Return to the dais. From within your shield of peace, reach out and take the holocron. Do not dismiss the field. Do not let its edges waver. Simply... act."
The implication is clear. If you can't interact with a friendly object, how can you ever hope to face a hostile one? You must prove that this state of being is not a prison of tranquility, but a fortress from which you can still touch the world.
A sense of profound clarity washes over you, silencing the nagging urgency that has been your constant companion since Nar Vathis. The hunt, the danger, the looming threat of the Chimera—it all fades into the background, replaced by an absolute certainty of purpose. This is the path. This is what you were made for, not as a weapon, but as an answer.
You turn, the movement fluid and unthinking. The cloak of peace moves with you, a silent, invisible extension of your will. You walk back toward the central dais, each step sure and steady. Vela and Lin watch, silent observers to a phenomenon that defies their collective experience.
You stop before the dais. The Jedi holocron rests on the pale stone, just beyond the edge of your personal sanctuary. It is an object in the "real" world, subject to the flow of the Force that you have so completely pacified around yourself.
There is no hesitation. You don't brace yourself or focus your will. You simply decide to take it.
You extend your hand. As your arm passes through the invisible boundary of the Sanctuary Field, there is no resistance, no flicker of energy, no ripple in the profound calm. It's as if the field recognizes your own limb as part of the whole, allowing it to pass through the barrier without breaking it. Your fingers close around the cool, intricate metal of the holocron.
You lift it.
The field remains perfect, stable, and effortless. You have reached out from your peace and touched the world without shattering the harmony. You hold the legacy of your master in your hand, having brought it into your shield of tranquility.
"Impossible," Vela whispers, her voice tight with disbelief. "A shield you can just... reach through? That's not a defense. It's a redefinition of space."
Lin lowers his datapad, his face pale. "I saw nothing. No energy transfer. No localized collapse of the field. Kaelen, your arm left the null-zone, interacted with an object, and returned, and the field didn't even register it. It's like you're an exception to your own rule."
The image of Master Leona glows, her smile serene and deeply proud. "You have done it," she says, her voice filling the chamber. "You have remembered the final lesson. Peace is not passive. Harmony is not helplessness. You can exist within the Sanctuary, move within it, and act from within it. You are not a prisoner of your gift, Kaelen. You are its master."
She gestures gracefully with a hand of light. "You have learned all you can today. Rest. Integrate what you have remembered. The initial effort has taxed you, and true mastery requires not just power and control, but wisdom and endurance. We will continue tomorrow."
With a final, warm smile, the hologram of Master Leona dissolves, leaving the holocron in your hand, now just a silent, intricate object. The chamber feels different now—not just a ruin, but a place of rediscovery. A place of hope.
The exertion of the day settles into your bones, a deep but satisfying weariness. Your allies are looking at you, their perspectives on you—and on the nature of power itself—irrevocably altered.
“That was insane.”
Your voice, rough with exhaustion and awe, cuts through the profound silence you carry with you.
Lin lets out a short, hysterical-sounding laugh, running a hand through his already messy hair. "Insane' doesn't even begin to cover it, Kaelen," he says, his voice brimming with a manic, scientific excitement. He brandishes his datapad as if it's proof of a miracle. "The data is nonsensical. It's beautiful. You are actively warping the energetic laws of the universe around you on a whim, and your heart rate is lower than mine. It's the most elegantly impossible thing I've ever witnessed."
Vela, however, doesn't smile. Her expression is one of deadly seriousness, her mind clearly processing the tactical and strategic ramifications. "It's not insane," she corrects, her voice low and intense. "It's a paradigm shift."
She takes a step closer, studying the invisible boundary of your Sanctuary Field with a predator's focus. "An enemy can't fight you if their connection to the Force is gone. A bounty hunter's targeting laser might not even be able to get a lock. Vesper... Inquisitors like her would be rendered helpless." She finally meets your gaze, and for the first time, you see something beyond respect or alliance in her eyes. It's a kind of fearsome reverence. "You aren't just a shield. You're a walking zone of absolute control. The applications are..." she trails off, letting the unspoken possibilities hang in the ancient air.
The deep weariness Master Leona spoke of is settling into your bones now, a profound fatigue of the mind and spirit. The holocron in your hand is cool and solid, a tangible link to a past you are finally reclaiming. The silent, effortless peace of the Sanctuary Field still cloaks you.
With the day's training complete, the quiet chamber awaits your departure. Your allies, their worldviews thoroughly shaken, wait for your lead.
You let the Sanctuary Field dissolve, not with a conscious command, but with a simple release of intent. The silent cloak of peace vanishes, and the ambient sounds and energies of the ancient chamber rush back in. The return to normalcy is jarring, and the full weight of your exhaustion hits you like a physical blow. You lean a hand against the dais to steady yourself, the holocron feeling heavy and dense in your other hand.
"I could use some rest," you say, your voice strained. "How much time do you think we have before we need to plan our next move?"
Lin is the first to answer, already pulling up star charts on his datapad. "Dantana is off the main hyperspace lanes. Vesper lost us when we jumped. Her ship's logs showed she was operating without official Sith Imperial support, so she can't just call in a fleet to blockade the system. She'll have to retrace our steps, which takes time. Conservatively, I'd say we have a standard week before we're at any real risk. We can afford to let you recover."
Vela scoffs, a sharp, derisive sound. "A week? That's a technician's answer." She turns her gaze from Lin to you, her eyes burning with intensity. "You're thinking of logistics. I'm thinking of the mindset of a predator. Vesper is not a standard officer who follows protocol. She is an obsessive, and you are her obsession. She will not retrace; she will anticipate. She knows what we found in her logs. She knows where you came from. She will not be far behind. We have three days, maybe four, before we need to be ready for a fight or gone."
The two opposing timelines hang in the air, both born from sound reasoning. Lin's logic offers the comfort of time for you to train and recover; Vela's instinct warns of a rapidly closing net.
Lin seems to sense the conflict. "Look, Vela's right that we can't get complacent," he concedes, his tone softening. "But Kaelen's no use to us if he collapses from exhaustion. He just rewrote physics. That's gotta take a toll." He gestures toward the chamber's exit. "Let's get back to the Nightfall. We can eat something that isn't a ration bar, get some proper sleep in real bunks. We can make a plan tomorrow, with clear heads."
Your body aches for the rest Lin describes, but Vela's urgency echoes the fear you've lived with for weeks. The choice between preparation and recuperation is yours.
“We need to take advantage of the time we have ourselves, and take risks. I will rest while we prepare. And either way, the longer we are here, the more danger these people are in. While I rest, we locate the Vehement and think up a way to draw Vesper there. I have some ideas on what to do next, but I need to meditate on them to see the full picture.”
Vela’s sharp features break into a grim, appreciative smile. It’s the first time you’ve seen her look truly pleased since you arrived on Dantana. "Good," she says, her voice a low purr of approval. "A predator does not wait in its den for the hunter to arrive. It sets a snare of its own. The Vehemence... a fitting graveyard for her ambition."
Lin, however, looks like you’ve just asked him to calculate the exact number of stars in the sky. He scrubs a hand over his face, leaving a faint grease smudge on his cheek. "Hold on, back up. 'Locate the Vehemence?' Kaelen, that ship was torn apart. Its destruction was our escape. We’re talking about a debris field millions of kilometers wide, likely picked over by every scavenger crew from here to the Outer Rim. Finding a specific piece of it would be..." He trails off, shaking his head.
"It's not impossible," he continues, his mind already racing through the problem. "But I'd need a starting point. The ship's last known vector before the explosion, its official designation, any Sith Imperial salvage protocols associated with research vessels... Vesper’s logs are our best bet. I can start cross-referencing nav-data, but it’s a long shot."
"Then take the shot," you say, your voice resonating with a newfound authority that silences any further argument. "Vela is right. The longer we are here, the more we endanger Jocian and the Forgotten. We will prepare to leave."
The three of you leave the ancient chamber, the air outside feeling alive and vibrant after the stillness within. The walk back to the Nightfall is quiet, each of you lost in your own thoughts, but moving with a shared, unspoken purpose. You are no longer just fugitives; you are now the architects of a dangerous new plan.
Aboard the sterile, metallic confines of the Nightfall, the exhaustion hits you fully. While Lin heads directly to his console, his fingers already a blur across the keys, and Vela begins a meticulous check of the ship's defensive systems, you find a quiet corner in the small galley.
Closing your eyes, you don't reach for the Sanctuary Field. Instead, you seek the mental quiet behind it. You let your thoughts drift, focusing on the threads of your new plan: The Vehemence. Vesper. The Chimera. You cast your intuition into the flow of the Force, not as a user, but as an observer, seeking the shape of the future.
The vision comes not as a clear picture, but as a series of sharp, resonant feelings and images:
The shattered hulk of the Vehemence, floating in the black, not dead, but dormant. A faint, sickening pulse of dark energy still thrums within its broken frame, a lingering stain of the horrors created there.


Vesper's dagger-like ship arriving, drawn by a beacon you yourselves have lit.


And then, a new feeling. A vast, hungry emptiness turning its attention toward the same point in space. The Chimera. You realize with a jolt of ice-cold certainty that any trap powerful enough to lure Vesper will also act as a dinner bell for the entity you were born to face. It is a complication you hadn't considered.


You are pulled from your meditation by Lin's voice, sharp with excitement. "Kaelen, you need to see this."
You open your eyes and walk to his station. On the screen is a heavily encrypted Sith Imperial file.
"I was scrubbing Vesper’s logs, looking for the Vehemence's flight recorder data," Lin explains, pointing to a string of code. "The ship didn't just explode. It was officially scuttled. And look at this—an Sith Imperial salvage injunction was placed on the wreckage field less than a standard day later. The claim was filed through a shell corporation, but the encryption key is pure Inquisitorius." He looks up at you, his eyes wide. "It was filed by Vesper. She destroyed the ship, then immediately declared the entire debris field off-limits. Why? What is in that wreckage that she didn't want anyone else to find?"
He taps a key, and a prompt appears on the screen: DECRYPT AND ACCESS RESTRICTED FILE? Y/N.
"I think I can get in," Lin says, "but tripping a high-level Sith Imperial security seal like this won't be quiet. Vesper, or at least someone in her network, will know we accessed it. They'll know we're looking for the Vehemence."
The choice is laid bare before you. Do you risk revealing your hand to find out what Vesper is hiding, or do you try to find the wreckage another, slower way, preserving the element of surprise?
You lock eyes with Lin, a silent confirmation passing between you. The risk is immense, but the potential reward—understanding Vesper's true objective—is too great to ignore. "Do it," you say, your voice steady. "This is our path in. Let’s see what she’s hiding."
Vela lets out a sharp breath, her hand resting on the hilt of her lightsaber. "As soon as he breaks that seal, our clock gets shorter. A lot shorter," she warns, not as a deterrent, but as a statement of fact. She moves toward the ship's ramp controls, her focus already shifting to security and immediate departure. "I'll prep the ship for a fast exit."
Lin gives a curt nod, his face illuminated by the glow of his console. "Here we go." His fingers fly across the keys, cascades of amber code scrolling down the screen. He isn't just typing; he's engaged in a duel. You see Sith Imperial counter-intrusion programs flare up—digital walls of fire, data snares, logic bombs—and Lin dances around them, dismantling them with a surgeon's precision. The air crackles with the faint scent of ozone from his overworked console.
"She's good," he mutters, sweat beading on his forehead. "This is layered deep. But she's arrogant. She used a standard Inquisitorius encryption base and just built on top of it. She never thought a slicer from the dregs would get this far."
A final string of code flashes green. A loud ACCESS GRANTED appears on the screen, and the encrypted file resolves into a single, stark document. It's not a salvage claim. It's a covert Inquisitorius field report, authored by Vesper herself.
The header is chilling: PROJECT CHIMERA - ASSET PRESERVATION DIRECTIVE.
Lin's voice is a hushed whisper as he reads. "Oh, gods... The explosion... it was a feint. A distraction." He points to a schematic of the Vehemence. A huge section of the ship, the primary research and containment block, is highlighted in red. "She didn't scuttle the whole ship. Minutes before the main reactor blew, she jettisoned the entire lab block. It was designed to survive atmospheric reentry. It's a self-contained vault."
He scrolls down, his face paling. "The report says the primary asset, the Chimera, entered a 'dormant state' due to the power loss from the main ship. It's not dead. It's... hibernating. The wreckage field is a lie. Vesper didn't file the injunction to protect debris; she filed it to hide a dormant superweapon she couldn't risk moving on her own. She was waiting, planning to go back for it."
He pulls up the final line of the report: a set of coordinates. Not a debris field, but a single, solid object, tumbling silently in a remote asteroid cluster not far from Dantana's system. The location of the Chimera's cage.
A high-pitched alarm suddenly blares from Lin's console. INTRUSION DETECTED. SILENT ALARM TRIGGERED.
"Too late," Lin says, his voice grim as he shuts it off. "She knows. Vesper knows we have the location."
The plan has been turned on its head. You wanted to set a trap for Vesper at the wreckage of the Vehemence. Now you know that she's been planning to return there all along, and the object of her obsession—and yours—is waiting. She knows you're looking, and she will undoubtedly be on her way. The race is on.
“Get us there. We’ll plan on the way. If I am a famine, how long do I need to starve them for us to win?”
"Acknowledged," Lin snaps, his focus absolute. His fingers don't just type; they conduct an orchestra of commands, inputting the coordinates, calculating the optimal hyperspace vector, and routing emergency power to the engines all at once. "Plotting the jump now. It's a rough ride—we'll be skimming two asteroid fields and a gravity well, but it's the fastest path."
"Strap in," Vela barks from the co-pilot's seat, her hands flying over the console. The ship's ramp seals with a heavy thud and a hiss of hydraulics. The Nightfall lurches, its powerful engines kicking in, lifting you from the hidden clearing. Through the viewport, you see the ancient trees of Dantana fall away, then the vibrant green of the planet shrink into a jewel against the black velvet of space.
With a bone-jarring shudder, Lin engages the hyperdrive. The stars outside the cockpit stretch into streaks of brilliant blue-white light, and then you are hurtling through the surreal tunnel of hyperspace.
The cockpit is silent for a moment, the only sound the low thrum of the ship around you. You look from Lin's focused profile to Vela's coiled readiness. "If I am a famine," you say, the words feeling heavy and strange, "how long do I need to starve it for us to win?"
Lin shakes his head, not looking away from his instruments. "I can't even begin to calculate that."
Vela turns her head slightly, her gaze piercing. "As long as it takes. You will know when it's broken." Her answer is pragmatic, but it's a guess. None of you truly know.
Realizing there is only one source that might have the answer, you pull the holocron from your belt. It feels warm in your hand. You quiet your mind, not with the full power of the Sanctuary, but with the same sense of invitation you used before. The artifact opens, and the serene, blue-white image of Master Leona coalesces beside you in the cramped cockpit.
She looks at you, her expression knowing, as if she heard your question before you even asked.
"You ask how long, Kaelen," her voice is calm and clear over the hum of the hyperdrive. "That is the wrong question. A fire does not ask how long it must burn to consume a forest. It burns until there is no fuel left. The Chimera is a being of pure hunger, a void that seeks to consume the Force itself. To 'starve' it is not a matter of time, but of totality."
Her image gestures toward the swirling blue of hyperspace. "It has been dormant, cut off from the energy of the Vehemence's reactors. It is weak, but it has reserves. When it senses you, it will awaken, and it will try to feed. Your Sanctuary Field must be a perfect prison. You must deny it any connection, any sustenance, until its internal reserves are fully depleted and it collapses in on itself, its hunger finally consuming its own essence."
Then, her expression turns grave, and her ethereal eyes meet yours with a powerful warning. "But it will not be a passive wait. The Chimera will fight you. It will feel your peace and see it as an existential threat. It will throw the full force of its rage, its despair, and its bottomless hunger against your mind. It will show you visions, prey on your fears, and try to break your will to shatter the Sanctuary. You must endure not just the strain of maintaining the field, but a direct assault on your soul. How long? You must hold the line until the storm breaks. Not one second less."
The plan is no longer just about deploying your ability. It is a siege, with your mind as the fortress. You are en route to the battlefield, and now you know the terrible nature of the war you are about to fight.
“I’ve put some thought into Vesper. She likes to soften her prey up in advance before moving in. How do we feel about not giving her the chance?”

Vela turns from the co-pilot's console, a slow, dangerous smile spreading across her face. It’s the look of a predator who has just been given permission to hunt. "I feel very good about not giving her the chance," she says, her voice a low, satisfied hum. "We have spent weeks reacting to her. Chasing her shadows. It's time we cast one of our own."
Lin, however, grips his console, his knuckles white. "It's a great idea, Kaelen, but how? We're flying directly to the one place in the galaxy she's been fixated on for months. She chose that hiding spot. She knows its layout, its weaknesses. Going there first isn't an ambush; it's walking into the kill box she prepared for the Chimera and hoping she shoots at it first."
"So we don't let her reach the kill box," Vela counters immediately, her strategic mind firing on all cylinders. "Lin, you said we were skimming asteroid fields. We arrive ahead of her, find a choke point, and go dark. We wait. When her ship comes through, we hit her fast and hard. Disable her weapons, her engines. Leave her crippled before she even knows we're there. We make her the one who is trapped."
"That's a massive gamble," Lin shoots back, his anxiety sharpening his words. "Our ship is good, but we don't know what upgrades Vesper's made. One bad shot, one miscalculation, and we're the ones drifting dead in an asteroid field. If she takes us out, the mission is over. Vesper gets the Chimera, and we get a front-row seat to the end of everything."
The hum of the hyperdrive fills the tense silence. The choice is clear and brutal. Do you risk everything on a high-stakes ambush in the asteroid field, or do you proceed to the lab module and attempt to deal with the Chimera while Vesper bears down on you?
The luminous form of Master Leona offers a quiet, final thought. "Your instinct to seize the initiative is a sign of a true leader, Kaelen. But remember your purpose. Vesper is the wolf at the door. The Chimera is the plague that will consume the house. Be certain that in fighting the wolf, you do not leave the door wide open for the plague to enter."
You close your eyes, the chaotic blue streaks of hyperspace fading from your thoughts. The voices of your crew, the hum of the ship, the ghostly presence of your master—you let it all recede. You reach for that quiet, still center you found in the Enclave, not to build a shield, but to listen.
You ask the Force for guidance.
There is no voice, no clear vision. There are only two powerful, competing currents you can feel in the flow of what's to come.
The first path feels sharp, violent, and immediate. It is the ambush. It presents itself as a flash of jagged metal against the black, the silent scream of a crippled engine, the cold satisfaction of a successful hunt. It is a path of high risk and high reward, a blade's edge that promises a swift victory or a catastrophic, final defeat. It is the way of the predator, the path Vela champions.


The second path feels heavy, oppressive, and inevitable. It is the direct approach to the lab module. It carries the weight of a siege, the feeling of being caught between two crushing forces—Vesper’s cold, analytical fury closing in from behind, and the Chimera's raw, psychic hunger awakening before you. This path is one of endurance, a desperate defense where survival is the only victory. It is the way of the guardian, the path Master Leona’s teachings prepared you for.


The Force does not tell you which path to take. It only shows you the nature of the choice: the swift, uncertain blade, or the heavy, besieged shield.
You open your eyes, the guidance settled within you. You weigh the options, not just as a commander, but as the man you are now.
Lin is right; the ambush is a colossal gamble. If your ship is destroyed, the Chimera is lost to Vesper, and the galaxy pays the price for your failure. It is an unacceptable risk.
But Master Leona’s warning gives you another perspective. In fighting the wolf, do not leave the door open for the plague. Vesper knows you have the coordinates. She chose that hiding place. She will not arrive unprepared. To go directly to the lab module is to knowingly walk into a trap she has had months to prepare. Fighting the Chimera is the goal, but you cannot face it if Vesper cripples you from behind the moment you arrive.
Vela’s logic, born from the ruthless creed of the Sith, is the key. You cannot afford to be the prey. You cannot react. You must act. The risk of the ambush is immense, but the risk of letting Vesper dictate the terms of the engagement is a certainty of failure.
Your path is clear. It is not about choosing between the blade and the shield. It is about using the blade to protect the shield.
You look at Vela, then at Lin, your decision solidifying into resolve.
"Vela, you're right. We seize the initiative. Find us a choke point in that asteroid field."
Then you turn to Lin, meeting his worried gaze with unwavering confidence. "And you, Lin... get us there without making a sound. We're going hunting."
The tense silence in the cockpit is broken by a single, sharp nod from Lin. "I'll find you a coffin for her ship," he says, his earlier anxiety burned away and replaced by the cold fire of a professional with an impossible task. His fingers become a blur, coaxing the Nightfall through the chaotic blue-white tunnel of hyperspace with a new, predatory grace. He is no longer just a pilot; he is a hunter stalking his prey through a forest of light.
Vela's smile widens. She leans back in her seat, a picture of lethal calm. "Let him. I'll load the gun." She begins methodically diverting power from non-essential systems—life support, secondary lighting, inertial dampeners—and shunting it all to the forward laser cannons and the ship's stealth systems. The Nightfall grows colder, darker, and less stable, the ride becoming rougher as she sacrifices comfort for killing power.
The ethereal form of Master Leona watches this exchange, her expression unreadable. She offers no further counsel, leaving you to the path you have chosen.
Minutes that feel like hours stretch on. Finally, the ship lurches violently as it drops out of hyperspace. The viewport is filled with a breathtaking, terrifying vista: a dense field of asteroids, ranging from the size of a fist to the size of a small moon, tumbling silently in the black. This is the graveyard Lin promised.
"We're here," Lin announces, his voice low and focused. "Ahead of schedule. I'm taking us into the shadow of that big one." He gestures to a massive, pockmarked rock that eclipses the distant stars. The Nightfall, now running on minimal power, glides into the asteroid's immense shadow, its matte-black hull making it indistinguishable from the darkness. Lin kills the engines completely. The silence is absolute, broken only by the sound of your own breathing.
"We're a ghost," Vela murmurs, her eyes scanning the tactical display. "Sensors are passive. Weapons are charged. The moment she enters this channel, she'll be perfectly framed."
You are the calm at the center of this storm. While your crew prepares the ambush, your task is to prepare yourself. You close your eyes, finding that inner sanctuary. You don't project the field, but you hold it within you, a reservoir of quiet strength ready to be unleashed. You are the hidden weapon, the ace in the hole.
Time stretches into an agonizing wait. Every flicker on the console, every creak of the ship's hull in the cold, makes you tense. Finally, Lin whispers one word.
"Contact."
A single, hostile signature appears on the edge of the sensor display. It is dagger-shaped, moving fast and recklessly, making no attempt at stealth. Vesper. She believes she is the hunter, racing to her prize. She flies directly into the narrow channel between the asteroids, just as Vela predicted.
"She's in the kill box," Vela says, her voice devoid of all emotion save for a cold, sharp focus. Her hand hovers over the weapons console. "On your command, Kaelen."
Vesper's ship is exposed. Your trap is set. The wolf has walked into your snare.
You give the order, your voice cutting through the absolute silence of the cockpit. "Strike."
Vela's hand slams down on the console.
The Nightfall roars to life. Power surges from the capacitors, and the forward laser cannons, glowing with overcharged energy, unleash a searing volley of crimson bolts. The blasts lance across the void, silent and instantaneous.
Vesper is fast, but she was arrogant. Her ship's shields flare brilliant green as the first shots hit, but they were configured for a standard journey, not a point-blank ambush. The overcharged bolts tear through them like paper.
Sparks fly from Vela's console as Vesper's ship, alerted and wounded, tries to return fire. But Vela is already a step ahead. "She's targeting our engines," she snarls, her fingers dancing across the controls, rerouting power. "Too slow."
Another volley from the Nightfall screams through the darkness. This time, Vela isn't aiming for the shields. Her shots are precise, tactical, and utterly ruthless. One blast vaporizes the starboard engine nacelle of Vesper's ship. Another slams into the primary weapon emitter, silencing it permanently.
The enemy vessel, crippled and venting plasma into the void, begins to tumble, its momentum carrying it deeper into the asteroid field. It is a wounded animal, no longer a threat.
"Engines are gone. Main weapons are offline," Lin reports, his voice tight with a mixture of terror and triumph. "She's dead in the water. We did it. We actually did it."
Vela leans back, a single bead of sweat tracing a line down her temple. Her work is done. The ambush was perfect. "She's not going anywhere," she says with grim finality. "The hunt is over."
But as you look at the crippled ship tumbling through the silent rocks, you know she's wrong. The hunt isn't over. It has just entered a new, more dangerous phase. Vesper is trapped, yes, but she is still alive. And you are now adrift in a shooting gallery with a furious, cornered Inquisitor, just a short distance from the dormant horror of the Chimera.
The wolf is caged. But the plague still waits.
Vela gives you a sharp, approving look. "No loose ends. The Sith way."
Lin, however, hesitates, his hands hovering over the console. "Kaelen, are you sure? Opening a channel is... an invitation. A wounded animal is most dangerous when cornered."
"He's right," Vela adds, her approval turning to caution. "Talking gives her time to think. Time to act."
You meet their gazes, your resolve unshakeable. "And we won't give her that time. We end this now, on our terms. Open the channel, Lin."
With a grim nod, Lin complies. He taps a few commands into his console, and a burst of static crackles through the cockpit speakers before settling into a low hum. The channel is open.
You lean forward, your voice calm but carrying the cold weight of absolute authority. "Vesper! It's over!"
For a long moment, there is only the hiss of the open comm. The silence stretches, taut and suspenseful. Then, a sound crackles to life—not a voice of panic or surrender, but a dry, mocking laugh, laced with static and pure, undiluted hatred.
"Over?" Vesper's voice is a shard of ice. "You had a clean kill shot, anomaly. You could have ended me without a word. But you stopped. You hesitated. You chose to talk."
The laughter dies, replaced by a tone of chilling, analytical contempt. "That is your flaw. That is the Jedi sentimentality that has infected you. You think this is a victory. This is a tactical error."
A loud metallic clang echoes from her end of the comm, followed by the hiss of failing life support. She's moving, working, not waiting.
"So what now, Kaelen?" she taunts, her voice growing colder, more distant, as if she's moving away from the comm panel. "You have two choices. You can come over here and finish the job, face to face. Or you can race to the prize you've been so desperate to find. But you don't have time for both. The wolf is caged, yes. But I promise you, she still has her teeth."
The line goes dead.
Silence reigns in the cockpit of the Nightfall. Vesper has laid the choice bare. You can proceed to the Chimera, leaving a wounded, brilliant, and utterly furious Inquisitor at your back, free to repair her ship or set one final trap. Or you can commit to finishing her now, boarding her crippled vessel for a final, brutal confrontation, knowing that every second you waste is a second the Chimera remains unguarded.
You direct the question to Lin, your tone flat and pragmatic. "Can we not just blow her ship up, Lin?"
Lin's head snaps up from his console, his expression torn. "Technically, yes," he says, his voice strained. "The ship's reactor core is exposed. A sustained barrage from our cannons would undoubtedly trigger a catastrophic failure. She'd be vaporized."
He hesitates, gesturing with a trembling hand toward the viewport, at the silent, tumbling asteroids. "But look where we are. We're in a tight navigational channel. A ship-sized explosion here, in an enclosed space full of rock, would be... suicide. It would create a storm of high-velocity shrapnel—thousands of pieces of hull plating, superstructure, and rock fragments moving at impossible speeds. We'd never be able to navigate it to get to the lab module. We might not even survive the initial blast wave."
Vela nods in grim agreement, her earlier bloodlust tempered by cold logic. "He's right. It's a clean kill, but we'd be trading her trap for one of our own making. We would be caged in this sector, cut off from our objective just as surely as if she'd disabled us herself."
You have successfully caged the wolf, but blowing up the cage would bring the whole mountain down on top of you.
Vesper's ultimatum hangs in the cold, silent air of the cockpit, now heavier than ever. You can't destroy her from a distance without jeopardizing the entire mission. You can't leave her, knowing she is brilliant, furious, and actively working against you. That leaves only the option she taunted you with.
You look away from the viewport showing Vesper's crippled ship, your decision made. "Her obsession will be her undoing," you state, your voice cutting with a cold certainty that surprises even yourself. "We need to deal with the Chimera."
Lin visibly relaxes, his shoulders slumping with relief. "Agreed. The primary objective. Getting us to it now." He immediately turns his full attention to his console, his hands flying as he plots a careful, deliberate course out of the asteroid channel, navigating around the potential debris field they nearly created.
Vela, however, doesn't move. Her gaze remains fixed on the tactical display showing the enemy ship's icon, a flicker of profound unease in her eyes. "This is a mistake," she says, her voice low and tight. It's not insubordination; it's the deeply ingrained doctrine of her entire life warring with your command. "We have crippled her. We should be boarding her ship to cut the head from the snake. Leaving her alive is a weakness she will exploit."
"It's a gamble," you concede, turning to face her. "But her ship is crippled, and she believes her prize is still unguarded. She'll focus on repairs, on surviving. Her obsession will chain her here. That's the time we need."
Vela holds your gaze for a long moment, searching for any hint of doubt. Finding none, she gives a single, sharp nod. The debate is over. She turns back to her console, her posture once again that of a loyal subordinate, but her tension is a palpable force in the small cockpit.
With painstaking care, Lin guides the Nightfall out of the narrow channel. The engines hum softly as you slip away, leaving Vesper's ship tumbling silently in the dark. The gamble has been made.
The journey to the lab module's coordinates is short and silent. When you arrive, the sight is both awe-inspiring and deeply unsettling.
It's not a piece of wreckage. It's a structure. A colossal block of dark metal, half a kilometer long, designed like a vault. Sith Imperial sigils are scorched onto its hull, and a single, unlit docking bay marks its surface like a scar. The module tumbles slowly, end over end, in the silent void, utterly dead to all sensors save for a faint, almost undetectable power signature.
But you don't need sensors. You can feel it.
It's not a presence in the Force; it's an absence. A void. A psychic black hole that seems to drink the light and warmth from the space around it. It's the dormant, bottomless hunger of the Chimera, and even asleep, it makes the part of you that is the Sanctuary Field recoil in instinctual opposition.
"I've got it," Lin says, his voice hushed. "That's her. Power readings are minimal—just enough for structural integrity and containment. I'm reading one main airlock at the docking bay. Heavily reinforced. No signs of life."
You are here. The objective is before you. Vesper is behind you, wounded but alive. The clock is ticking. You are floating before a cage that holds a monster of unimaginable power, and you are about to knock on the door.
How do I get in? If the ship gets too close, it will feed of the energy, right?

You’re asking the exact right questions. The thought hangs in the cockpit, as heavy and cold as the void outside.
"He's right," Lin says, his voice a low murmur. He's staring at a complex energy schematic on his screen, his expression grim. "The Chimera is dormant because it's starved. The Nightfall's reactor, our life support, even our comms system—it all radiates energy. We get too close, and the ship becomes a banquet. We could wake it up from half a click away, and it would be at full strength before you ever set foot inside."
Vela turns in her seat, her gaze sharp and practical. "Then we don't use the ship," she states simply. "We go dark. A low-orbit insertion, on the far side of the module. We suit up and go across ourselves. An EVA. No ship, no energy signature. Just us."
Lin nods, his mind already working through the logistics of Vela's aggressive plan. "It's our only real option," he confirms. "I can park the Nightfall behind this asteroid, using it as a sensor shadow. That should keep us hidden from Vesper and mask our energy signature from the module. From there, it's a two-hundred-meter spacewalk to the airlock."
He pulls up a detailed schematic of the docking bay. "Here's the problem. The airlock is dead. No power. I can't slice it remotely. You'll have to cut your way in. I can give you a plasma torch from the ship's engineering kit, but it's designed for delicate repairs, not breaching a reinforced Inquisitorius vault door. It will be slow, and you'll be completely exposed while you work."
The plan is laid out, fraught with peril but brutally logical. You must leave the relative safety of the Nightfall and float through the silent void to manually break into a cage holding a psychic monster, all while a wounded Inquisitor is somewhere behind you.
Vela stands up, already moving toward the equipment lockers. "I'm going with you," she says, not as a question, but as a statement of fact. "You'll be focused on the door. You'll need someone to watch your back."
You nod, your decision made. "Suit up," you say, your voice firm. "Let's finish this how we started."
Vela meets your gaze, and a flicker of understanding passes between you. Just the two of you, against impossible odds. It’s a familiar feeling. She gives a curt, decisive nod and turns to the equipment locker, pulling out two sets of dark, vacuum-sealed EVA suits.
The process is methodical and tense. The suits are constricting, the air from the recycler tasting sterile and artificial. Lin stays at his console, his face a mask of concentration as he monitors your comms and the ship’s systems. "Comms are on a closed, tight-beam frequency," he reports, his voice a tinny whisper in your helmet. "Vesper won't hear us, but the transmission power is minimal. Don't stray too far apart."
With a final check, you and Vela cycle through the Nightfall's airlock. The outer door irises open onto the breathtaking, terrifying emptiness of space.
The silence is absolute.
You push off from the ship, magnetic clamps on your boots guiding you. Vela follows a moment later, a plasma torch secured to her belt and a heavy blaster rifle held at the ready. The Nightfall is a ghost behind you, a patch of deeper black against the starfield, hidden in the asteroid's shadow.
Ahead of you, the lab module tumbles slowly, a colossal, silent tomb. Its sheer scale is intimidating. As you drift closer, the feeling intensifies—the psychic void, the gnawing hunger of the sleeping Chimera. It’s a cold spot in the Force, a wound in the fabric of the universe, and you are floating directly towards it.
Vela drifts beside you, her movements economical and precise. Even in the clumsy EVA suit, she moves with a predator's grace. She doesn't speak, her attention focused outward, scanning the void for any sign of Vesper, any threat you haven't anticipated.
After a journey that feels like an eternity, your magnetic boots clamp onto the hull of the lab module with a dull thunk. The metal is freezing cold, even through your suit. You've reached the main airlock. It's a massive, circular hatch, sealed tight, with no lights and no signs of power. It's just a dead slab of reinforced metal between you and the monster inside.
"We're here, Lin," you report, your voice low.
"I see you," his voice crackles back. "No change in the module's energy readings. No sign of Vesper. You're clear, for now. But that torch is going to make a lot of noise on my sensors when you fire it up. Work fast."
Vela takes up a guard position, her rifle pointed back the way you came, watching the silent field of asteroids. "I have your back," she says, her voice a steady presence in the vast emptiness. "Do what you need to do."
You unhitch the plasma torch. The tool feels small and inadequate for the task ahead. You are about to knock on the door of the most dangerous being in the galaxy.
You press the activation stud. The plasma torch sputters to life with a fierce, silent hiss, casting a brilliant blue-white glare that washes out the stars. You press the tip to the reinforced metal of the airlock.
The effect is agonizingly slow. The torch wasn't made for this. It's a surgical tool being used as a sledgehammer. Molten metal glows cherry-red, then white-hot, slagging and bubbling away in microscopic layers. The heat radiates through your suit, a stark contrast to the absolute zero of the void around you. Every second feels like an hour. The only sounds are the hiss of the torch, the ragged sound of your own breathing in your helmet, and the low thrum of your own heartbeat.
As you cut deeper, the psychic void on the other side of the door intensifies. It's no longer a passive absence; it feels like it's being drawn to the heat, to the energy of the torch. A deep, primal cold seeps into your mind, a feeling of ancient hunger stirring in its sleep.
"Kaelen..." Vela's voice is a low warning in your ear. "Stay focused. Don't let it touch you."
You grit your teeth, pushing the thought away, focusing only on the slow, burning line you are carving. The circle is halfway complete when Lin's voice crackles through the comm, sharp with alarm.
"Kaelen, Vela, bad news! I'm reading a focused energy surge from Vesper's ship. It's not the engines, it's... it's her comms array. She's boosting the signal. I think she's trying to send a message."
A cold dread washes over you, more chilling than the Chimera's psychic presence.
"Who would she be talking to?" Vela demands, her rifle swiveling to scan the empty space around you.
"Doesn't matter!" Lin's voice is frantic. "A boosted signal like that is a distress call, a dead man's switch, a flare... anyone with a long-range scanner in this sector just saw it. She's not trying to escape. She's calling for backup. She's burning her own position to burn ours."
The game has changed. Your window of time has slammed shut. Vesper has sacrificed her own secrecy to expose you. Any Sith Imperial patrol, any scavenger crew, any listening post within a dozen parsecs might be on their way.
"You need to get inside, now!" Lin urges.
You are three-quarters of the way through the cut. The slow, careful approach is no longer an option. You can try to force the rest of the cut with a reckless burst of power from the torch, risking it overheating or blowing out, or you can try to pry the damaged door open now and hope the lock is weak enough to break.
Vela looks from you to the half-cut door. "Your call, Kaelen. Fast and loud, or hard and fast?"
(Thank you for the correction. Adjusting for the Old Republic era. Let's reset that moment.)
"It's like you're finally getting to know me," you say, the words tight with grim humor. Even through the helmet's modulator, Vela can hear the smirk in your voice. "Hard and fast."
You deactivate the torch, plunging your side of the module back into darkness, save for the faint glow of the still-hot cut. You jam the now-useless tool into a crevice in the door, using it as a makeshift crowbar. "Together," you grunt.
Vela doesn't hesitate. She holsters her rifle and is at your side in a second, her own magnetic boots clamped firmly to the hull. She finds a purchase on the weakened seam, her gloved hands gripping the edge of the metal. "On three," she says. "One... two... THREE!"
You both throw your entire weight against the door. The metal groans in protest, a low-frequency vibration you feel through the soles of your boots. The half-cut circle bends, but holds. The lock mechanism, deep within the door, is still engaged.
"Again!" you roar, the effort forcing the air from your lungs.
You heave again. This time, there's a sharp crack that echoes through the hull. A hairline fracture spiderwebs out from the cut.
"It's working!" Lin's voice shouts in your ear. "But you're out of time! I have a confirmed hyperspace signature dropping into the system. It's a Sith Terminus-class destroyer. Standard patrol fleet. They responded to Vesper's call. ETA to your position is less than five minutes!"
There's no time for finesse. There's only now.
"Vela!" you shout, a new, desperate idea forming. You brace your feet, positioning yourself to push. "The Force! Use it! Not to move the door, just give me a solid push!"
It's a wild gamble. Using the Force so close to the Chimera could be catastrophic. But Vela understands instantly. She's not touching the door; she's touching you.
She places a hand on your back. You feel a sudden, immense pressure as she channels a raw, focused burst of telekinetic power into you. It's not the elegant precision of a Jedi; it's the brute-force shove of a Sith.
Combined with your own straining muscles, the effect is explosive. With a final, earsplitting shriek of tortured metal, the circular section of the airlock doesn't open—it breaks. The entire panel buckles inward, tearing away from the locking mechanism and creating a jagged, triangular opening into the pitch-black interior.
You stumble forward from the sudden release of pressure, catching yourself on the edge of the broken doorway. Vela is right behind you.
You have breached the tomb.
The air inside is stale and colder than the void itself. The psychic pressure here is a physical weight, a soul-crushing despair that presses in on you from all sides. The dormant hunger of the Chimera is all around you.
"You're in," Lin says, his voice a tense whisper. "The destroyer is launching a wing of Sith Interceptors. They'll be on you in sixty seconds. Get out of sight."
You and Vela scramble through the jagged opening, your boots clanging on the metal deck of a dark, silent corridor. You are inside. The Sith are at the door. And the plague awaits in the darkness ahead.
You and Vela scramble through the jagged opening, your magnetic boots clanging on the deck of a pitch-black corridor. The psychic pressure is immense, a suffocating blanket of despair and hunger. Outside, the silent void is about to erupt in a storm of laser fire.
"Vela, tactical assessment?" you shout over the comm, your voice tight.
She doesn't answer immediately. Instead, she grabs the back of your EVA suit and yanks you hard, pulling you away from the glowing, jagged hole you just created. "Get clear of the door!" she snarls.
As you stumble deeper into the corridor, a volley of brilliant green energy blasts screams past the opening, illuminating the passage in a series of strobing, hellish flashes. The Sith Interceptors have arrived. They are strafing the breach.
With your back pressed against the freezing metal of the opposite wall, Vela finally gives her assessment, her voice a low, intense growl in your helmet.
"Assessment is simple," she says, her rifle up as she scans the darkness ahead of you. "Outside is a killing jar. We can't go back. That breach is now an open invitation for a Sith boarding party."
She turns her helmeted head, and you can feel the intensity of her gaze even through the visor. "We have two hostile forces: the Sith outside, and whatever is waiting for us in here. We are caught between a hammer and an anvil."
Her tone hardens, shifting from assessment to action. "Our only option is to make the anvil our shield. We go deeper. We find a control room, a blast door, a junction—anything we can seal behind us. We cut them off. Let the Sith board this tomb. We'll make them regret it. But we have to move now, before they come through that door."
"Agreed," you say, your voice tight with adrenaline. "Hopefully, we can use the Sith as a distraction in our favor."
"A distraction they won't survive," Vela mutters, already moving.
You plunge into the oppressive darkness of the corridor. The only light comes from the intermittent flashes of laser fire from the strafing Interceptors outside and the weak beam of the torch mounted on Vela's rifle. The passage is sterile, metallic, and utterly silent save for your own breathing and the clang of your boots on the deck. The psychic pressure is a constant, suffocating weight, a promise of the horror that slumbers at the heart of this place.
Behind you, you hear a loud thump as the magnetic clamps of a Sith boarding craft lock onto the hull near the breach, followed by the high-pitched whine of cutting tools. They're coming.
The corridor opens into a small, circular junction. Three identical passages branch off into the darkness. In the center of the junction is a dead console, a single flickering red light indicating a catastrophic system failure. A layer of frost covers every surface, and the air is so cold you can see your breath fogging the inside of your helmet visor.
"Lin, are you there? We need a map," you say into the comm, your voice a hushed whisper.
Static crackles in your ear. "Barely," Lin's voice comes back, strained. "That destroyer is flooding the area with jamming frequencies. I'm getting scraps. The station's schematics are a mess, corrupted data everywhere. But... I think I have something."
A heavily pixelated, incomplete map flickers onto your helmet's heads-up display. It shows your position at the junction.
The left path is labeled CREW QUARTERS / INFIRMARY. It's a dead end on the map.


The right path is labeled ENGINEERING / LIFE SUPPORT. It seems to loop around the outer section of the module.


The center path is labeled PRIMARY LAB / OBSERVATION. This passage leads directly toward the center of the module, toward the source of the psychic void. The Chimera.


"The central corridor seems to be the most direct route to the primary lab," Lin says, his voice cutting in and out. "But it's a straight shot. No cover. The right passage looks longer, but it might give you more options... more places to hide or fortify."
Behind you, you hear the sharp, metallic clang of a boarding ramp hitting the deck. The Sith are inside the module.
"The right path," you say, your voice a low command that barely disturbs the frigid air. "Let's get lost."
Vela immediately understands the logic. A direct confrontation favors the Sith squad's numbers. Evasion is your weapon. She gives a curt nod and pivots, her rifle's beam cutting a path down the right-hand corridor.
You follow her, plunging into a new kind of darkness. This passage is different from the sterile accessway. The walls are a chaotic maze of thick, frost-covered pipes and massive power conduits, some of them cracked and venting a slow-moving, freezing gas that clings to the floor. The beam from Vela's rifle glints off sheets of ice that sheathe entire sections of the wall. It feels less like a laboratory and more like the dead guts of some great leviathan.
From the junction behind you, the sounds of your pursuers echo, sharp and clear in the frozen air. The rhythmic thud of armored boots on the deck. A shouted command in the harsh, guttural Sith language. They're organized. They're sweeping the corridors.
"Kaelen..." Lin's voice cuts through the static, weak and distorted. "The... schematics... show... a maintenance hub... ahead of you... controls for the... environmental systems..." His voice dissolves into a burst of static, then silence.
"Lin? Lin, are you there?" you ask.
Only the hiss of an empty channel answers. The destroyer's jamming field is too strong. You're on your own.
You press forward, moving deeper into the frozen labyrinth of Engineering. The sounds of the Sith squad grow fainter, but you know they'll eventually find your trail. Up ahead, Vela stops. Her light illuminates a heavy blast door, set flush into the corridor wall, and next to it, a manual release valve crusted over with thick ice.
"This could be it," she says, her voice low in your helmet. "If we can get this door closed, it could seal this entire section. Buy us the time we need." She runs a gloved hand over the valve. "But this mechanism is frozen solid. It will take time to break it free. Time we might not have."
As she speaks, your eyes are drawn past the door, deeper down the corridor. Another fifty meters on, a faint, pulsing blue light emanates from an open doorway—the first sign of active power you've seen. It's likely the life support control room Lin was trying to tell you about. It could be a trap, or it could be the key to turning this entire dead station into a weapon against the Sith.
"The door first," you affirm, your voice a low cloud in the frigid air of your helmet. "Then we investigate the light."
Vela gives a sharp, efficient nod. She doesn't need to be told twice. While you keep an eye on the dark corridor behind you, she holsters her rifle and turns her attention to the frozen valve. She tries to turn it with her gloved hands, muscles straining, but it's fused solid by a thick armor of ice.
"It won't budge," she grunts, her frustration palpable. She pulls the heavy blaster rifle off her back, reversing it. "Stand back."
She raises the rifle and brings the reinforced stock down hard against the valve. The impact rings out like a hammer on an anvil, a shockingly loud CRACK that echoes through the labyrinthine passages. A large chunk of ice shatters and falls to the deck, but the valve itself remains locked in place.
"Quietly is not an option," she states, raising the rifle for another blow.
"Wait," you whisper, holding up a hand. You both fall silent, listening.
For a moment, there is only the faint hum of the distant, pulsing light. Then, you hear it. From a cross-corridor somewhere ahead and to your left, the sound of boots on metal, and a clipped, angry voice speaking in the harsh Sith tongue. They heard the noise. They've changed direction. They're coming toward you.
Vela immediately crouches, melting into the shadows of the massive pipes, her rifle now aimed down the corridor you came from, watching your back.
"They're closing in," she whispers into the comm, her voice dangerously calm. "We have maybe a minute before they're on top of us. The valve isn't going to turn in time."
The patrol is coming from the left. The blue light is to your right. The blast door is in front of you, a frozen, impassable obstacle. The plan has already fallen apart.
"Forget the door!" you shout, your voice tight with adrenaline. "Go! Run for the light!"
Vela doesn't need to be told twice. In a single fluid motion, she's up and sprinting, her rifle held low. You're right behind her, your magnetic boots pounding a desperate, echoing rhythm on the frozen deck.
The corridor is a blur of ice-caked pipes and dancing shadows cast by the pulsing blue light ahead. Behind you, the Sith patrol shouts in alarm as they round the corner and spot you. A searing green laser bolt screams past your head, striking a pipe and showering the passage in a flash of sparks and ice crystals. There's no time for cover, only for speed.
The pulsing blue light grows brighter, the low hum becoming a distinct, angry crackle of raw energy. You burst through the open doorway into a wide, circular control room.
Your eyes are immediately drawn to the source of the light and noise. In the center of the room, a massive power conduit has been ruptured. It's cracked open like a shattered bone, and raw, untamed energy is arcing from the breach to a nearby control console, bathing the room in a strobe-like, electric blue glare. Frost covers every surface except for the console, which glows with heat from the energy bombardment.
The room is a junction for the station's environmental controls. Dead terminals line the walls, but the one being struck by arcs of power is flickering erratically to life. And most importantly, the doorway you just came through is a heavy, reinforced pressure door. Next to it is a large, manual locking wheel, miraculously free of ice due to the ambient heat from the arcing conduit.
"The door!" Vela yells, already moving toward it.
You throw your shoulder against the heavy slab of metal, pushing it shut as Vela grabs the locking wheel. The last thing you see before the door closes is the armored figures of the Sith squad, their rifles raised, just meters away down the corridor.
The door slams shut with a heavy, final clang, plunging the room into the chaotic light of the arcing electricity. Vela puts her full weight into the wheel, turning it with a series of groaning metallic clicks.
LOCK. LOCK. LOCK.
A thunderous BOOM shakes the door as a Sith trooper slams their full body weight against it from the other side. It holds. Another BOOM, followed by furious shouting in the Sith tongue. They are trapped outside. You are trapped within.
"That won't hold them for long," Vela pants, leaning against the now-sealed door, her rifle aimed at its center. "They'll have breaching charges."
You are in a temporary, terrifying sanctuary. The room is lit by the violent, unpredictable arcs of raw power. The console it's striking is flickering, showing garbled schematics of the station's life support and atmospheric controls. The psychic pressure of the Chimera feels stronger here, drawn to the chaotic energy release.
The Sith are about to blow the door down. You are in a room with a live, damaged power conduit and a barely-functioning environmental control panel.
You scramble over to the console, the electric-blue light of the arcing energy casting sharp, dancing shadows across its surface. The panel is a mess. It flickers violently, the screen filled with corrupted data and strings of error messages. But through the chaos, your perceptive eyes catch glimpses of recognizable command prompts—the station's environmental controls.
The raw power arcing into the console seems to be creating a feedback loop, giving you momentary, unstable access to systems that should be dead.
Three primary functions are intermittently available, appearing and disappearing in the flickering data stream:
Atmospheric Purge Protocol: A command to vent the atmosphere from adjacent sectors. You see a partial schematic showing the corridor the Sith are in. You could, in theory, open all exterior vents in that section, explosively decompressing it and sending the Sith squad tumbling into the void. However, the system is unstable. A miscalculation could vent your own section or create a chain reaction across the entire module.


Cryogenic Coolant System Override: The labyrinth of pipes you ran through contains the station's primary coolant. A prompt flickers, showing you have access to a pressure release valve. You could flood the corridor outside with supercooled cryogenic gas, flash-freezing everything—including the Sith and the door itself. This might reinforce the door but could also make it brittle. The risk is that a rupture under this extreme cold could be catastrophic, and you have no idea if the failing system can handle the pressure.


Power Conduit Re-route: The most complex and dangerous option. You could try to use the console to reroute the energy from the ruptured conduit you're standing next to. If you succeed, you could redirect this raw power into another system—perhaps creating a massive electrical surge in the corridor, electrocuting the Sith. But the conduit is volatile. A mistake could cause it to overload completely, turning this entire room—and you with it—into a plasma bomb.


A loud hiss comes from the door, followed by a bright orange glow appearing around its edges. The Sith are using a plasma torch. They're cutting through.
You have maybe thirty seconds before they breach.
"Atmospheric Purge," you say, your voice grim. "Do it."
There's no time for debate. Vela gives a sharp nod, her rifle still trained on the glowing, melting seam of the door.
You turn to the furiously flickering console. The prompt for the Atmospheric Purge Protocol is unstable, vanishing and reappearing in a storm of corrupted data. The arcing energy from the ruptured conduit lashes out, striking the panel with a sound like tearing metal, forcing you to flinch back. You have to time this perfectly.
The orange line being cut by the Sith plasma torch is nearly a complete circle. Any second now, they'll be through.
You lean in, ignoring the heat and the blinding flashes. Your instincts take over. You don't read the garbled text; you feel the rhythm of the machine, the cadence of the power surges. You see the command flicker into existence for a split second.
Now.
Your gloved finger stabs at the screen. For a heart-stopping moment, nothing happens. The console goes dark.
Then, a deafening klaxon blares through the room, a sound so loud it's a physical force. Red emergency lights strobe to life, overriding the chaotic blue arcs and bathing everything in a blood-red wash. The entire module shudders violently, a deep, groaning tremor that vibrates up through the deck and into your bones.
From the other side of the door, the high-pitched hiss of the plasma torch is drowned out by a sound you can only describe as a hurricane being forced through a keyhole. A deafening roar of escaping atmosphere fills the corridor outside, punctuated by the shriek of tortured metal as bulkheads buckle under the sudden, immense pressure differential. The shouts of the Sith squad are cut off, replaced by a wet, choking gurgle, then silence.
The reinforced door in front of you groans and bulges outward, the metal straining against its locks as the vacuum in the corridor tries to rip it from its hinges.
And then, as quickly as it began, it's over. The klaxon dies. The shaking stops. The only sound is the angry crackle of the ruptured conduit and the faint, ghostly whisper of air molecules venting into the void.
"Status?" you gasp, your ears ringing.
"They're gone," Vela says, her voice hushed with a mixture of awe and horror. She cautiously approaches the door, placing a hand on the now-bulging metal. "You turned their corridor into a vacuum chamber. There's nothing left of them."
You've survived. You've eliminated the immediate threat. But as the adrenaline begins to fade, a new sensation washes over you, far more terrifying than the Sith patrol.
The psychic void in the station deepens. The passive, dormant hunger you felt before is gone. In its place is a sharp, focused, and awake presence. The violent energy release of the purge, the screams of the dying Sith, the raw power arcing through this room—you have rung the dinner bell.
The console you used sparks violently and dies, its screen going permanently black. You are trapped in this room, with a new enemy on its way and your path forward shrouded in darkness. Somewhere, in the heart of this tomb, the Chimera is stirring.
You stand in the blood-red emergency lighting, the air thick with the smell of ozone from the dying conduit. The psychic presence of the Chimera is no longer a distant pressure; it's a focused, malevolent intelligence that is actively searching for you.
"Here," you say, your voice cutting through the crackle of the damaged console. "This room is a tomb waiting to happen. The door won't hold, and this conduit is a bomb. We can't fight here."
You turn your gaze from the bulging, compromised door toward the darkness of the corridor you haven't yet explored—the path toward the Primary Lab.
"A last stand isn't about finding the perfect fortress," you continue, thinking aloud as much as you're speaking to Vela. "Those don't exist here. It's about choosing the terrain that gives us an advantage, no matter how small."
Vela looks from you to the dark corridor, her rifle held ready. "The corridors are a deathtrap. Too many angles."
"Exactly," you agree. "We don't fight in the corridor. We fight from it. The best place isn't the center of the lab, where it's strongest. It's the doorway leading into it. A final chokepoint."
You lay out the logic, your words sharp and clear, a commander outlining a final, desperate battle plan.
"We move down that central corridor, fast and quiet. We find the entrance to the main containment chamber. That entrance is our fortress. You hold the physical doorway, Vela. Anything tries to come through, you kill it. I'll position myself behind you, using the chokepoint for cover, and project the Sanctuary Field into the chamber. I'll focus on starving the Chimera, while you keep me alive."
It's a brutal, simple plan. You are turning the entrance to its own lair into the kill box. You're not just waiting for the monster to come to you; you're taking the fight to its doorstep and refusing to let it answer.
"It's our only chance," you finish, your gaze locked with hers. "We make our stand at the threshold of hell and hold the line."
Vela gives a single, sharp nod. There is no fear in her eyes, only the cold, hard resolve of a warrior facing her end. "At the threshold of hell," she repeats, her voice a low growl. "Let's give them a welcome."
You take the lead. Prying open the now-useless door to the environmental control room, you step back into the silent, vacuum-purged corridor. The emergency lights cast long, distorted shadows, painting everything in a sickly red hue. You move forward, toward the central path you previously ignored, your magnetic boots the only sound in the dead station.
The passage to the Primary Lab is unnervingly straight and wide, designed for moving large equipment. The psychic pressure intensifies with every step, a physical weight that makes the air feel thick and heavy. It's a palpable feeling of pure malevolence, a bottomless hunger that knows you are coming. The Chimera is no longer just stirring; it is waiting.
Your journey ends at a colossal, circular blast door, twice the height of a person. Unlike the others, it is not frozen. It’s scorched and scarred, pitted with impacts from some long-past struggle. In its center is a single, large manual release wheel. This is it. The door to the cage.
Without a word, you and Vela put your hands on the wheel. It's heavy, but it turns. With a deep, groaning complaint of stressed metal, the gears engage. The massive door begins to iris open, revealing the chamber within.
The room is not a lab. It is a cathedral of horrors.
It's a vast, cavernous sphere, its walls lined with strange, dead machinery that seems to writhe and coil in the faint, pulsating light emanating from the center. In the very heart of the sphere, floating in defiance of gravity, is the Chimera.
It is not a creature of flesh and blood. It is a vortex of pure darkness, a hole in the universe that seems to drink the light around it. It has a vaguely humanoid shape, as if it were a shadow desperately trying to remember being a man, but its form constantly shifts and writhes, tendrils of pure void lashing out into the space around it. At its core is a blinding point of anti-light, a nexus of absolute despair. This is the "Amplifier," the being of pure, chaotic power.
"By the Sith," Vela breathes, her voice a hushed whisper of pure shock. For the first time, you see her truly shaken.
You push her back gently, moving to stand in the doorway yourself. "Get behind me," you command, your voice steady despite the psychic hurricane battering your mind. "Guard the door. Nothing gets in or out."
She recovers instantly, her training overriding her fear. She takes a position to the side of the massive doorway, her rifle aimed into the chamber, her body braced for a fight.
You stand at the threshold, the full, undivided attention of the Chimera now fixed upon you. It feels your presence, your gift, the perfect, silent peace that is anathema to its very being.
It does not speak in words. It screams into your mind, a wave of pure, undiluted emotion—a billion years of hunger, a galaxy of loneliness, and an abyss of rage, all focused on you. It is the psychic shriek of a starving god who has just found the one thing it cannot consume.
You are the famine. It is the void. The final battle has begun.
You speak the words not into the comms, but into the void itself, a direct projection of your will. “I knew you were a victim just like me, my friend. You need not hunger. You need not rage. Let me help you.”
You let go.
The Sanctuary Field blossoms from you, not as an aggressive wave, but as an undeniable dawn. It is the effortless, perfect peace you mastered in the Enclave. It flows into the vast chamber, a tide of absolute harmony washing over the writhing, dead machinery and the scarred walls. The oppressive psychic pressure of the room doesn't just lessen; it evaporates, replaced by the profound stillness that is your gift.
The field touches the Chimera.
The effect is instantaneous and catastrophic. The moment the edge of your sanctuary makes contact with the vortex of darkness, it erupts. The formless, shifting void shrieks, a silent, psychic scream that tears at your mind. It is not the rage of a predator being challenged; it is the agonized fury of a being whose very essence is being unmade. Your peace is poison to its pain.
It fights back.
The promised assault on your soul begins. It doesn't send visions of your past or fears for your future. It knows those are your strengths. Instead, it throws its own raw, undiluted suffering at you.
You are flooded with a hunger so complete, so absolute, that it transcends physical need. It is the hunger of a soul that has been starving for millennia, a gnawing emptiness that threatens to consume your very identity. You feel your own memories, your sense of self, start to fray at the edges, tempted to fall into that bottomless void just for a moment of relief.


You are drowned in a wave of loneliness so profound it feels like the heat death of the universe. It is the isolation of a being utterly unique and reviled, a being that has never known a single moment of connection, only the cold, sterile observation of its creators.


You are battered by a rage born from betrayal. You feel the ghost-memory of being a person, a life stolen and twisted into this monstrous form, a purpose perverted into a weapon. It is a mirror of your own history, but stripped of all hope, all camaraderie, all love. It is pure, nihilistic fury at what was taken.


From her position by the door, Vela can see none of this. She sees you standing firm, your posture unwavering, a statue of impossible calm. She sees the Chimera in the center of the room thrashing violently, its form contorting as if it were being torn apart from the inside, tendrils of void lashing out and dissolving as they hit the invisible wall of your sanctuary. She grips her rifle tighter, her knuckles white, a helpless guardian to a war she cannot comprehend.
The Chimera's psychic assault intensifies, focusing on a single, devastating concept: You offer peace, but you are a cage. You offer help, but you are a prison. You are no different from them.
The strain is immense. Maintaining the field itself is effortless, but enduring the psychic onslaught while doing so is like holding back the ocean with nothing but your will. You feel your resolve beginning to crack under the sheer weight of its agony.
You push the words into its mind, not as an attack, but as an offering. A truth.
We are two halves of a whole. You are out of harmony, your hunger will never cease. Your pain will never end. My promise is finality. Join the universe. Suffer no more.
The psychic storm battering your soul does not break. It shatters.
The raw, undiluted rage of the Chimera falters, replaced by a wave of utter, soul-crushing confusion. The mental image it projects changes. It is no longer a monster. For a fleeting second, you see the ghost of a person—a Jedi scholar, captured, tortured, his own unique Force abilities twisted and amplified until they broke and became this endless hunger. You see your own story reflected in a shattered mirror.
The violent thrashing of the dark vortex in the center of the room ceases. The lashing tendrils of void retract. The chaotic, shifting form begins to coalesce, to shrink, drawing in on itself. The psychic screaming stops, replaced by a single, faint, and heartbreaking feeling projected directly into your mind: a question. Not of words, but of pure, desperate hope.
Peace?
From her position by the door, Vela watches in stunned silence. The terrifying vortex of darkness has gone still. The oppressive, malevolent energy that filled the chamber has vanished, replaced by a feeling of profound, ancient sadness. She sees you take a single, unsteady step forward, a tear tracing a path down your cheek, a testament to the silent, terrible burden you are shouldering.
You feel the Chimera’s will surrendering. It is not fighting you anymore. It is reaching for you. It has accepted your offer. It is ready for the pain to end.
You hold the Sanctuary Field steady, a perfect, unwavering sphere of absolute peace. You are not a cage. You are a doorway. You are offering it the ultimate release.
With a final, silent sigh that echoes only in the depths of your soul, the Chimera lets go.
The vortex of pure darkness does not explode. It implodes. It folds in on itself, the swirling void collapsing into the pinpoint of anti-light at its core. For a single, breathtaking moment, there is a sphere of absolute nothingness in the center of the room, a perfect hole in the fabric of reality.
And then, it is gone.
The chamber is empty. The psychic wound in the universe is healed. The silence is no longer oppressive, but pure. Clean.
The Sanctuary Field, now unopposed, fills the vast chamber effortlessly. The mission is over. You have faced the Chimera and you have won.
The strength that held you upright vanishes. The psychic and emotional toll of the ordeal slams into you. Your knees buckle, and you collapse to the cold, metal deck, the sheer exhaustion more overwhelming than any physical blow you have ever taken. You are spent, but you are victorious.
You are on your hands and knees on the cold deck, every muscle trembling with a deep, cellular exhaustion. The silence in your mind is the most profound sensation. For weeks, you have lived with a constant barrage of psychic noise—the lingering echoes of your own trauma, the oppressive weight of the Chimera's dormant hunger, and the final, agonizing storm of its psychic death throes. Now, there is only stillness. It is the most profound peace you have ever known.
You take a breath, then another, the clean, recycled air of your suit feeling like the first real breath you've taken in your life. The ghost of the Chimera's agony, the phantom weight of its loneliness and rage, slowly recedes, leaving you feeling hollowed out, but whole.
A pair of armored boots clangs on the deck in front of you. You look up to see Vela. She has lowered her rifle. Her helmet is still on, but you can feel her gaze through the dark visor, searching, assessing. Her voice comes over the private comm, stripped of its usual iron control, leaving only a raw, quiet intensity.
"Kaelen... Is it... gone?"
You manage a slow nod, pushing yourself into a sitting position, your back against the massive frame of the doorway. "It's gone," you confirm, your voice hoarse. "It's at peace."
She stands over you for a moment longer, a silent guardian processing an event that defies every law of power she has ever known. She saw no lightsaber duel, no exchange of blaster fire, only a man standing at a precipice, weathering a storm she could not see, and winning. With a quiet sound that might be a sigh of relief, she kneels down, placing a hand on your shoulder—not just to support you, but to ground herself.
Your thoughts turn to your other friend, the one who has been their eyes and ears this whole time. "Lin," you say, your voice cracking with fatigue. "Lin, are you there? Talk to me."
For a moment, there is only static. Then, his voice bursts through, laced with a frantic, joyous relief. "Kaelen! I saw it! The energy signature just... vanished! The whole module went dead calm. You did it! You magnificent bastard, you actually did it!"
The relief is short-lived. "But the destroyer is still out here," he continues, his tone shifting back to urgent professionalism. "They're not firing, but they're holding position, scanning. They know something happened. They're trying to figure out what. We are still trapped in this tomb."
He's right. The Chimera is gone, but the wolves are still circling. You, Vela, and Lin are isolated, deep inside a dead space station, with a Sith warship waiting for you outside. The battle is won, but the war for survival has just entered its next, critical phase.
Vela helps you to your feet, her grip firm and steadying. The sheer psychic silence in the chamber is a balm, but your body screams in protest, every nerve ending frayed. The war is won, but you're still deep behind enemy lines.
"You're right to be worried," Lin's voice crackles over the comm, his relief now replaced by the sharp focus of a cornered technician. "That destroyer isn't leaving. But don't write this place off just yet. You're thinking like a soldier, Kaelen. Think like a slicer. This 'hunk of metal' was a black site laboratory built to imprison a Force deity. Its systems are redundant, hardened... and maybe, just maybe, accessible."
A new schematic flickers onto your HUD, clearer than before. Lin has been busy.
"I've managed to clean up some of the data," he continues, his voice quick and precise. "From what I can tell, you have three bad options on the table."
1. Turn the Tomb into a Weapon: "The station has a primary reactor core, isolated from the main grid. It's deep in the module's engineering section. If you can get to it and overload it... you could turn this entire station into a directed explosion. It would be enough to vaporize that Sith destroyer. The problem is, you'd have to get out before it blows. I'd have to fly the Nightfall into the blast radius for a hot extraction. It's a suicide run, but it's a possibility."
2. Create a Diversion: "A less... final option. That environmental control room you were in has access to the station's power conduits. If you can get back there, or find another terminal, you might be able to create a massive, contained energy surge. Not enough to destroy the station, but enough to light up their sensors and make them think the whole place is going critical. In the panic and confusion, as they pull back, I might be able to swoop in and get you. It's a gamble on their commander being cautious."
Vela lets go of your arm, her gaze turning from you to the dark corridor leading back into the station's depths. Her voice is a low, dangerous counterpoint to Lin's technical assessment.
3. Turn the Tomb into a Hunting Ground: "Lin's options rely on their technology. I say we rely on their arrogance. The Sith will not simply glass this station. Not now. They've seen its power signature vanish. They know we are here. They will send troops. They will board, wanting to claim whatever weapon killed the Chimera and take us alive. We let them. This station is a maze of corridors and chokepoints. We fall back, find a defensible position, and we bleed them. We turn their boarding party into a slaughter. We make them waste their lives to get to us, buying Lin the time he needs to find a better opening."
Three terrible choices hang in the air, each with its own deadly risks. Do you escape, attack, or defend?
You stand in the silent, cavernous chamber, the echoes of a psychic war still fading from your mind. "We cannot allow anything to remain from this station," you declare, your voice resonating with grim finality in the vast emptiness. "And the longer we wait, the more reinforcements they will accrue. We go with the first option and trust the Force is with us."
Lin's voice crackles over the comm, strained but resolute. "Copy that, Kaelen. A suicide run. I'll start warming up the Nightfall's engines for a full burn. The timing on this... it has to be perfect. Down to the second. You get that reactor cooking, and I'll be there. Just... don't be late."
Vela looks from you to the dark corridor leading back into the station's heart. A fierce, almost feral light burns in her eyes. "Good," she says, her voice a low murmur of approval. "We will not be trophies for the Sith Empire. We will be the fire that scours them from the sky. A fitting end."
She helps you to your feet, her grip unyielding. The journey back through the station is a tense, grueling trek. You navigate the maze of dead, red-lit corridors, your shared exhaustion a tangible weight between you. Every step is a conscious effort, a battle against the deep, bone-wearying fatigue that threatens to pull you under.
"Update from the cheap seats," Lin's voice cuts in, sharp with anxiety. "The destroyer is launching a second wing of Interceptors. They're not just watching anymore; they're establishing a patrol cordon. And I'm seeing movement in their main hangar bay. They're prepping a boarding party. They're coming for you."
The news lends a new, desperate fire to your steps. You push onward, following the flickering schematics on your HUD, moving deeper into the industrial guts of the station. The sterile laboratory corridors give way to massive, greasy machinery, thick bundles of cables as wide as your arm, and the lingering smell of ozone and coolant.
Finally, you arrive. The door to the reactor control room stands open, leading into a shielded, circular chamber. In the center, suspended in a web of massive conduits, is the station's primary reactor core. It's a dense, cylindrical device of black metal, humming with a deep, dormant power—a sleeping giant. Before it stands a single, darkened control console.
"We're here, Lin," you report, your voice ragged. "At the reactor. How do we turn this thing into a bomb?"
A pause, then Lin's voice comes back, heavy with bad news. "Okay... I see it. The console is offline. It's connected to the reactor, but it has no power of its own. It's designed to draw energy from an external source for emergency start-ups. There should be an auxiliary power socket on the side."
You and Vela scan the console. She finds it—a rectangular port, marked with a universal power symbol.
"I see it," Vela confirms.
"Good," Lin says, and you can hear the dread in his voice. "Now the bad part. The only compatible power source you have with you is the primary battery pack on your EVA suit. You'll have to disconnect it and plug it into the console to bring the reactor controls online."
He lets the implication hang in the air for a second before spelling it out. "The moment you do that, your suit's main systems will go dead. Heat, comms, HUD... everything. You'll be on emergency life support only. You'll have maybe ten minutes of oxygen. Ten minutes to start the overload sequence, get to the rendezvous point, and make the jump to the Nightfall."
The choice is brutal. To start the station's self-destruct, you have to start your own.
There's no debate. No hesitation. Before Vela can process the words, before Lin can offer another warning, you act.
Your gloved hand finds the emergency release on the chest plate of your EVA suit. With a sharp click, you disconnect the primary battery pack.
The world dies.
Your HUD, with its comforting schematic and vital signs, flickers and vanishes, plunging your view into the raw, dim red of the emergency lighting. The tinny voice of Lin, your lifeline to the Nightfall, cuts out into a hiss of static and then absolute silence. The faint warmth generated by the suit's systems ceases, and the profound, biting cold of the station begins to seep into your bones.
The only sound is the sudden, loud, precious rasp of your own breathing. The only feeling is the pressure in your lungs, a stark, biological clock that has just started ticking. You are utterly, terrifyingly alone in your own head.
You don't falter. You take the heavy battery pack and slam it into the auxiliary socket on the console.
With a low hum and a shower of sparks, the console screen flickers to life, bathing your helmet's dark visor in a sickly green glow. It's a complex interface of cascading text and technical readouts—the controls for the station's heart.
"Kaelen!" Vela's voice is sharp with alarm, but you can't hear her. She takes a step forward, her hand outstretched, but stops as she sees the console light up. She understands. She watches you, her posture rigid with a mixture of shock and fierce, grudging respect. You have made the sacrifice. Now she has to make it count.
She immediately turns her back to you, watching the corridor, her rifle at the ready. She speaks into her comm, her voice now the sole link between you and your pilot.
"Lin, he did it. He's dark. Talk to me. Guide me so I can guide him."
The console in front of you stabilizes, displaying the main reactor control menu. It presents two primary options, both blinking, both demanding an immediate choice.
1. EMERGENCY SCRAM & OVERLOAD: A single-stage, brute-force command. The text below it warns of "unstable energy fluctuations" and "high risk of premature containment failure." It's the fast and dirty option. The quickest way to start the countdown.
2. CONTROLLED OVERLOAD SEQUENCE: A multi-stage process. It requires you to manually override three separate safety regulators before initiating the final overload. It is more stable, but will take significantly longer, eating away precious seconds of the ten minutes of oxygen you have left.
Vela, receiving instructions from Lin, turns back to you. She can't speak to you. She points a finger first at your chest, then holds up ten fingers, her meaning clear: You have ten minutes. Then, she points to the screen, tapping the first option, then the second, looking at you for a decision.
The blood is pounding in your ears. The cold is starting to ache in your joints. 
You don't even spare the second option a glance. Time is a luxury you no longer have. Your gloved finger, cold and numb, stabs the console screen, selecting the first command: EMERGENCY SCRAM & OVERLOAD.
For a heart-stopping second, the console goes dark. Then, the entire station answers.
A deep, bone-jarring hum erupts from the reactor core, so powerful you feel it in your teeth. The green light of the console is instantly swallowed by a blinding, flashing red. Warnings scroll across the screen too fast to read, but the meaning is clear: CONTAINMENT FAILURE IMMINENT. The deck beneath your feet shudders violently, throwing you off balance. The sleeping giant has been kicked awake, and it is furious.
Vela shouts something you can't hear, grabbing the edge of the doorway for support. She's yelling into her comm, her voice sharp and urgent. Through her visor, you can see her eyes widen as Lin's frantic reply comes through. She turns to you, her face a mask of cold, controlled panic.
She grabs your arm in a grip of pure steel, wrenching you away from the dying console. She doesn't need words. Her actions are a language of their own. She shoves you toward the corridor, her entire posture screaming RUN.
The retreat is a nightmare. The station is tearing itself apart. Pipes burst overhead, venting scalding steam that fogs your visor. Ceiling panels drop from their moorings, crashing to the deck just meters ahead of you. The violent shudders threaten to throw you from your feet with every step. You can't hear, you can't see anything beyond the dim red emergency lights and the narrow beam of Vela's rifle light dancing ahead of you. You are deaf and blind, guided only by the iron grip on your arm and a desperate, primal instinct to survive.
Vela is your anchor in the chaos. She pulls you through the labyrinthine corridors, following a path only she can see on her HUD, a path being fed to her by Lin. You are her mission now, a precious, fragile cargo to be dragged from the fire.
You round a final corner, the schematics on Vela's HUD showing you are just one corridor away from the hangar bay where Lin is waiting. But your path is blocked.
A squad of five Sith troopers, clad in black and crimson armor, stands in the center of the corridor. They have their blasters raised, their formation tight. Before them stands a grim figure in the imposing robes of a Sith Lord, a single, blood-red lightsaber humming to life in his hand, casting his sharp, cruel features in a demonic glow. He was sent to secure the station, and now he is its final, doomed warden.
"That's far enough, fugitives," the Sith Lord's voice booms, a sound you can't hear but Vela can. "By order of the Sith Empire, you will surrender this station."
Vela shoves you behind her, her own blaster rifle coming up to aim at the Sith Lord's chest. She is hopelessly outgunned. The station is moments from vaporizing. The air in your lungs is getting thin. This is the end of the line.
You grab Vela’s shoulder, a silent command for her to hold. You step in front of her, a lone, unarmored figure facing down a Sith Lord and his execution squad. The station shudders violently around you, a testament to the catastrophic overload you initiated. The air in your lungs is thin, burning, your vision starting to swim at the edges from oxygen deprivation.
You close your eyes, shutting out the chaos, the red lights, the snarling face of the Sith. You don't reach for power. You fall into the stillness that is your core. You find the deep, silent ocean of peace within you.
And you let it out.
"Be at peace," you project, not with your voice, but with your very soul.
The Sanctuary Field doesn't just expand; it erupts. It is a shockwave of absolute tranquility that slams into the corridor. The effect on the Sith is instantaneous and total.
The Sith Lord's glowing, blood-red lightsaber sputters and dies, its blade retracting with a sad hiss as the dark side energy fueling it is utterly neutralized. The palpable aura of menace and rage that surrounded him vanishes, replaced by a wide-eyed, slack-jawed expression of profound confusion. His connection to the Force, the source of his power and identity for his entire life, is gone. He is just a man in ornate robes holding a useless metal hilt.
His troopers fare no better. Their aggressive, disciplined stances collapse. They lower their blasters, looking at each other, then at their commander, their faces etched with a bewilderment that borders on fear. The rigid conditioning, the combat fury—all of it wiped clean, leaving only dazed soldiers in a corridor that is shaking itself to pieces.
But you don't stop there. In a feat of control you've never before attempted, born of desperation and instinct, you shape the field. You don't just project it forward; you wrap a part of it around Vela. It's an agonizingly delicate process, like trying to tailor smoke with a needle. You try to create a second skin of your sanctuary around her, but with a buffer, a space between the peace and her being, shielding her from the chaos without severing her own connection.
Vela gasps. She feels it—a shield of impossible calm enveloping her, deflecting the falling debris and the suffocating heat. Yet, just beyond that shield, she can feel the terrifying, razor-thin edge of the true null-field. She can still feel the Force within herself, a raging fire just inches away from a perfect vacuum. She watches you, not with awe, but with a staggering new understanding of the power you command.
The path is clear. The Sith are neutralized, lost in a daze of enforced peace. But the station gives a final, groaning shudder. The lights flicker and die, plunging the corridor into absolute darkness, save for the faint beam of Vela's rifle.
Your knees buckle from the strain. The lack of oxygen is becoming critical. You bought yourselves seconds. That's all.
Vela, understanding instantly, grabs you, her strength the only thing holding you upright. She half-drags, half-carries you past the stunned Sith, sprinting down the dark, disintegrating corridor toward the rendezvous.
Vela drags you through the pitch-black, shuddering corridor. Your consciousness is a pinpoint, a flickering candle flame about to be extinguished. The rasp of your breathing is shallow, desperate. The world is a cacophony of groaning metal and explosions that you feel rather than hear. Vela is a pillar of strength, her grip on your arm the only thing tethering you to reality.
You burst out of the corridor and into a vast hangar bay. The huge energy shield that separates it from the void is flickering violently, its integrity failing. Through the shimmering, transparent wall, you can see the Sith destroyer, impossibly close, its hull dotted with the angry lights of weapon emplacements.
And there, hovering twenty meters away, its boarding ramp lowered like a prayer, is the Nightfall.
Its landing lights cut through the gloom, illuminating a scene of chaos. Lin’s voice, which you can’t hear but Vela can, is a frantic scream over the comms.
Vela doesn't slow down. She half-drags, half-throws you across the final stretch of deck. You stumble, your legs giving out completely. You are crawling the last few meters, your vision tunneling into a single point of light: the open ramp of your ship.
You collapse onto the ramp just as Vela scrambles aboard. She turns and grabs you under the arms, pulling you inside with the last of her strength.
"GO, LIN! GO!" she roars.
The ramp snaps shut behind you, sealing you in blessed, stable silence just as the hangar's energy shield finally collapses with a silent, blinding flash. The Nightfall lurches, throwing you both against the wall as Lin opens the throttle to full.
Through the cockpit viewport, you see a star being born where the station once was. A silent, expanding sphere of incandescent white light consumes everything—the hangar, the debris, and the arrogant, overconfident Sith destroyer that had been sent to claim you.
Then the shockwave hits.
The Nightfall is tossed like a leaf in a hurricane. Alarms blare. The lights flicker and die, then come back on. You are thrown across the hold, the world a tumble of G-forces and vertigo. From the cockpit, you hear Lin shouting, cursing, fighting the controls with a desperate ferocity.
And then, as suddenly as it began, the turbulence stops. The only sound is the steady, reassuring hum of the ship's engines.
Silence reigns.
Vela rips her helmet off, her face pale, slick with sweat, her hair plastered to her forehead. She scrambles to your side, her hands moving with frantic efficiency to unseal your helmet. She pulls it off, and the cool, recycled air of the ship washes over your face. You take a deep, shuddering gasp, your oxygen-starved lungs burning.
You are alive.
You have won. You faced down an Inquisitor, a Sith Lord, and a Force abomination. You left a trail of chaos and wreckage in your wake, and you survived.
Exhausted, battered, but victorious, you lie on the cold deck of the Nightfall, watching through the viewport as the brilliant, beautiful funeral pyre of your enemies fades into the star-dusted blackness of space. You are free.
For now.
The silence in the Nightfall is a stark contrast to the chaos of the last few hours. The only sounds are the steady thrum of the hyperdrive, the frantic but quiet tapping of Lin’s fingers on his console, and your own ragged breathing. You are lying on the cold deck of the hold, the world slowly coming back into focus. Vela is kneeling beside you, her helmet off, her expression a mixture of profound exhaustion and something you've never seen from her before—a deep, unsettling uncertainty.
"His vitals are stabilizing," Lin calls from the cockpit, his voice strained but steady. "Heart rate is still erratic, but he's out of the red. We're clear. No pursuit. The jump was clean." He lets out a long, shuddering breath. "We... we actually made it."
Vela looks down at you, her intense gaze searching your face. "You need rest," she says, her voice softer than you're used to. "What you did back there... it wasn't a fight. It was... an exorcism. I have never seen power like that." She looks away, toward the swirling blue of hyperspace. "The Sith teach that peace is a lie. That passion is strength. You..." She trails off, unable to finish the thought, the foundations of her life's philosophy cracking under the weight of what she witnessed.
The immediate danger has passed, but the cost is etched on all of you. You are adrift, a tiny island of survivors in the vast ocean of the galaxy. You have won an impossible victory, but in doing so, you have struck a blow against a power far greater than a single Sith Lord or his destroyer.
"Hold on," Lin says suddenly, his voice sharp, pulling you from your thoughts. "I'm picking something up. A high-priority, encrypted broadcast. It's not standard Sith military comms; the encryption is ancient, layered... fanatical. It's repeating on a tight beam, aimed at the core worlds."
He works furiously, his face illuminated by scrolling lines of intricate code. "Got it," he breathes, his eyes wide. He patches the decrypted audio through to the ship's internal comms. The voice that speaks is cold, cultured, and filled with a chilling, absolute conviction.
"...to all loyalists of the Order of Unbroken Truth. The Destroyer Harbinger is lost. The asset containment facility known as the Vehemence module is confirmed destroyed. Acolyte-Inquisitor Vesper's mission to purge the Force anomaly has failed. Her status is unknown, presumed lost in the service of the Truth."
There's a pause, and the voice seems to drop, taking on a tone of pure venom.
"The anomaly, now designated 'Anathema Kaelen,' is confirmed responsible. He and his accomplices are declared heretics against the True Sith Way. Their doctrine of 'peace' is a contagion that must be scoured from this galaxy. All agents of the Order are commanded to abandon their current posts. Your new purpose is the Hunt. Find the Anathema. Dissect his power. Erase his memory from the stars. A muster point has been established on the forgotten moon of Dromund Fels. Vesper's failure will be redeemed in a crucible of fire and faith."
The message ends, leaving a heavy, chilling silence in its wake. Lin looks back at you, his face pale.
"The 'Order of Unbroken Truth,'" he whispers. "I've only heard rumors. A zealot faction within the Sith Intelligence, dedicated to ancient ideology. They believe the current Sith Empire is too... political. Too soft. Vesper wasn't just an agent, Kaelen. She was a missionary for a death cult. And you've just been declared their devil."
You are no longer just fugitives. You are heretics. The target of a holy war. The Sith Empire might have lost track of you, but Vesper's people now have a name, a purpose, and a rallying point. They will be more relentless, more fanatical, and more unpredictable than any military force.
“We need to evacuate Dantana. If they know my name, they will start their search there, same as we did. How fast can we get there?”
The words hang in the silent, humming air of the hyperspace tunnel. Your decision is made. Not to run, not to attack, but to protect.
Vela pushes herself up from the floor, her movements stiff with exhaustion. She looks at you, her expression a mask of hardened pragmatism. "Evacuate?" she says, her voice low and sharp. "An entire tribe of settlers in a stealth ship built for three? That's not a rescue, Kaelen. That's a relocation. Where would we even take them? We're the most wanted people in their territory."
From the cockpit, Lin spins his chair around. "I... I agree with Vela," he says, his loyalty to you warring with the brutal logic of the situation. "Going back is a risk. We'd be leading the hunters right to their door. But..." He turns back to his console, his fingers flying across the navicomputer. "To answer your question... we're not far. The Nightfall took a beating from that shockwave; I can't push the hyperdrive past ninety percent without risking a catastrophic failure. But Dantana is off the main hyperlanes. Best possible speed... we can be there in six standard hours."
Six hours. It feels like a lifetime and no time at all.
Vela crosses her arms, her gaze intense. "Six hours to do what? Convince fifty people to abandon the only home they have? Herd them onto a ship that can't carry them? We have two options when we arrive. We either warn them and leave them to their fate, or we help them dig in for a fight they can't possibly win. An evacuation is a fantasy."
The cold, hard facts of your predicament settle in. Your desire to protect these people is running headfirst into the wall of reality. The Nightfall is not a transport ship. The Forgotten are settlers and refugees, not soldiers. And the enemy is a fanatical order of Sith zealots who will burn a world to get to you.
You are going to Dantana. That much is decided. But your objective when you arrive is now critically unclear.
You nod slowly, the grim reality of the situation settling over you. "You're right," you say, your voice resonating with a quiet authority that commands both of them to listen. "Then let's take a moment and think this through before we make our move. We can’t evacuate them, and we aren’t strong enough to fight a war right now. And we certainly can’t do anything at all if we’re dead. We need to rest, regroup, and make a plan. If we can’t save them outright, can we at least warn them?"
Vela visibly relaxes, the tension in her shoulders easing slightly. You've chosen caution over a suicidal charge. "A warning is better than nothing," she concedes. "It gives them the choice to flee or to fight. To die on their feet rather than their knees."
"A warning is a start," Lin adds from the cockpit, swiveling his chair to face you. "And I might have an idea. It's a long shot, but... it's better than walking in empty-handed."
He taps a few commands into his console, and a schematic of the Dantana Enclave appears on a secondary monitor, showing the layout you explored.
"When we were there," he continues, "Jocian mentioned that the Enclave was built on a site of great natural power. That's why the Jedi chose it. That power is dormant, but the infrastructure is still there. If I can get into the Enclave's primary control system, I might be able to reactivate some of its ancient defenses. We're not talking about planetary shields, but localized energy barriers, automated turrets... things that could turn a valley into a fortress. It wouldn't stop a full-scale invasion, but it would make any ground assault incredibly costly for them. It could buy the Forgotten precious time."
He looks up, his expression a mixture of hope and deep-seated caution. "The problem is, these systems are millennia old. The interface will be archaic. I'd need to be on-site, directly plugged into the master conduit in those hidden chambers where you trained. It would take time, and I'd be completely exposed while I worked."
The seeds of a new, desperate plan begin to form. It is not an evacuation, nor is it a declaration of war. It is a gift of time, a chance for the Forgotten to fortify themselves against the coming storm.
The next six hours in hyperspace are a tense, focused calm. While you and Vela tend to your wounds and force yourselves to get some much-needed rest, Lin works tirelessly, studying the fragmented schematics, building custom slicer programs designed to interface with ancient Jedi technology.
As the Nightfall finally drops out of hyperspace, the beautiful, vibrant world of Dantana fills the viewport. It is a picture of peace, a stark contrast to the darkness that is inevitably coming its way.
"We're here," Lin announces, his voice low. "No signs of any other ships in the system. For now, we're alone."
"No plan is perfect," you say, your voice filling the quiet cockpit. "And we seem good at rolling with the punches. Let's get to work."
Lin nods, a determined set to his jaw. He guides the Nightfall through Dantana's atmosphere, its stealth systems engaged. The ship glides like a silent specter over the lush, green plains and colossal, ancient trees. You land in the hidden clearing near the Enclave ruins, the same spot you left what feels like a lifetime ago. The air that fills the ship when the ramp lowers is clean, damp, and smells of wet earth and alien blossoms—a scent of peace that now feels fragile and threatened.
Your arrival does not go unnoticed. As the three of you step onto the vibrant grass, you are met by Jocian, the Twi'lek Keeper, and Roric, the stern leader of the Forgotten. Their expressions are wary.
"Kaelen," Jocian says, her voice calm but laced with concern. "Your return is unexpected. The Force around you feels... different. Quieter. The great storm you went to face... is it over?"
You meet her gaze, the weight of your news heavy in your heart. "The Chimera is gone, Jocian. But in destroying it, we've stirred a different nest. A cult of Sith fanatics, calling themselves the 'Order of Unbroken Truth,' know who I am and where I came from. They will come here. Not to conquer, but to purge. To erase every trace of my existence."
Roric steps forward, his hand resting on the hilt of his vibro-ax. He is a protector, and the threat in your words is palpable. "You bring a death sentence to my people," he says, his voice a low growl. It is not an accusation, but a stark statement of fact.
"And we've come to help you fight it," Vela interjects, her voice sharp and direct. She respects strength, and Roric's bluntness earns more of her regard than any diplomat's plea.
Lin steps forward, holding up his datapad. "We can't evacuate you, and we can't fight an army for you," he explains, cutting straight to the practicalities. "But this Enclave has teeth. Old ones, but they might still be sharp. I believe I can reactivate the ancient defense systems—energy barriers, automated sentry turrets. I can turn this valley into a fortress. It won't make you invincible, but it will make them bleed for every inch they take."
Jocian looks from Lin's datapad to the haunting ruins of the Enclave, then to you. A deep understanding dawns in her eyes. "The Jedi built this place not just as a sanctuary, but as a bastion. The systems he speaks of are real. But they have slept for centuries."
Roric looks at his people, who have begun to gather at a distance, their faces filled with fear and uncertainty. He then looks at the ruins, and finally, at you. "You would do this? Risk yourselves for us, when you could simply flee?"
"This is my home," you say simply. "You are my people. We will not abandon you."
The gruff leader's expression softens for a fraction of a second. He gives a curt, decisive nod. "Then get to work, slicer. We will guard the valley. You," he says, his gaze falling on you and Vela, "will guard him. My people will show you the passages and help where they can, but the heart of that place... that is your domain."
The alliance is forged. The plan is in motion. You, Vela, and Lin head back toward the hidden chambers of the Enclave, this time not for training, but for a desperate fortification against a coming tide of darkness. The fate of Dantana rests on your shoulders.
You descend once more into the still, ancient chambers of the Dantana Enclave. The air is the same—cool, smelling of stone and earth—but the atmosphere is entirely different. Last time, this was a place of learning and discovery. Now, it is a command center for a coming war.
Lin moves with a feverish intensity you've never seen before. He finds the master conduit Jocian spoke of, a thick, coiling bundle of crystalline cables set behind a panel in the wall of the main training chamber. "This is it," he breathes, his eyes wide with a mixture of reverence and technical hunger. "The architecture is... beautiful. Inefficient, but beautiful."
He connects his datapad, and the familiar amber cascade of code fills his screen, a stark, modern intrusion into the ancient serenity of the room. "I'm in," he murmurs, his focus absolute. "But the core systems are locked down tight. I'm seeing layers of Jedi encryption that are more like philosophical puzzles than code. This is going to take time."
As Lin works, his face illuminated by the glow of his datapad, you and Vela take up guard positions. You stand at the entrance to the chamber, watching the main corridor, while Vela moves to a secondary passage, her sharp eyes scanning the shadows. The Forgotten have established a perimeter around the ruins, their hardened sentries moving silently through the colossal trees, but you are the last line of defense for the man trying to save them all.
Hours pass. The only sounds are the frantic tapping of Lin's fingers, the distant calls of alien birds, and the low hum of the now-awakening Enclave systems. The light panels on the walls begin to flicker with a soft, blue-white light. A deep, resonant thrum vibrates up from the floor, the sound of ancient machinery stirring from a long slumber.
"I'm making progress," Lin announces, his voice tight with concentration. "I've bypassed the primary ethics protocols—sorry, Jocian—and I'm into the defense grid. I'm seeing schematics for retractable kinetic barriers, sonic stun emitters, and... oh, hello there... a series of automated laser cannon turrets built directly into the valley walls. This place wasn't a temple. It was a fortress."
He continues to work, his brow furrowed. "But the power core is unstable. It's been dormant for too long. I can bring the systems online, but I can't guarantee they'll stay that way. I need to divert power carefully, or the whole grid could short out."
Suddenly, a new sound cuts through the quiet hum. A high-pitched, piercing whine that echoes from the sky outside. It's the sound of starship engines, descending fast.
Your blood runs cold. You exchange a look with Vela. It's too soon.
"Lin," Vela says into her comm, her voice dangerously calm. "We have company."
"I see them," Lin replies, his voice strained. A tactical display appears on a secondary screen beside him. "It's one ship. A single shuttle, old design... a Gage-class transport. It's not Sith. It's... it's broadcasting an old Republic diplomatic code. It's landing in the main courtyard."
You are faced with a new, unknown variable. The Sith were a predictable threat. This is something else entirely. An old Republic shuttle, arriving unannounced, just as you prepare for a siege. It could be a coincidence, a lost pilot, or something far more complicated.
"What are your orders, Kaelen?" Vela asks, her hand resting on the hilt of her lightsaber. "Do we greet them, or do we hide?"
"Lin, stay here. Get those defenses online. Roric, have your people stay out of sight," you command, your voice echoing with quiet authority in the ancient chamber. "Vela, you're with me. Let's greet our guests."
Lin gives a curt nod, his attention already back on the streams of code, his work now imbued with a new, frantic urgency. Vela meets your gaze, her own sharp nod a silent affirmation. She trusts your judgment. Together, you move from the cool darkness of the Enclave ruins out into the bright, open air of the main courtyard.
The Gage-class transport is an old but well-maintained vessel, its hull showing the signs of long journeys through rough space. It sits in the center of the courtyard, its ramp lowered, an island of archaic technology amidst the haunting beauty of the reclaimed Jedi temple. The air is thick with tension. The Forgotten are ghosts in the trees, silent and unseen.
You and Vela stop a dozen meters from the ramp, side-by-side. You stand with your hands empty, your posture open but wary. Vela stands slightly behind you, a coiled spring of deadly potential, her hand hovering inches from the hilt of her lightsaber.
From the shadowed interior of the shuttle, a figure emerges.
He is an elderly Togruta, his montrals and head-tails long and marked with the wisdom of age. He wears the simple, sand-colored robes of a Jedi Master, his movements slow and deliberate. His face is a mask of serene contemplation, but his eyes—sharp and intelligent—miss nothing. They scan the ruins, the shuttle, and finally, they settle on the two of you.
He descends the ramp and walks slowly toward you, his hands clasped within the sleeves of his robes. He stops, his gaze analytical, piercing.
"I have traveled far," the Togruta Master says, his voice a calm, resonant baritone that seems to command the very air to be still. "I felt a great wound in the Force, a screaming void, suddenly fall silent. And in its place, I felt this sanctuary awaken from its slumber. Such events are not coincidence. I have come to see what manner of beings could cause such ripples."
His piercing eyes fall upon you, Kaelen, and they widen slightly in recognition. "There is a light in you... a tranquility. A signature in the Force I have not felt since I last spoke with your Master, Leona."
Then, his gaze shifts to Vela, and his serene expression hardens into one of profound sorrow and steely resolve. "And I feel a shadow clinging to you, a darkness that reeks of the Sith creed."
With a movement too swift for his age, his hand drops from his sleeve, and a lightsaber hilt leaps into his palm. A brilliant emerald blade ignites with a sharp snap-hiss, casting a green glow on his weathered face. He doesn't take an aggressive stance, but a defensive one, the blade held steady between you and him.
"This is a place of peace, yet I find a Jedi anomaly and a Sith exile standing guard over it," the Master says, his voice now cold as stone. "Explain yourselves."
You stand your ground, your posture open and unarmed, a stark contrast to the coiled readiness of Vela and the defensive stance of the Togruta Master. You project not the pacifying void of the Sanctuary Field, but an aura of pure, unadulterated sincerity.
“We are not your enemy, Master Jedi,” you say, your voice calm and respectful, resonating with a truth that cuts through the tension. “This place of peace was my home. I return to defend her and her people from an enemy I regretfully created. Stand down. I will answer your questions truthfully.”
The emerald blade does not waver, but the old Master’s eyes narrow, studying you with an intensity that seems to peel back the layers of your soul. He can feel the truth in your words, the lack of deception, and it conflicts with the evidence before him—the presence of a Sith at your side.
“You speak of home, yet you were a ghost to this place for decades,” the Togruta replies, his voice still edged with steel. “You speak of peace, yet you travel with a shadow. The dark side is a taint. It does not ‘stand down.’ It waits for weakness.”
Vela stiffens at his words, a low growl rumbling in her chest, but she does not move. Her discipline holds. She trusts you to handle this.
“The shadow you feel is a woman who has saved my life more times than I can count,” you counter, your gaze unwavering. “She has faced down her own masters and chosen a new path. A harder one. You see a Sith. I see an ally who has earned my trust. Trust that is not given lightly.”
You take a small, deliberate step forward, a gesture of vulnerability. “My name is Kaelen. I was a student here before the Sith took me. They twisted me, tried to make me a weapon. I escaped, and in doing so, I have drawn the wrath of a fanatical Sith order. They are coming to Dantana not to conquer it, but to burn it from the galaxy to hide their failure. The people here, the Forgotten… they will be caught in the fire.”
You gesture to the Enclave ruins around you. “We are not here to fight. We are here to prepare. To give these people a chance to survive the storm that I have brought to their doorstep. We are trying to awaken the defenses of this fortress.”
Slowly, deliberately, the Togruta Master extinguishes his lightsaber. The brilliant green blade retracts with a soft hiss, plunging the courtyard back into the natural light of Dantana’s sun. He clips the hilt back to his belt, his gaze never leaving yours.
“I am Master Zhar Lestin,” he says, his voice now devoid of its earlier hostility, replaced by a deep, weary gravitas. “And I was a contemporary of your Master Leona. I felt her loss from across the galaxy. To find her student alive, returned to his purpose… it is a great and unexpected miracle.”
He looks past you, at the silent trees where the Forgotten are hiding, then back to you. “You speak the truth. I can feel it. But the truth you speak of is a dark one. An entire order of zealots… this is a threat beyond a tribe of refugees and two castaways. You cannot face this alone.”
Master Zhar Lestin clasps his hands behind his back, his serene demeanor returning, but now it is underscored by a powerful resolve. “You have offered me truth. Now, I offer you a choice. Allow me to help. I will stand with you. My blade and my knowledge of the Force are at your disposal. Together, we may yet turn this fortress back into the bastion it was meant to be.”
A genuine smile touches your lips for the first time since you arrived, a small beacon of hope in the growing twilight. You offer Master Zhar a respectful bow, an acknowledgment of his station and a gesture of acceptance.
“We welcome your help and wisdom, Zhar Lestin,” you say, your voice warm with relief. “If you do not trust us, trust that we desire the safety of this temple and everyone in it. Come, we can bring you up to speed inside.”
Zhar returns the bow with a slow, deliberate nod. “Trust is a seed that must be nurtured with action,” he replies, his voice laced with the wisdom of a long life. “But I can see the soil here is fertile. Lead on, Kaelen.”
As you turn, Vela gives the old Master a final, wary look before melting back into the shadows of the Enclave entrance. Zhar’s eyes follow her, a hint of sorrow in his gaze, but he says nothing more.
You lead him back into the cool, quiet chambers of the ruin. The hum of the awakening systems is stronger now, the light panels casting a steady, soft glow. You find Lin hunched over his console, sweat beading on his brow, the air around him crackling with a barely contained energy.
“Lin, status update,” you say.
Lin jumps, startled, and spins around. He sees Zhar and his eyes go wide. “Master Jedi,” he stammers, looking from Zhar to you, his confusion palpable.
“He’s with us,” you say simply.
Lin visibly relaxes, wiping a grimy hand across his forehead. “Good,” he breathes. “Because I could use a miracle worker right now. I’ve managed to get the main power core stabilized and have reactivated the primary kinetic barriers at the valley entrances. They’ll hold against orbital bombardment for a while, at least.”
He points a trembling finger at his screen, which is now displaying a complex, three-dimensional map of the valley, crisscrossed with glowing energy conduits. “But the sentry turrets are a nightmare. They’re tied to a central targeting matrix that’s locked behind a layer of Jedi meditative encryption. It’s not code. It’s… philosophy. I can’t slice it. I need a key, a command phrase, a meditative state… something. Without it, the guns will never fire.”
Zhar Lestin steps forward, peering at the screen over Lin’s shoulder. He places a hand on the young slicer’s back, and Lin visibly calms under the Jedi Master’s serene presence.
“This is not a system to be bypassed, young one,” Zhar says, his voice a low, instructional hum. “It is a system to be communed with. The Jedi of this era believed that a weapon should only be wielded with pure intent. The guns will not fire for a command. They will fire for a cause.”
He turns to you, his ancient eyes filled with a new understanding. “This is your domain, Kaelen. The system does not require a password. It requires a statement of purpose. A declaration, in the Force, of what you are fighting to protect. You must commune with the heart of the Enclave and give it your truth. Only then will it recognize you as its master and unleash its arsenal.”
The path forward is clear, but it is not a technical one. The fate of the Enclave’s defenses rests not on Lin’s skill, but on your ability to connect with the spirit of the place you once called home.
You are the key. The realization settles over you not with a sense of ego, but with the quiet weight of responsibility.
You close your eyes. The concerned faces of your allies, the humming console, the ancient stone walls—it all fades away. You do not reach for the overwhelming totality of the Sanctuary Field. Instead, you sink into that familiar, quiet pool of peace at your core. You let your consciousness expand outward, gently probing the world around you, not as a conqueror, but as a supplicant.
You feel the life force of your friends—Lin's frantic, brilliant mind; Vela's coiled, disciplined power; Zhar's deep, steady calm. You feel the fear and hope of the Forgotten hiding in the trees outside. But you push past it all, reaching deeper, into the very stones of the Enclave.
You find it. It is not a voice or a ghost, but a vast, sleeping consciousness woven into the very fabric of the place. It is the collected will and intent of every Jedi who lived, taught, and died here. It is the spirit of the Enclave.
You do not send a command. You make a humble request, a prayer from the heart of your own peace.
I am Kaelen. I was lost, and now I am returned. This place is my home. Its people are my charge. I have brought a great darkness to this valley, a shadow born from my own suffering. I cannot face it alone. I ask for your help. I ask for the shields to protect the innocent and the swords to hold back the tide. I ask you to entrust me with the strength of this fortress, to safeguard the lives and the knowledge within.
You pause, opening your will completely, offering yourself in return.
What do you require of me? What payment is needed for this gift?
The response comes not in words, but in a wave of pure, ancient understanding that floods your soul. It is the collected wisdom of a thousand Jedi Masters, a chorus of serene voices speaking as one.
There is no price. There is no payment.
There is only a sacred duty. The fortress will defend you, but you must defend its heart. The consciousness shows you a vision—not of the past, but of a possible, terrible future. It shows you the Sith fanatics, the Order of Unbroken Truth, breaching the outer defenses. They are not focused on the settlers. They are storming the Enclave, seeking to defile it, to corrupt its spirit, to turn this place of light into a monument of their dark victory.
The Enclave's spirit is not a god to be appeased; it is a legacy to be protected. The weapons are yours to command, but you must be the final guardian of the flame.
You open your eyes.
On Lin’s console, the red lock symbols beside the automated turret controls flicker, one by one, and turn a steady, brilliant green. Across the valley, silent and unseen, heavy durasteel panels retract, revealing the sleek, deadly forms of laser cannons, now gleaming in the fading sunlight. They hum with newly channeled power, their targeting sensors active and alert.
The fortress has answered your call.
"It is done," Zhar Lestin says, his voice filled with awe. He places a hand on your shoulder. "The spirit of the Enclave has chosen you as its champion. It will fight for you."
Lin stares at his screen, his mouth agape. "The entire defense grid is online," he whispers, his voice trembling. "Kinetic barriers are at one hundred percent. All turret batteries are active and responding. Kaelen... you didn't just unlock it. You are the system admin."
Vela looks from the console to you, a new, profound respect in her eyes. She has witnessed your power to pacify. Now she has seen your power to command.
The bastion is armed. The people are sheltered. The allies are united. All that is left is the arrival of the storm.
You draw a deep, steadying breath, the hum of the now-active Enclave a resonant thrum in your very bones. The power is yours, but you can feel its immensity, a vast and ancient arsenal waiting for a single will to guide it. It requires more than a plea; it requires absolute focus.
“Lin, maintain status updates and coordinate comms,” you say, your voice calm and clear, a commander issuing orders for the final defense. “Let us know the second anything enters this system.”
Lin snaps to attention, his earlier awe replaced by a sharp, professional focus. “You got it, Kaelen. I’m your eyes and ears.”
You turn to the old Jedi Master, your expression one of complete trust. “Zhar, I trust you to protect the people. Organize the defense with Roric. You know their strengths better than I do.”
Zhar Lestin bows his head, a gesture of profound respect. “It will be done. We will hold the valley until the last. The Force is with us this day.” He turns and strides from the chamber, his purpose clear, his presence a beacon of hope for the waiting settlers.
Finally, you look at Vela. She stands like a statue of carved obsidian, her fierce loyalty a palpable shield around you. “Vela, you cover me. I need to meditate deeply to fully control this. I'll be the sword and shield of this valley, but I’ll be blind and deaf to the world. I need you to be my anchor.”
A faint, grim smile touches her lips. “I will not let anything touch you,” she says, the words an unbreakable vow. She moves to the entrance of the chamber, her back to you, her gaze fixed on the corridor. She is the guardian at the gate.
You settle onto the cold stone floor in the center of the chamber, the very spot where you first learned to master your peace. You close your eyes, and this time, you do not sink into the quiet pool within. You reach out, your consciousness merging with the vast, awakened spirit of the Enclave itself.
Your senses expand beyond your own body. You are no longer just Kaelen. You are the valley. You can feel every leaf on every ancient tree, every blade of grass, every hidden sentry waiting in the shadows. You can feel the kinetic barriers shimmering at the valley entrances, a silent, invisible promise of defiance. Your awareness flows into the targeting sensors of every automated turret, their cold, analytical view of the world becoming your own.
You have become the ghost in the machine. The living will of the fortress.
The sun sets on Dantana. The hours pass in a tense, silent vigil. All is quiet. All is ready.
And then, you feel it.
A tremor in the Force. A stain on the quiet tapestry of the night sky. Lin’s voice, distant and muffled, confirms what you already know.
“Multiple contacts dropping out of hyperspace,” he reports to Vela. “They’re here.”
In the darkness of the chamber, you do not move. Your eyes remain closed. But across the valley, dozens of hidden laser cannons pivot as one, their targeting lasers painting unseen targets in the sky.
The Hunt has arrived. The Siege of Dantana has begun.
Your consciousness is the valley. The approaching ships are not just blips on a screen; they are discordant, hateful notes in the grand symphony of the Force. You feel their dark purpose, the cold, fanatical zeal of the Order of Unbroken Truth.
“Three ships,” Lin’s voice crackles through the comms to Vela, a frantic report from the front line of the digital war. “One larger vessel, a Terminus-class destroyer acting as a command ship, and two Gage-class transports, just like Zhar’s. They’re launching their ground assault forces. No orbital bombardment. They want this place intact.”
From your meditative state, you see it all. Dozens of drop-pods, black against the star-dusted sky, scream through the atmosphere, aimed directly at the two main entrances to the valley. They are arrogant, confident, expecting no resistance.
They are about to be re-educated.
“Vela,” you murmur, your voice barely a whisper in the stone chamber, but your intent is a roar across the defense network. “Tell Lin to reinforce the western barrier. They’re focusing their main assault there.”
They think it is the weaker approach. They are wrong.
As the first wave of drop-pods hits the shimmering, invisible kinetic barrier, the valley erupts. The kinetic shields flare with brilliant, golden energy, repelling the assault craft with bone-jarring force. Pods are thrown back, tumbling out of control to crash into the rocky cliffsides.
Before the Sith can recover from the shock, you unleash the fortress’s fury.
“Fire,” you breathe.
From hidden emplacements all across the valley, a storm of laser fire scythes through the night. Beams of incandescent energy, guided by your singular will, lance into the sky. They don't just target the drop-pods; they anticipate their trajectories, leading them, turning the sky into a web of lethal light. The night is filled with the silent, brilliant flashes of pods being vaporized, their armor peeling away like fruit.
“Direct hits!” Lin shouts, his voice a mixture of disbelief and savage joy. “Their first wave is annihilated! They’re regrouping, trying to find a gap in the coverage.”
But there are no gaps. There is only you.
The Sith command ship, seeing its initial assault shattered, changes tactics. It launches a wave of heavy bombers, flying low and fast, attempting to overwhelm a single section of the shield with sustained firepower.
You feel their approach, a spear of focused hatred aimed at the northern ridge. You divert power from the southern defenses, shunting it all to the north. At the same time, you awaken a new system—the sonic emitters Lin discovered.
As the bombers roar over the ridge, they are hit by a wave of pure, focused sound. The pilots are stunned, their controls unresponsive. Their payloads of plasma bombs are shaken loose, detonating harmlessly against the overcharged shield. The bombers themselves, now flying blind, slam into the mountainsides.
It is a massacre. You are a phantom conductor leading an orchestra of destruction, and your music is a hymn of defiance.
“They’re pulling back,” Lin reports, his voice filled with awe. “All assault craft are returning to the destroyer. They... they don't know what they're facing.”
A moment of quiet settles over the valley. You have won the first engagement, decisively and brutally. But as you feel the fury and confusion emanating from the Sith command ship, you know this is far from over. They will not be so arrogant next time. They will adapt. They will send their most powerful weapon.
You feel a new presence gathering on the bridge of the destroyer. A being of immense power and cold, analytical rage. The Hunt Master. He is reaching out with the Force, searching not for defenses, but for the mind that controls them. He is searching for you.
The battle for the valley is over. The duel of wills is about to begin.
You don’t wait for the attack. The moment you feel the probing tendrils of the Hunt Master’s consciousness, you retreat.
Your awareness pulls back from the network of turrets and emitters, receding from the leaves and stones of the valley. You draw all of your focus inward, sinking deep into the profound, unassailable silence of your inner sanctum. The vast, complex machine of the Enclave’s defense grid is left on standby, its power humming, waiting. You sheath your sword and raise your shield.
You brace your mind, not by building walls, but by becoming a void. You empty yourself of fear, of hope, of aggression, of everything but pure, passive existence. You become a mirror, a placid lake reflecting the sky, showing nothing of the deep, cold water beneath.
The mental onslaught arrives.
It is not the raw, chaotic agony of the Chimera. This is a weapon of exquisite and terrible precision. The Hunt Master is a master of mental warfare, and his attack is a surgeon’s blade.
He doesn’t show you visions of pain. He shows you logic.
A projection floods your mind: a tactical map of the galaxy. He shows you the unstoppable might of the Sith Empire, the sheer, overwhelming numbers. He shows you fleets, armies, entire worlds subjugated. He whispers the undeniable truth of your situation: You cannot win. Your struggle is a statistical anomaly, a brief, violent flicker before the inevitable dark.


He shifts tactics, preying on your compassion. You see the faces of the Forgotten—Roric, his family, the children. You see them huddling in the caves, their fear a palpable scent. The Hunt Master’s voice echoes in your mind, cold and reasonable: Their suffering is your fault. Every moment you resist, you prolong their terror. Your defiance is not nobility; it is cruelty. Surrender, and they will be spared. Their deaths are a price you are forcing them to pay for your pride.


Finally, he turns your own nature against you. He shows you the smoldering wreckage of the Sith Destroyer you destroyed, the vacant, confused faces of the Sith soldiers you pacified. He doesn’t accuse you of malice. He accuses you of hypocrisy. You claim peace, yet you are an agent of chaos. You bring war and death wherever you go. You destroyed the Chimera, but you have become the new monster, a walking cataclysm disguised as a savior. Your ‘sanctuary’ is a weapon, and you are its deluded, self-righteous wielder.


Each argument is a carefully crafted spear, designed to find the cracks in your resolve, to turn your strength into a weakness. He is not trying to break your mind with fear, but to dismantle your spirit with doubt.
From the entrance of the chamber, Vela watches you. She can see the sweat beading on your forehead, the faint tremor in your hands. She knows you are locked in a battle far more dangerous than the one that just raged in the skies. She grips her lightsaber, a silent, helpless guardian.
The Hunt Master’s psychic pressure intensifies, seeking a response, a flicker of anger, a seed of doubt he can latch onto and exploit.
He is trying to force you to fight. He wants you to push back, to argue, to defend your beliefs.
But you do not.
You remain the placid lake. You let his arguments, his logic, his accusations wash over you. They are stones skipping across your surface, creating ripples but never touching the depths. You do not engage. You do not resist. You simply… endure.
You offer him nothing. No anger. No fear. No doubt.
You offer him only peace.
A wave of pure, frustrated rage emanates from the orbiting destroyer. The psychic probe, finding no purchase, no weakness to exploit, retracts with a vicious snap.
You have weathered his storm. You have met his blade with nothing, and you have won.
The duel is over. For a moment, there is silence.
Then, from the comms unit on Vela’s belt, Lin’s voice screams. “Kaelen! He’s coming! The Hunt Master—he’s left the command ship in a personal shuttle. He’s descending himself. He’s coming for you!”
You open your eyes. The deep, meditative calm does not leave you, but it is now sharpened by a current of cold, hard purpose. The psychic duel is over; the physical confrontation is about to begin. You rise to your feet, not with the weariness of a man who has just endured a mental siege, but with the steady, fluid grace of a weapon being drawn from its sheath.
You turn your gaze to Vela. She stands silhouetted in the chamber's entrance, the faint, humming light of the Enclave glinting off the hilt of her lightsaber. She has been your silent guardian, a warrior forced to stand still, an experience that must have been its own form of torture for her. Now, the waiting is over.
“Are you with me?” you ask, your voice quiet but resonating with the full weight of the coming battle.
Vela doesn’t answer with words. She answers with action.
With a movement too fast for the eye to follow, the lightsaber leaps from her belt into her hand. A blade of pure, brilliant crimson ignites with a hungry, vibrating snap-hiss, flooding the ancient Jedi chamber with its blood-red light. The color is a defiant sacrilege in this place of peace, a declaration of who she is and what she is about to do.
She turns to face you, and in the demonic glow of her blade, you see not a Sith, not an exile, but a warrior who has made her choice. Her face is a mask of lethal focus, her eyes burning with an intensity that mirrors your own calm resolve.
“To the last,” she says, her voice a low, vicious promise.
It is all the answer you need.
You turn and stride toward the chamber entrance, back into the open air of the Enclave courtyard. Vela falls into step beside you, her crimson blade held ready, its violent hum the only sound in the night.
In the sky above, a single star descends, growing brighter and larger. It is the Hunt Master’s shuttle, a dagger aimed at the heart of the valley.
Lin’s frantic voice cuts through the comm on Vela’s belt. “He’s bypassing the outer defenses! His shuttle's shields are military-grade; the turrets can’t get a lock! He's heading directly for the main courtyard!”
You and Vela stop in the center of the courtyard, the same spot where you greeted Zhar Lestin. This time, there will be no words, no diplomacy.
The shuttle screams overhead, its engines tearing through the quiet night air. It lands with a heavy, grinding crunch of metal on stone, its ramp slamming down before the engines have even fully powered down.
From the darkness of the shuttle's interior, a figure emerges, silhouetted against the harsh light from within. He is tall and broad-shouldered, clad in ornate, black-and-silver Sith battle armor that marks him as a warrior of high rank. He holds no weapon. His power radiates from him in waves of palpable cold and disciplined rage.
The Hunt Master has arrived. He takes a slow, deliberate step onto the ancient stones of the courtyard, his eyes locking onto yours. He sees you, the source of his frustration, the anomaly he cannot break. Then his gaze shifts to Vela and her ignited crimson blade.
A slow, cruel smile spreads across his face.
“So,” the Hunt Master says, his voice a deep, resonant baritone that drips with contempt. “The great anomaly who preaches peace stands beside a common traitor, ready for a brawl. Your hypocrisy is even more magnificent in person.”
He raises a hand, and a lightsaber hilt, intricately carved and wickedly sharp, leaps from his belt into his waiting grasp. With a sound like tearing reality, a blade of pure, blinding white energy ignites, stark and absolute.
“I am Darth Rictus, the Hand of the Order,” he declares, his voice booming across the courtyard. “And I have come to personally correct your heresy.”
The Hunt Master's taunt hangs in the cold night air, but you do not rise to the bait. Instead, you answer with an identity that is wholly your own, a declaration of all that you are.
“I am The Anomaly, Anathema Kaelen of Dantana, designated: Cipher Null,” you say, your voice resonating with a calm, immense power that pushes back against the Sith Lord's oppressive aura. You raise your hands, and the air around them shimmers and coalesces. The perfect, still peace of your Sanctuary Field solidifies into two shimmering, semi-translucent gloves of pure force, extending to your forearms. They are not weapons of aggression, but tools of absolute nullification.
“And my peace…” you finish, dropping into a fluid, ready combat stance, “throws hands.”
The moment the words leave your lips, you and Vela attack as one.
There is no signal, no command. Your movements are a symphony of perfect, violent harmony, born from shared struggle and absolute trust. Vela is a crimson blur, a whirlwind of acrobatic motion as she lunges forward, her lightsaber a singing arc of death aimed at Darth Rictus’s throat.
The Sith Lord meets her assault with his own brilliant white blade, the two lightsabers clashing with a deafening, explosive crackle that illuminates the courtyard in a strobing flash of red and white. He is powerful, incredibly so, his style a brutal, overwhelming offense. But Vela is not fighting him alone.
You are the tide that guides the storm. You don't close the distance immediately. Instead, you augment the battle from its edge. You reach out with the Force, not to attack Rictus directly, but to subtly shift the battlefield. A loose paving stone rises to intercept his footfall, breaking his rhythm. A gust of wind, guided by your will, pushes the heat from the clashing blades back into his face, distracting him for a crucial microsecond.
Seeing an opening, you surge forward. Rictus, parrying a vicious slash from Vela, is forced to turn his attention to you. He brings his white blade around in a powerful cleaving blow. You don't dodge. You meet it.
You bring up your left hand, your Sanctuary Glove shimmering. The moment his lightsaber blade touches your field, it dies. The brilliant white energy is snuffed out as if thrown into a vacuum, the blade’s hum vanishing into a dead hiss. For a split second, his weapon is just a useless metal stick.
Darth Rictus's eyes widen in shock and disbelief. That single moment of hesitation is all Vela needs. Her crimson blade reverses its arc, slicing across his back, leaving a deep, sizzling gash in his armor. He roars, a sound of pure pain and fury, and stumbles back, his own blade reigniting the instant it leaves your Sanctuary Field.
He now understands the true nature of the threat. He is not fighting two opponents. He is fighting a single entity with two bodies.
“Impressive,” he snarls, his cultured voice gone, replaced by a guttural rage. He changes his tactics, trying to separate you, to create distance. He unleashes a powerful wave of Force energy, a telekinetic shove designed to hurl you backward.
But you are ready. You shape your Sanctuary Field, not as a glove, but as a small, invisible shield in front of you. The Force wave hits it and dissipates into nothing. It's like trying to punch water.
At the same time, you feel Vela preparing for a powerful lunge. You subtly reach out and augment her, wrapping her in that buffered layer of your peace. For a moment, she is faster, stronger, her movements unnaturally fluid as your power smooths her path. She becomes a red comet, her attack so swift that Rictus is barely able to parry, his armor sustaining another deep, glowing wound as her blade glances off his shoulder pauldron.
The fight is a brutal, chaotic dance. You are the immovable object; Vela is the unstoppable force. You nullify his power, you disrupt his footing, you create openings where none should exist. She exploits every single one with ruthless, deadly precision.
Darth Rictus, the Hand of the Order, one of the most powerful duelists of the fanatical sect, is being systematically dismantled. He is bleeding, his armor is scarred and smoking, and for the first time in his life, he is facing an enemy whose very existence is anathema to his power. The serene confidence is gone, replaced by the desperate fury of a cornered god who has just discovered he is mortal after all.
The noose tightens. Darth Rictus is breathing heavily, his pristine white blade now scarred and flickering. His armor is a ruin of glowing gashes and melted plating. He is fighting on pure, fanatical will, but his connection to the Force is being constantly disrupted by your mere presence, and Vela's relentless assault gives him no quarter. The moment for a final, decisive move is at hand.
The decision is made in the space between heartbeats, a silent, unbreachable accord between you and Vela. This is war. There is no capture, no mercy for a zealot who would burn a world to make a point. He cannot be allowed to live.
You press the attack, but your pattern changes. You become more reckless, more open, intentionally creating a flaw in your defense. Darth Rictus, desperate and bleeding, sees what he believes is his only chance. He roars, a final, defiant war cry, and lunges forward, pouring all his remaining strength and rage into a single, overwhelming blow aimed directly at your chest.
As his brilliant white blade screams toward you, Vela moves. She is a shadow at the edge of his vision, her crimson blade already a blur.
The Sith Lord’s attack is exactly what you wanted. You don't retreat. You step into it.
Your left Sanctuary Glove meets his blade. The universe seems to hold its breath. The blinding white energy, the furious hum, the palpable aura of the dark side—all of it vanishes as if it never existed. For the second time, his weapon is rendered inert, a dead piece of metal, just inches from your chest.
Darth Rictus's eyes, burning with hatred, go wide with a final, dawning horror. He has been perfectly, utterly outplayed. He is open. Defenseless.
He doesn't even have time to register Vela’s attack.
She is already there. Her movement is not a slash or a parry, but a single, pure, economical thrust. Her crimson blade, humming with lethal intent, slides between the plates of his ruined armor and through his heart. There is no wasted motion. It is the art of the kill, perfected.
The Hunt Master gasps, a final, choked sound of surprise. The fire in his eyes dies, replaced by a vacant stillness. For a moment, he stands there, impaled on Vela’s blade, a statue of defeated fanaticism. Then, she retracts her weapon with a sharp, clean hiss. Darth Rictus, the Hand of the Order of Unbroken Truth, collapses to the ancient stones of the courtyard, his reign of terror ending in a quiet, ignominious heap.
The effect on the remaining Sith is instantaneous.
On the comms, Lin’s voice is a stunned whisper. “They’re breaking. The transports, the fighters... they’re scrambling, retreating back to the command ship. It’s pulling into a higher orbit. They’re... they’re leaving.”
Your assumption was correct. This was not a military legion with a chain of command. It was a cult, following a charismatic champion. With their leader dead, their faith is broken, their purpose shattered. The Hunt is over.
Silence descends upon the courtyard, broken only by the distant, fading whine of retreating starships. You stand over the body of your defeated foe, the shimmering gloves of your power slowly dissipating from your hands. Vela stands beside you, wiping a smudge of soot from her cheek, her crimson blade now extinguished. She gives you a single, sharp nod—a gesture of grim victory and profound respect.
The valley is safe. The Forgotten are alive. You have won. But as you look at the body of the Sith Lord, you feel not triumph, but the immense, soul-crushing weight of a war that is far from over. You have proven you can be a shield. Tonight, you proved you can also be the sword.
Excellent. The stage is perfectly set. The data is integrated. Let us continue the saga of Kaelen, the Anomaly who chose to stand and fight.
The silence that descends upon the command chamber of the Dantana Enclave is a sound all its own. It is heavier than the oppressive hum of the Sith fleet, deeper than the roar of the fortress's defensive batteries. It is the sound of a storm that has passed, leaving a world scoured clean and utterly changed.
On the main viewscreen, the last angry red specks of the Order's fleet wink out of existence, their hyperspace trails fading like malevolent ghosts. The space around Dantana is, for the first time in what feels like an eternity, empty. Serene.
The air is thick with the metallic tang of ozone and the faint, acrid smell of scorched flesh. In the center of the chamber, a testament to the battle's ferocity lies still and broken: Darth Rictus. His ornate armor is cracked and blackened where your Sanctuary-wreathed fists struck home. His lightsaber lies a few feet away, its crimson glow extinguished, now just a piece of inert metal.
You stand over him, the unique, placid reality of your Sanctuary Field slowly receding from your hands. The sensation is like waking from a dream—the absolute peace of the Field gives way to the sharp, cold reality of the chamber. A deep, bone-weary exhaustion washes over you, a price paid in full for commanding the Enclave and felling a Sith Lord. Your every muscle aches, your mind throbs from the strain.
Beside you, Vela Sorn leans heavily on her deactivated lightsaber, its hilt gripped tight in her gloved hand. Her breathing is ragged. Sweat and grime streak her face, but her eyes, when they meet yours, are alight with a ferocious, triumphant pride. She gives a short, sharp nod. A universe of meaning is conveyed in that simple gesture: We did it. We won.
A clatter of footsteps announces Lin's arrival from a side console. He looks pale, his usual nervous energy replaced by a wide-eyed awe. "They're gone," he says, his voice a half-hushed whisper. "All of them. Full retreat. Scans are clear. We... we held."
From the edge of the chamber, where he had stood observing the final moments of the duel, Master Zhar Lestin steps forward. The old Togruta’s face is a mask of ancient calm, but his eyes are fixed on you, filled with a complex mixture of awe, concern, and profound contemplation. He looks from your face, to the cooling body of Darth Rictus, and back again. He does not speak of victory or congratulations.
“Goodness that was intense. You did great Lin. Thanks for keeping a level head.” I pat Lin on the back, giving him a nod of approval. “Master Lestin, how fair the people?”
Your words cut through the charged silence.
Lin flinches slightly at the pat on his back, his attention snapping away from the viewscreen. He looks up at you, his eyes still wide with a mixture of terror and exhilaration. "Th-thanks, Kaelen," he stammers, a genuine, relieved smile finally breaking through his pale facade. "I just... I just tried to keep the systems from frying. You... you were..." He gestures vaguely at the screen, at the empty space where a fleet used to be, at a loss for words. He seems profoundly grateful for the simple, grounding act of acknowledgment.
Vela watches the exchange from the corner of her eye. She says nothing, but a flicker of something—perhaps understanding—crosses her features before she turns her gaze to the dead Sith Lord on the floor, her expression hardening back into one of pragmatic assessment.
Master Zhar Lestin's head-tails twitch slightly as you address him. His ancient eyes, full of the deep, swirling patterns of the Force, hold yours. He gives a slow, deliberate nod.
"The people are safe, Kaelen," he confirms, his voice a low, resonant hum that seems to soothe the very air in the chamber. "The Forgotten watched from their homesteads and shelters as the sky burned. They felt the tremors of the fortress awakening. Their fear was... considerable."
He takes a step closer, his gaze sweeping over your exhausted frame, then to Vela, and finally to Lin. "But now, thanks to all of you, that fear is turning into something else. Hope. Awe." His eyes find yours again, and there's a new depth to them. "You have given them back their world. A feat the Republic, and the Jedi Order, could not accomplish."
His gaze then drifts down to the body of Darth Rictus, lying between you. The faint, corrupting chill of the dark side still clings to the corpse like a shroud.
"But victory is a heavy burden," Zhar continues, his tone becoming graver. "What we do in its wake defines us as much as the battle itself."
He leaves the statement hanging in the air, a clear, unspoken question. The command chamber is secure. The fleet is gone. The people are safe. But a Sith Lord lies dead at your feet, a stark reminder of the path you've walked and the enemies you've made. The adrenaline is fading fast, leaving behind a profound weariness and the cold reality of the decisions that lie ahead.
“I feel like I’ve said this too many times in the last few weeks. We need to regroup. Let’s clean up, scavenge, and refuel ourselves and our ships. We should put our enemies to rest, and assess what defensive systems we can leave in place should we need to leave. The Sith will not rest and we need to make plans for the security of these people in the long term. We will meet to discuss our next move in 24 hours, unless anyone has objections or any matter need attended immediately, in which case the floor is yours.”
Your words land with the weight of command, instantly crystallizing the chaotic aftermath into a set of clear objectives. The exhaustion in the room is palpable, but your plan provides a much-needed anchor.
Lin nods vigorously, the relief on his face immense. "Right. Yes. A plan. I can do that." He's already moving back to his console, his fingers finding a familiar rhythm on the keys. "I'll run a full diagnostic on the Nightfall's systems, check for microfractures from the blast wash. I can also scan the Enclave's archives for schematics on its refueling and restocking facilities. This place must have something we can use."
Vela gives a single, sharp nod of assent. Her gaze falls to the body of Darth Rictus. "I will handle the dead," she states, her tone flat and professional. "Both here and at the breach point. A pyre is most efficient. Prevents disease, sends a message." Her eyes gleam with cold pragmatism. "I'll also check their shuttle and the wreckage. The Order uses high-grade components. Their power cells or comms relays might be useful." She is already moving toward the exit, ready to begin the grim but necessary work.
Only Master Lestin remains. He inclines his head, his expression one of deep approval. "A leader's clarity in the wake of battle. Your former master would be proud."
He waits a beat, considering your invitation for immediate matters. "Your plan is sound, Kaelen," he begins, his voice gentle but firm. "Rest, refuel, and prepare for the war to come. These are the actions of a wise commander. However, there is a matter that I believe cannot wait 24 hours."
He gestures towards the viewscreen, which now shows the serene green and blue sphere of Dantana below.
"The Forgotten. For generations, their only contact with the galaxy has been fear. Raiders, slavers... the Sith. They have endured. Today, they witnessed a miracle. They felt the ground shake with the power of their ancestors, and they watched the sky catch fire as their oppressors were cast down. Their fear is gone, but in its place is a fragile, uncertain awe."
Zhar turns his full attention to you, his ancient eyes searching yours. "They need to see their savior. They need to know that the power that protected them is not some faceless, ancient spirit, but a son of Dantana who returned home. Your presence among them, now, in the immediate aftermath, will do more to secure the future of this world than any defensive battery."
He offers a simple proposition. "The physical work can be delegated. But the work of building a future must be done by you. When you have taken a moment to center yourself, come with me. Let us walk down to the settlements. Let the people see you. Let them see that hope has a face."
“May I have a moment to speak with my friend? It will not take long and then I will come with you?”
"Of course, Kaelen," Master Lestin says, his voice soft with understanding. "Your bonds are your strength. They are the foundation upon which this victory was built. Take the moment you need. I will wait."
You give him a grateful nod and turn, jogging to catch up with Vela before she reaches the turbolift. "Vela, wait!"
She stops at the threshold and turns, one eyebrow raised in a silent question. She is already in her professional mindset, her mind on the grim tasks ahead. Her posture is all business.
You reach her, and for a second, you're not sure what to say. The words of your plan feel hollow now. The strategic overview, the scavenging, the logistics—none of it captures the monumental weight of the moment. You look at her, at the grime on her face, the fierce light still burning in her eyes, and you remember the two of you standing shoulder-to-shoulder against a Sith Lord, a perfect, deadly synchronicity of light and shadow. You remember escaping the black site, her voice the first one to offer you something other than pain.
Words fail.
Before you can second-guess the impulse, you close the small distance between you and wrap your arms around her.
She goes completely rigid. For a fraction of a second, you feel her entire body tense as if bracing for a blow. A hug is a gesture so alien to her Sith upbringing, so contrary to the brutal pragmatism she lives by, that her mind and body don't know how to process it. It's a clumsy, desperate gesture, fueled by exhaustion and overwhelming gratitude.
Leaning in, you say the only two words that matter. "Thank you."
You hold the embrace for a moment longer, then pull back.
Vela's face is a mask of stunned confusion. Her eyes, usually so sharp and focused, are wide and unblinking. She doesn't seem to know what to do with her hands. After a beat of awkward silence, she gives a short, jerky nod. Her throat works for a moment before she finds her voice, which comes out rougher than usual.
"We protect our own, Kaelen," she says, the statement matter-of-fact, but the sentiment behind it runs deeper than it ever has before. A new line of understanding has been drawn between you, one forged not in combat, but in this quiet, unguarded moment.
Without another word, she turns and steps into the turbolift, the doors hissing shut behind her, leaving you alone in the corridor.
You take a deep breath, feeling a small piece of the weight on your soul lift. Then you turn and walk back to the command chamber where Zhar is waiting, his ancient eyes filled with a quiet, knowing warmth. He saw, and he understood.
"Are you ready?" he asks gently.
"I am," you reply, your voice firm.
"Then come," Zhar says, gesturing for you to follow. "Let us show the people of Dantana that hope has returned home."
He leads you from the high-tech command center, through the sterile corridors of the Enclave, and towards the grand entrance that opens onto the world outside. As you walk, the hum of the fortress's systems fades behind you, replaced by the distant sounds of a world coming back to life: the chirp of insects, the rustle of the wind through the blba trees, and the faint, hopeful murmur of voices.
The massive stone doors of the Enclave grind open, revealing a world bathed in the soft, golden light of Dantana's setting sun. The air that greets you is fresh and clean, carrying the scent of rich soil, wild grasses, and the distant, smoky aroma of hearthfires. It’s the smell of home, a scent you hadn’t realized you’d so desperately missed.
As you and Zhar descend the long, sloping rampart from the fortress entrance, a hush falls over the nearest settlement. People emerge slowly from their simple, earth-colored homes. They are farmers, artisans, and herders—the Forgotten. Dressed in homespun cloth, their faces are weathered by the sun and etched with generations of hardship. They carry no weapons, only the tools of their trade, which now hang limply in their hands.
Their eyes are fixed on you.
It's not the adoring gaze of citizens for a king, nor the fearful deference of soldiers to a general. It's something far more raw and complex. They look at you with the same awe and trepidation they might show a force of nature—a lightning storm that, for once, struck down their enemies instead of their homes. They saw the sky burn. They felt the earth tremble. And now, the source of that power walks among them.
An elderly human woman, her face a roadmap of wrinkles, is the first to find her courage. She takes a tentative step forward, clutching a small, carved wooden pendant in her hand. "You... you are one of us," she says, her voice raspy with disuse and emotion. "You are Leona's boy. The one who was taken."
The murmur spreads through the small crowd. Recognition dawns on the older faces. They don't see Cipher Null, the Sith experiment. They don't see the Anomaly, the enemy of the Order. They see Kaelen. The child they thought was lost forever, returned.
Master Zhar Lestin hangs back, allowing you the space to answer. He stands as a silent witness, his presence a quiet endorsement but the moment, he knows, is entirely yours. A young child, no older than five, peeks out from behind the elder's robes, his eyes wide with a mixture of fear and fascination.
The people of Dantana wait. They are not asking for a speech or a promise of galactic security. Their question is simpler, more profound. They are asking who you are. 
“Yes. I was taken by the Sith. My power is what drew them here then, just as it did this day.”
Your confession hangs in the cool evening air, stark and unadorned. You offer no excuses, no heroic spin. Just the plain, brutal truth.
A wave of unease ripples through the crowd. A few people take an involuntary step back. The child who was peeking out moments before disappears completely behind the elder's robes. The fear, which had just begun to recede, flickers back into their eyes. You have just confirmed their deepest terror: that they are now the target of an unimaginable evil because of the very person who stands before them.
But the old woman who first spoke to you does not move. Her gaze remains locked on yours, her ancient eyes looking past the immense power you wield, past the warrior who felled a Sith Lord, and seeing something else entirely. She sees the lost boy. She sees the weight you carry.
Her expression, which had been a mixture of awe and fear, softens into one of profound empathy. Her weathered hand, calloused from a lifetime of tilling Dantana's soil, reaches out—not in supplication, but in comfort. She gently places it on your forearm. The touch is grounding, a simple, human connection that cuts through the tension like a knife.
"The Sith have always come to Dantana," she says, her voice clear and steady, loud enough for all to hear. "They come for our children, for our land, for anything they can take. They are a storm that never truly passes."
She squeezes your arm gently. "They took you because you shone with a light they could not extinguish. And today... you returned with that same light and drove the darkness away."
She turns her head, her gaze sweeping over her friends and neighbors. "He did not draw them here!" she calls out, her voice ringing with conviction. "He fought them here! He stood on our soil and told the darkness that it was not welcome. For the first time, someone fought back for us!"
The truth of her words washes over the crowd, extinguishing the last embers of their fear. The unease in their faces melts away, replaced by a fierce, protective loyalty. A man steps forward, a farmer with hands as tough as leather, and claps a hand on your shoulder. "She's right. You're home now, son. We protect our own."
The dam breaks.
The community surges forward, not with the frenzied energy of a mob, but with the quiet, powerful gravity of a family reuniting. They surround you, their hands resting on your arms, your back. They offer no platitudes or grand thanks. Instead, they offer something far more precious: acceptance. They are not afraid of you. They are proud. The child peeks out again, and this time, there is no fear in his eyes, only wonder.
Standing a short distance away, Master Zhar Lestin watches, a rare and genuine smile gracing his features. He sees the Force at work not in the grand spectacle of a space battle, but here, in this quiet circle of trust. He sees the true nature of your Sanctuary—not just a power to nullify, but an ability to create a community, a place of peace, forged from honesty and courage.
You are no longer an anomaly or an outcast. Here, surrounded by the Forgotten, you are simply Kaelen. And you are home.
The next twenty-four hours pass in a blur of focused, necessary work. The adrenaline of victory gives way to the quiet determination of securing the future.
You, Kaelen, spend the hours after leaving the settlement in deep, restorative meditation within the Enclave's quietest chambers. The strain of commanding the fortress and channeling your Sanctuary so powerfully left your physical and mental reserves dangerously depleted. You disconnect from the ancient machinery, allowing the fortress to fall back into a low-power slumber, and focus on rebuilding your own inner sanctum. The time spent with your people grounded you, reaffirming the purpose for which you fought. You are no longer just fighting against the Sith; you are fighting for Dantana.
Vela Sorn performs her grim duties with ruthless efficiency. She oversees the construction of a large pyre far from the settlements, where the bodies of Darth Rictus and his acolytes are given a warrior's cremation—a final, cleansing fire. True to her word, she and a small team of volunteers strip the crashed Sith shuttle for anything of value. She works with a cold, focused energy, her every action precise and economical. When not working, she is a silent, coiled spring of energy, sharpening her blades and cleaning her armor, her mind already on the next fight.
Lin, in his element, becomes a ghost in the Enclave's machines. He successfully gets the Nightfall's systems to 100% and, using the Enclave's ancient but surprisingly sophisticated facilities, completely refuels and restocks the ship. He spends the rest of the time obsessively combing through the fortress's databanks, cross-referencing schematics with the scavenged Sith tech. He’s a whirlwind of activity, fueled by caf and the thrill of having an entire Jedi Enclave's worth of technology at his fingertips.
Master Zhar Lestin becomes the bridge between you and the Forgotten. He moves through the settlements, his calm presence reassuring the people. He organizes the community, directing them to repair the minor damage caused by the battle and helping them understand the new reality. He ensures the people see the returned Enclave not as a source of fear, but as their shield.
The appointed hour arrives. You gather not in the tense, blood-stained chamber of yesterday, but in a smaller, circular council room deep within the Enclave. The viewscreen is off. A single holoprojector sits in the center of a round stone table. The air is still and focused.
You sit at the head of the table. Lin is to your right, a datapad in front of him already glowing with information. Vela is to your left, her posture relaxed but alert, her hands resting on the table. Zhar Lestin sits opposite you, his ancient eyes calm and patient.
The weight of leadership rests squarely on your shoulders. It's time to assess, plan, and decide the future.
You look around the table at your found family, your allies. "Thank you for coming," you begin, your voice steady and clear. "We won the battle, but the war is just beginning. The Order of Unbroken Truth will not forgive the death of their champion. We need to decide our next move, but first, we need to know where we stand."
You turn to Lin. "Lin, report. The Nightfall and supplies?"
Lin straightens up, tapping his datapad, which casts a blue glow on his face. "The Nightfall is better than new," he says with a proud grin. "I've recalibrated the power converters and patched the nav-computer with some... surprisingly robust security protocols I found in the Enclave's library. She's fully fueled, fully stocked, and ready to fly at a moment's notice."
He swipes a finger across the datapad, bringing up a schematic of the Enclave. "As for leaving defenses in place... that's trickier. The main batteries, the big ones you controlled, Kaelen... they require a direct, powerful Force-sensitive user to interface with them. It's less a weapons system and more a... a symbiotic organism. We can't automate it."
He zooms in on several smaller points around the fortress perimeter. "However, I can set the smaller, automated point-defense turrets and the lower-tier shield grid on a 'welcome party' protocol. They'll handle stray pirates or a single inquisitive scout ship, but they won't stop a dedicated assault. It's a burglar alarm, not a fortress wall, unless you're personally plugged in."
You nod, processing the information. "And the scavenged tech?"
Vela answers before Lin can. "Mostly fried or useless," she states, her voice a low baritone. "But not entirely." She slides a small, scorched metal rectangle across the table. It's a Sith datapad, clearly damaged by plasma scoring.
"I pulled this from the shuttle's command console. It's heavily encrypted and most of the memory is slag. But Lin managed to pull a few fragments."
Lin nods, taking the cue. "Just fragments. A recurring navigational phrase: 'The Korriban Scrimshaw.' It's not a standard nav-point or a known system. Sounds more like a code name for a place, or maybe a ship. There were also partial astrogation charts, corrupted, but they all point towards the outer edge of the Stygian Caldera, deep in Sith space."
The room falls silent for a moment as everyone digests this new, cryptic clue. A potential target. A thread to pull.
You turn your gaze to Zhar. "Master Lestin? How are the people?"
The old Togruta's expression is serene, but his eyes hold a deep gravity. "The people are strong, Kaelen. They have found their courage again. Your presence has given them a hope they have not known in generations. They have begun organizing a militia, learning the terrain, fortifying their settlements. They will fight for their homes."
He leans forward slightly. "But they are farmers and artisans, not soldiers. The automated defenses will help, and I will remain here to guide and protect them as best I can. However, we all know the truth. Dantana is safe only as long as the Order of Unbroken Truth believes it to be impregnable, or until they can muster a force large enough to overwhelm it."
He looks from you to Vela, then to Lin, his gaze finally resting on the scorched datapad in the center of the table.
"This leaves us with a choice," he says, articulating the question that hangs over them all. "Do we remain here, fortifying this world into a bastion against the coming storm, making our stand on this ground? Or do we take the fight to them, using this... 'Korriban Scrimshaw'... as a starting point to hunt down the heart of the serpent before it can strike again?"
You make your declaration without hesitation. "We take the fight to them. They will just keep coming if we wait and eventually we will be overwhelmed. Let’s pursue this thread and see where it leads."
A slow, dangerous smile spreads across Vela's face. It's the first genuine expression of satisfaction she's shown since the meeting began. "Good," she says, her voice low and eager. "A defensive war is a losing war. We cut off the head of the serpent, it can't bite." Her knuckles are white where she grips the edge of the table, her entire being humming with the promise of action. For her, the choice is simple. It's the only one that makes sense.
Lin, by contrast, visibly swallows. He glances at the scorched datapad and then back at you, his eyes wide. "Sith space? The Stygian Caldera? Kaelen, the patrols there... they don't ask questions. They shoot on sight. Our ship is good, but it's not a warship. We'll be a single candle in a hurricane." Despite his fear, there is no protest in his voice. He's stating facts, assessing risk. He's already calculating the odds, his loyalty to you overriding his instinct for self-preservation. "I'll start trying to piece together those nav-charts. Maybe I can find a 'quiet' way in."
Master Zhar Lestin gives a slow, solemn nod. A deep sadness touches his features, but it is overshadowed by respect. "It is a heavy, perilous path you choose. To hunt an enemy like the Order in their own territory is a task the entire Jedi Council would hesitate to undertake."
He rises from his seat and walks to a viewport overlooking the quiet fields of Dantana. "But your logic is sound. A fortress is merely a delay, not a solution. While you are gone, I will do what I can. I will teach the people, guide their new militia, and keep the Enclave's 'welcome party' ready. We will hold the light here for as long as we can."
He turns back to you, his gaze intense. "But you must promise me, Kaelen. Do not let this hunt consume you. Do not become the monster you fight. Remember what you are fighting for."
With the decision made, the room shifts from a council of war to a command center.
Lin immediately begins working, his fingers flying across his datapad as he tries to reconstruct the corrupted star charts, his mind consumed with finding a safe passage into the most dangerous region of the galaxy.


Vela stands, giving you a sharp, decisive nod before leaving the room. Her purpose is clear: she is going to prepare the Nightfall for war, checking every weapon system, every shield emitter, every inch of the ship that will keep you all alive.


You and Zhar spend a final hour together, walking the ramparts of the Enclave. He shares with you what ancient knowledge he can about the Stygian Caldera and the old Sith worlds, and you, in turn, give him a deeper understanding of the Enclave's systems, ensuring he knows its capabilities and limits.


Your departure is quiet and without ceremony. Under the light of Dantana's twin moons, you, Vela, and Lin board the Nightfall. As the ramp hisses shut, you take one last look at the peaceful world you once again have to leave behind. But this time is different. You are not fleeing. You are hunting.
The Nightfall lifts gracefully from the Enclave's landing pad, its engines a quiet hum in the night sky. On the bridge, Lin plots the first jump based on the fragmented data. The destination is a series of 'cold' systems on the fringe of the Stygian Caldera—a place to begin the search for the mysterious "Korriban Scrimshaw."
"Course laid in, Kaelen," Lin says, his voice tight with tension. "Ready when you are."
Vela stands beside your command chair, her arms crossed, her gaze fixed on the star-dusted void ahead. The quiet confidence radiating from her is a comforting presence.
You look at your crew, your family, poised on the edge of a mission that could very well consume you all.
"Take us out, Lin," you say, your voice echoing the resolve of your decision. "Let's go hunting."
The stars elongate, stretching into brilliant blue lines as the Nightfall leaps into hyperspace, plunging headfirst into the dark heart of the Sith Empire.
The journey through the swirling, non-Euclidean tunnel of hyperspace is long and silent. The Nightfall, a tiny vessel in the immense galactic river, is an isolated pocket of reality hurtling toward the most hostile territory in the known galaxy. On the bridge, the only light comes from the hypnotic blue streaks of hyperspace and the soft glow of Lin's console.
The silence on the ship is not empty; it's filled with the unsaid anxieties and focused preparations of its three occupants.
You spend much of the time in the small, spartan crew quarters, seated on the floor in a deep meditative trance. You are not just resting. You are expanding your senses, reaching out with the Force into the churning chaos of hyperspace, feeling for the cold, jagged presence of any pursuit. There is none. The Order is not on your heels, but the feeling of being hunted remains a constant pressure at the back of your mind. You also use the time to explore the inner landscape of your own power, solidifying the calm center of your Sanctuary, preparing it for the darkness you are willingly plunging into.
Vela uses the cargo hold as her personal training ground. The space is filled with the near-silent hiss and snap of her lightsaber as she moves through her combat katas. It's a deadly, precise ballet of crimson light and shadow. She is honing her edge, her focus absolute. To watch her is to watch a weapon being sharpened to a razor's edge. She is preparing for a war she understands, a war of violence and death, and she is eager to meet it.
Lin remains glued to the bridge. He's a man possessed, his mind a whirlwind of data streams and encryption algorithms. He coaxes the Nightfall's sensors to perform far beyond their factory specifications, scanning for any sign of an Sith Imperial listening post or long-range patrol. He dedicates the rest of his energy to the scorched Sith datapad, chipping away at its layers of security like a master jeweler cutting a priceless gem.
Hours before your scheduled arrival, Lin's voice crackles over the ship's comm. "Kaelen, Vela, get up here. I think I found something."
When you arrive on the bridge, Lin has a single, corrupted audio file isolated on his screen. "It was buried in a compressed file, triple-encrypted. It's mostly noise, but listen."
He plays the file. Through a wall of static, a harsh, imperious voice speaks. "...scrimshaw is the key. Rictus failed. The Anomaly must be brought to the Master's sanctum on...[STATIC]... where its purpose will be unmade." The file cuts out.
"The Master's sanctum," Vela says, her voice low. "The leader of the Order."
"It confirms one thing," Lin adds, looking at you grimly. "This 'Korriban Scrimshaw' isn't just a place. It's the key to finding their leader. And they don't just want to kill you, Kaelen. They want to... unmake you."
The chilling words hang in the air as the hyperspace reversion alarm blares. The blue streaks collapse back into pinpricks of light.
You have arrived at your destination.
The viewscreen displays a scene of breathtaking, lawless chaos. You are in a swirling nebula of purple and crimson gas, and nestled within it is a cluster of massive, hollowed-out asteroids tethered together by a web of docking tubes and mag-lev lines. Gaudy neon signs in a dozen languages flicker across city-sized structures built into and on top of the asteroids, casting a lurid glow on the perpetual dust clouds. This is The Vex, a notorious shadowport on the fringe of the Stygian Caldera, a place where smugglers, spies, information brokers, and worse conduct their business far from the eyes of the Sith Empire.
"Docking control is completely automated and anonymous," Lin reports, his voice tight with nerves as he pilots the Nightfall towards a vacant landing pad. "Welcome to The Vex. Just try not to get stabbed, shot, or sold."
"This place is a sewer," Vela mutters, her hand already resting near the hilt of her lightsaber. "But sewers are full of rats. And rats hear things."
“Lin, keep us ready to go. Feel free to probe for information, just don’t get us caught until I have what we came for. Vela, you’re with me. I might need to flex your muscles.” 
"My thoughts exactly," Lin says, his fingers already dancing across his console. "I'll be your eye in the sky. I'll keep the engines warm and tap into the local comms chatter. I'll be a ghost." He gives you a thumbs-up, his focus already a thousand miles away, lost in a sea of data.
Vela gives a sharp, predatory grin. "Flexing muscle is my specialty." She cracks her knuckles, the sound like stones grinding together. She dons a long, dark coat over her armor, concealing her lightsaber but doing little to hide the dangerous aura that clings to her like a shroud. She is ready.
You take a moment to center yourself, pulling a simple, hooded traveler's cloak over your own shoulders. It's nondescript, perfect for blending in. You are not a Jedi or a Sith experiment; you are just another soul seeking something on The Vex.
The ramp of the Nightfall lowers with a hydraulic hiss, depositing you and Vela onto the grimy, stained durasteel of Landing Pad 94. The air hits you first—a thick, cloying cocktail of spilled fuel, spicy alien food, ozone, and unwashed bodies. The noise is a constant, chaotic symphony: the guttural shouts of a dozen different species, the loud, thumping bass of cantina music, the whine of repulsorlifts, and the distant clang of metal on metal from a suspected fighting pit.
As you walk down the ramp into the main thoroughfare, the station swallows you whole. Towering, jury-rigged structures lean against the asteroid's interior curve, their surfaces crawling with flickering neon signs advertising everything from weapon repairs to "discreet medical services." A hulking Besalisk bounty hunter shoves past you, his four arms clearing a path through the crowd. A pair of Twi'lek dancers laugh from a balcony above, their lekku twirling hypnotically. In a shadowy alley, a cloaked figure makes a quick, furtive exchange with a nervous-looking Rodian. This is a place that operates on a currency of secrets and violence, and you can feel it in the very air.
Vela walks a half-step behind you, her presence a silent warning. Her eyes, cold and analytical, scan every face, every shadow, every rooftop. She's a coiled viper, and the predatory beings of The Vex instinctively recognize one of their own, giving her a wide berth.
Your specialty is people. You let the Force flow through you, not as a weapon, but as a lens. You read the currents of the crowd—the desperation of a down-on-his-luck pilot, the arrogance of a gang enforcer, the paranoia of a spice runner. You're looking for a specific signature: the calm, patient confidence of someone who doesn't need to posture, someone whose power comes not from a blaster, but from knowledge. An information broker.
After nearly an hour of navigating the chaotic maze, you find your thread. In a crowded bazaar filled with merchants hawking stolen tech and exotic creatures, you spot a figure who isn't selling anything. They are observing. A lithe, four-armed arachnoid being, a Xy'kar, sits in a secluded booth overlooking the market floor. A thin, shimmering energy shield separates them from the rabble below. They sip a glowing blue liquid, their multiple, multifaceted eyes watching every deal, every argument, with detached amusement. This is a creature who trades in a more valuable commodity.
As you and Vela approach the booth's entrance, two burly Gamorrean guards block your path, their vibro-axes held loosely but ready.
Before Vela can even tense, you raise a placating hand and speak to the guards, your voice calm and clear over the din. "We have business with your employer. Tell them we wish to inquire about a piece of rare 'scrimshaw'."
The guards share a grunting look, and one of them taps a comm unit on his wrist. A moment later, a synthesized voice, smooth and oily, echoes from a hidden speaker. "The word is intriguing. The company you keep is... intense. Lose the muscle, and you may approach."
The guards cross their axes, barring Vela's path. The broker wants to speak to you, and you alone.
You give Vela a slight, reassuring nod. A flicker of protest crosses her face—leaving you alone in a den of spies is against her every instinct—but she trusts your command. She gives a curt nod in return and steps back, her arms crossed, her eyes never leaving the guards. She becomes a statue of barely contained violence, a clear message to anyone watching: Hurry up.
The Gamorreans uncross their axes, and you step past them. The shimmering energy shield dissolves with a faint hum as you approach, reforming behind you once you're inside.
The interior of the booth is a stark contrast to the chaos outside. The air is cool and filtered. The floor is polished obsidian, and the walls are lined with humming data-towers and what look like ancient, priceless artifacts displayed in sterile cases. The Xy'kar broker sits behind a low, minimalist desk, two of their four slender arms steepled before them, the other two idly swirling the glowing blue liquid in their glass. Their multifaceted eyes, each a perfect hexagon, track your every move.
"Bold of you to walk into a place like this," the broker's synthesized voice purrs from a hidden speaker, smooth as silk. "Bolder still to use a name tied to so much recent unpleasantness. I am Xylo. And you are a client who values discretion, I presume?"
You walk forward and take the seat opposite them, the invitation unspoken but clear. You pull back your hood, letting them see your face.
"Discretion is the foundation of good business, Xylo," you reply, your tone even and confident. "And I have a feeling you are a master of your trade. I'm not here for unpleasantness. I'm here for a key. I'm told it looks like scrimshaw."
Xylo lets out a soft, clicking chuckle. The sound is like ice cubes clinking in a glass. "Ah, the Korriban Scrimshaw. A quaint term for a very... particular item. It is not something one simply 'inquires' about. To even know that name suggests you are entangled in matters far above the pay grade of most souls on The Vex. The kind of matters that get stations like this one erased from star charts."
They lean forward, their multiple eyes narrowing. "Information of that caliber is not bought with credits. It is bought with something far more valuable. Trust. Why should I trust you? Who are you, that you hunt the hunters of the Sith?"
You offer a small, disarming smile. "Let's just say I'm a private collector with a vested interest in seeing a certain fanatical, art-destroying cult lose its footing. Their methods are bad for everyone's business, wouldn't you agree? They disrupt the delicate balance of things." You let the implication hang in the air—that the Order of Unbroken Truth is a chaotic element you both want gone. "I'm not a Jedi. I'm not with the Republic. I'm just a concerned party looking to solve a problem. The 'scrimshaw' is the next step in that solution."
Xylo remains silent for a long moment, their multifaceted eyes analyzing you. You can feel them weighing your words, assessing your demeanor, sensing the quiet confidence that radiates from you. You are not begging or threatening. You are proposing a transaction between professionals.
Finally, they lean back. "Your 'collection' must be very unique indeed. Very well. Your reasoning is... sound. The Order's purity is tiresome and unprofitable."
With a flick of one of their slender wrists, a holographic image materializes above the desk. It's a complex, jagged piece of bone or ivory, carved with intricate, spiraling patterns that seem to shift and writhe. It looks ancient and deeply unsettling.
"The Korriban Scrimshaw is not a key," Xylo explains. "It is a map. A ritual artifact. When held by a powerful Force-sensitive, the patterns align to reveal a single, untraceable hyperspace route. A path to the Order's holiest site, their 'Master's Sanctum'."
The broker gestures again, and the image of the artifact is replaced by a dossier of a formidable-looking man with a scarred face and a cold, cruel sneer. He wears the uniform of a Sith-aligned privateer.
"The Scrimshaw is not for sale. But its current owner is a man of more... negotiable appetites. His name is Vornax. A collector of rare and violent antiquities. He believes it to be a mere trophy. He won it in a card game on the gambling moon of Nar Shaddaa."
The hologram changes one last time, showing a glittering, vertical city-scape, perpetually shrouded in rain and neon.
"Vornax is currently celebrating his winnings at the Starfall Casino in the Red Light Sector of Nar Shaddaa," Xylo says, their voice laced with finality. "How you convince him to part with it is, of course, your business."
The broker dissolves the hologram and takes a slow sip of their drink. "Our transaction is complete. A pleasure doing business with a fellow appreciator of the finer things." The energy shield at your back dissipates. Your audience is over.
You give Xylo a slow, appreciative nod. "The pleasure was all mine, Xylo."
Without another word, you stand and walk out of the booth. The energy shield hisses closed behind you, sealing the broker back inside their web of secrets.
The two Gamorrean guards grunt as you pass, but make no move to stop you. Vela immediately falls into step beside you, her gaze sweeping the area, ensuring no one is following. Her hand never strays far from her concealed lightsaber.
"Did you get what you needed?" she asks, her voice a low murmur, easily lost in the bazaar's din.
"And more," you reply quietly. "Let's get back to the ship."
The journey back through the chaotic thoroughfares of The Vex is just as tense, but your steps are now filled with purpose. You and Vela move as a single unit, a silent, deadly pair navigating the river of galactic scum. You feel the eyes of bounty hunters and opportunists on you, but Vela's predatory stillness is a more effective deterrent than any blaster. No one wants to be the first to test her.
Reaching Landing Pad 94 feels like arriving at a sanctuary. The ramp of the Nightfall is still down, an inviting pathway out of the station's oppressive atmosphere. Lin's voice crackles in your ear comm. "Welcome back. Scans are clear. No one followed you. I take it the trip was productive?"
"You could say that," you answer as you and Vela step onto the ramp. It retracts smoothly behind you, sealing you inside the clean, quiet interior of your ship.
You find Lin on the bridge, looking relieved to have you back in one piece. You all gather around the central holotable.
"Alright," you begin, your voice echoing slightly in the small space. "The good news is we have a solid lead. The 'Korriban Scrimshaw' is real."
You recount your entire conversation with Xylo, projecting the images from your own memory onto the holotable for emphasis. First, the swirling, unsettling image of the artifact itself.
"It's not a key, it's a map," you explain. "An ancient Sith artifact that reveals a hyperspace route when held by a Force-sensitive. It leads directly to the Order's main base, what they call the 'Master's Sanctum'."
Vela leans forward, her eyes locked on the twisting patterns of the scrimshaw. "A direct path to their leader. A single, decisive strike." The hunter in her is captivated by the elegant simplicity of the plan.
You then switch the image to the scarred, cruel face of Vornax. "This is its current owner. Vornax, a privateer and collector. He thinks it's just a trophy."
Lin lets out a low whistle. "I know that name. Vornax is bad news. Runs a small but ruthless fleet of pirates. He's more of a warlord than a collector."
Finally, you bring up the image of the glittering, rain-slicked towers of a vertical city. "And this is where we'll find him. Nar Shaddaa. The Smuggler's Moon."
Lin groans, running a hand through his hair. "Of course. Nar Shaddaa. The entire moon is a criminal enterprise with a thin coat of neon. It makes The Vex look like a church picnic."
"He's at the Starfall Casino in the Red Light Sector," you finish. "Celebrating his winnings."
You deactivate the projector, and the three of you stand in silence for a moment, the weight of the next step settling over you. You've found the thread. Now you have to pull it from the grasp of a dangerous pirate in the heart of the galaxy's most notorious criminal den.
"So," you say, looking at your crew. "We're going to Nar Shaddaa. The question is, how do we get the scrimshaw from Vornax?"
“Any suggestions?”
Your question hangs in the air on the quiet bridge of the Nightfall. The faces of your crew turn to you, each processing the challenge through the lens of their own unique experience.
Vela is the first to speak, her voice sharp and decisive. "Suggestions? We don't need a complex plan. We need a target." She leans forward, resting her knuckles on the holotable. "Men like Vornax only understand one language: violence. We walk into that casino, find him, and I challenge him. Or we simply corner him in a quiet corridor. You and I, Kaelen, against him and his bodyguards. He'll be dead or disarmed in thirty seconds. We take the scrimshaw from his body and walk out. It's the cleanest, most direct path. We'd be off-moon before his drink gets warm."
Lin lets out a choked sound, half-laugh, half-gasp of horror. "Clean? Vela, that's insane! A frontal assault on a known pirate captain in his favorite casino on Nar Shaddaa? That's not a plan, it's a suicide pact! We'd have every bounty hunter, hired gun, and Hutt enforcer in the sector on us before we even reached the hangar."
He paces nervously, running a hand through his hair. "No, no, no. We have to be smarter. We can't beat him with muscle—he has more. We have to beat him with brains." He stops and points a finger at the table. "Xylo said he won it in a card game. So, let's play the game. We could find a high-stakes sabacc table and win it from him. Or, even better," a sly look enters his eyes, "I could slice into the casino's systems. I could feed you information, manipulate the cards, create a 'malfunction' in the security systems at a key moment. We don't fight him. We trick him. We make him give it to us, and he won't even realize he's been robbed until we're long gone."
"We start with the scalpel," you declare, your voice leaving no room for argument. "If that fails at any point, we know we can take what we want with the sword."
You look directly at Vela, your expression serious. "My preference is to preserve your strength for the real battle ahead. And something tells me we have many fights ahead. We don't need more enemies following us if we can help it."
Lin’s face breaks into a wide, triumphant grin. He pumps a fist in the air. "Yes! Okay, good. Excellent choice. I can work with this." He immediately starts pacing again, but this time it's with excited, creative energy. "The Starfall Casino... it's run by the Hutt Cartel, so their security will be tough but lazy. They'll rely on reputation and hired thugs more than cutting-edge tech. I can find a backdoor. I'll need to stay on the ship to run the hack, but I can be your voice in the darkness. I'll feed you everything—guard patrols, camera blind spots, Vornax's credit history, maybe even what cards his opponents are holding."
Vela, who had been coiled like a spring ready to strike, visibly relaxes. She gives a short, sharp nod of acquiescence. While the direct approach is her preference, your reasoning—saving her strength for the true enemy—is a logic she cannot fault. It speaks to a pragmatism she deeply respects.
"Understood," she says, her tone shifting from eager warrior to professional bodyguard. "I will be your shadow. If the scalpel breaks, the sword will be ready."
With the plan set, the Nightfall changes course for the heart of the Mid Rim. The journey to Nar Shaddaa is one of tense preparation. Lin becomes a phantom in the galactic holonet, probing the Starfall Casino's networks from light-years away. Vela cleans and maintains her gear with monastic focus, while you spend your time in meditation, preparing your mind for the subtle deceptions to come.
The arrival at the Smuggler's Moon is an assault on the senses. The ship descends through layers of toxic clouds and perpetual, acidic rain, revealing a cityscape that defies gravity. Towers of chrome and neon stretch miles into the sky and plunge just as far into the darkness below, connected by a dizzying web of sky-bridges and traffic lanes. Billboards featuring dancing Twi'leks and sneering Hutts cast a lurid, shifting glow over everything.
Lin expertly navigates the chaotic traffic to a discreet, anonymous docking bay deep in the moon's underbelly. "Alright, I'm jacked in," he says from the bridge, his voice a whisper in your ear comms. "I've got eyes and ears everywhere. You'll be a ghost."
You and Vela prepare to enter the den of thieves. You've exchanged your simple traveler's cloak for a high-collared, tailored jacket—the attire of a wealthy gambler with credits to burn. Vela is dressed in sleek, dark attire that is both elegant and practical, looking every bit the part of an intimidating personal guard. She is unarmed, at least to any obvious scans, but you know she is never truly defenseless.
The doors to the Starfall Casino slide open, and a wave of noise and dazzling light washes over you. The air is thick with expensive perfume, rare cigars, and the scent of ozone from the thousands of slot machines. Beings from every corner of the galaxy crowd around sabacc tables and roulette wheels, their faces a mixture of greed, hope, and desperation. In the center of the main floor, seated at a private, high-stakes table surrounded by four heavily armed guards, is your target.
Vornax. He's larger than his hologram suggested, laughing loudly as he throws back a drink. The Korriban Scrimshaw sits on the table beside his pile of credits—not as part of the pot, but as a gaudy, prideful trophy.
"I have eyes on him," you murmur.
"I see him too," Lin's voice replies in your ear. "The game is sabacc. Minimum buy-in is ten thousand credits. Vornax is sloppy, arrogant, but he's on a winning streak. Time to go to work."
“Alright, we need to sell this lie. We can’t go for the objective directly. The goal is to make this feel real. That means I need to convince him to go all in and lose, but avoid a deep seated desire for vengeance. It needs to feel natural and just flat out lucky. So I can’t win every round. And I can’t go full on broke. Toe that line until we have him where we want him and then he’ll hand us everything.”

"Exactly," Lin's voice confirms in your ear comm. "A slow burn. Make him feel like he's in control right up until the moment he isn't. I'm running a probability analysis on the card shuffler now. I can't predict every card, but I can give you an edge on the odds. Play smart, play patient."
You give a nearly imperceptible nod and exude an air of casual wealth, striding toward the high-stakes table as if you own the place. Vela follows a few paces behind, her expression bored and unimpressed, the perfect picture of a bodyguard who has seen it all. As you approach, one of Vornax's guards steps forward to intercept you.
"Private game," the guard grunts, his hand resting on a heavy blaster pistol.
You flash a charming smile, not at the guard, but at Vornax himself, raising your voice just enough to be heard over the casino's din. "A shame. I was told this was where the real players came to test their fortunes. I'd hate to have been misinformed."
Vornax, intrigued by your confidence, looks you up and down. He sees a fresh mark with deep pockets. A wide, avaricious grin spreads across his scarred face. "The guard is new," he laughs, waving a dismissive hand. "Sit, friend! There's always room for someone with the credits to back up their nerve."
You slide into the empty seat, nodding to the dealer as you slide a credit chit worth 50,000 credits onto the table. "Let's see if Lady Luck is with me tonight."
The game begins. For the next hour, you play the part of a gifted but reckless gambler. You win a few hands on instinct, your charisma smoothing over the other players. You lose a few, folding on hands Lin warns you are traps, making it look like a tough but necessary choice. You laugh with Vornax when he wins a big pot from another player, and you offer a commiserating toast when you lose a small one to him. You are not his enemy; you are part of the game's exhilarating ecosystem.
"Vornax, a shift change is coming up on the northeast security patrol in five minutes," Lin whispers in your ear. "The dealer is on Vornax's payroll, but only to spot professional card counters, not to cheat. He's clean."
The pots grow larger. You win a substantial hand with a pure sabacc, your face a mask of delighted surprise. Vornax curses good-naturedly, his greed stoked by the money flowing across the table. He is seeing you now not just as a mark, but as a rival high-roller.
During a lull as the dealer shuffles, you let your eyes drift to the artifact on the table. "My apologies," you say, feigning a collector's curiosity. "That's a fascinating piece. Pre-Republic, if I'm not mistaken? I dabble in antiquities."
Vornax beams with pride, picking up the scrimshaw. "The Korriban Scrimshaw. A one-of-a-kind trophy. Worth more than this entire table." He places it back down, patting it possessively.
You've planted the seed.
Another thirty minutes pass. Following Lin's subtle cues, you bleed Vornax's credit pile dry, always making it seem like a stroke of incredible luck. Finally, Vornax is down to his last few thousand credits. He's frustrated, angry, and desperate to win back his losses and his pride.
"One more hand," he snarls, pushing his remaining credits into the center of the table. "Double or nothing."
You look at his paltry pile, then at your own mountain of chips, and shake your head with a sigh. "Vornax, with all due respect, there's nothing there worth my time."
Just as you planned, his eyes dart to the scrimshaw. His pride, stung by your dismissal, overrides his caution.
"Fine!" he bellows, slamming the artifact into the pot. "My winnings against yours. And the scrimshaw. Winner take all. Do you have the nerve for that, 'collector'?"
The table falls silent. The other players back away. This is the moment.
"He's overconfident," Lin says urgently in your ear. "He's holding a hidden pair. His odds of drawing to a full sabacc are less than ten percent. Your hand is stronger. Statistically, you have him."
You meet Vornax's gaze, a slow smile spreading across your face. "Now that is a wager." You push your entire stack of chips forward. "I accept."
The final cards are dealt. Vornax lays down his hand with a triumphant roar—an Idiot's Array, a notoriously rare and powerful hand. The crowd gasps.
You simply lay your cards down beside his. A pure sabacc. The perfect hand.
Silence.
Vornax stares at your cards, his face turning from triumphant red to ashen white. He can't believe it. It was a one-in-a-million shot, a hand beaten by the only hand that could. It wasn't a cheat; it was a statistical miracle. It was, for all intents and purposes, impossibly bad luck for him.
You slowly, calmly rake in the mountain of credits. Then, you pick up the Korriban Scrimshaw, weighing it in your hand. You look at the broken pirate captain.
"Tough break," you say, your voice genuine. "You played a strong game."
You stand up, leaving a large stack of credits on the table. "For the dealer and the table's time. A pleasure doing business with you, Vornax."
With a final nod, you turn. Vela, who has been watching from the edge of the crowd, materializes at your side. Together, you walk calmly away from the table, melting back into the casino's chaos before Vornax's brain can even process the magnitude of his loss.
You don't run. You don't look back. You are just another lucky gambler walking out into the endless night of the Smuggler's Moon, the key to your enemy's sanctum resting safely in your pocket.
As you and Vela navigate the labyrinthine corridors of the lower levels, leaving the casino's glitz and desperation far behind, the sounds change. The music and laughter are replaced by the hiss of steam from leaking pipes, the distant roar of illicit swoop bike races, and the low hum of countless overworked power conduits. The air grows thick with the smell of ozone and damp metal.
You hold the cool, unsettling weight of the scrimshaw in your jacket pocket, a tangible piece of your victory. The adrenaline of the heist is fading, replaced by a clear-headed assessment of your resources and the path ahead.
Breaking the silence, you muse aloud to Vela, your voice a low counterpoint to the station's hum. "We need a droid."
Vela glances at you, her eyebrow arched in a silent question. Her focus is still on scanning the shadowy doorways and gantries above for any potential ambush.
"Someone to help Lin on the ship," you clarify, thinking of him alone on the bridge, a single person juggling the roles of pilot, navigator, slicer, and mechanic. "He's always helping us, keeping everything running, being our eyes and ears. He could use a helper. Another set of hands."
Vela considers this for a moment, her pragmatic mind processing the suggestion not as a matter of comfort, but of tactical advantage.
"A droid is just a tool," she says, her tone flat. "Another system to maintain. Another mouth to feed power to." She pauses, her eyes scanning a particularly dark alley before continuing. "But... Lin's attention is a finite resource. If a maintenance droid frees him up to focus on slicing our way through an Sith Imperial blockade, or if an astromech can calculate a jump while he's patching a blown shield emitter... then it is a tool worth acquiring."
Her gaze sweeps over a grimy storefront advertising "Pre-Owned Droids & Servos—No Questions Asked." The window is filled with a motley collection of dented astromechs, skeletal protocol droids, and boxy labor units.
"This moon is a scrap heap of them," she adds with a hint of disdain. "Finding one won't be the problem. Finding one that isn't rigged to explode or spy on us will be."
You reach the docking bay, the familiar silhouette of the Nightfall a welcome sight. As the ramp lowers, Lin's triumphant and relieved voice erupts from your comms. "You did it! I can't believe you actually did it! I was sweating bolts up here! Is it... do you have it?"
"Agreed," you say to Vela as you step onto the bridge. "A surprise for another time. For now, we stay focused."
Lin is practically vibrating with energy, his face illuminated by the glow of his console. He looks up as you enter, his eyes immediately locking onto the artifact in your hand.
"We have it," you confirm, placing the Korriban Scrimshaw on the central holotable. Its intricate, unsettling carvings seem to absorb the light of the bridge.
Lin lets out a long, slow breath of relief. "Incredible. No alarms, no bounties, no angry Hutts. A clean getaway. I'm impressed."
"Lin, get us out of here," you command, your voice all business. "Plot a course away from the moon. Any direction, just get us into deep space where we can't be watched."
"Already on it," he replies, his fingers a blur across the controls. "Prepping for immediate departure. Strap in."
The Nightfall's engines roar to life, and the ship lifts smoothly from the docking bay. Lin expertly pilots you through the treacherous canyons of Nar Shaddaa's lower levels, ascending past the glittering casinos and into the polluted, starless sky. Moments later, with a lurch and a flash of light, the Smuggler's Moon vanishes from the viewscreen, replaced by the serene, infinite starfield of deep space. You are clear. You are safe.
The bridge is quiet now, the only sound the low hum of the ship's systems. You, Lin, and Vela gather around the holotable, its surface dominated by the enigmatic artifact. The prize is won. Now it's time to see what door it unlocks.
"The broker said it needs a powerful Force-sensitive to activate it," Lin says, his voice hushed with anticipation.
You nod, taking a deep breath to center yourself. You reach out and place your hand flat on the cool, ivory-like surface of the scrimshaw.
You close your eyes and let the Force flow from you, not as a placid sanctuary, but as an inquisitive, probing current. You pour your energy into the artifact, seeking the lock that will turn the key.
For a moment, nothing happens. Then, under your palm, the scrimshaw begins to vibrate with a low, resonant hum. The intricate carvings on its surface start to glow with a malevolent crimson light. The patterns, which seemed random before, begin to shift and writhe, sliding into a new alignment like the tumblers of a lock. The air on the bridge grows cold, and a faint, discordant chorus of whispers echoes at the edge of your hearing—the psychic residue of centuries of Sith rituals.
Vela instinctively places a hand on her lightsaber, her eyes narrowing at the dark side energy emanating from the artifact. Lin takes a half-step back, his face pale with awe and fear.
On the holotable, a new image flares into life. A star chart, but one unlike any you have ever seen. It shows a single, twisting hyperspace lane, a blood-red ribbon cutting through a region of space marked as an impassable stellar nursery—a place of volatile, newborn stars and gravitational anomalies. No sane pilot would ever attempt to navigate it. It's a route that doesn't officially exist, a secret path hidden in plain sight.
At the end of the route, a single, dark planet is marked. It has no name, only a chilling Sith designation: Aethel.
A wave of information floods your mind directly from the artifact—not words, but feelings and images. You see a world shrouded in perpetual twilight, battered by electrical storms. You see a towering obsidian monastery, built to channel and amplify the dark side. You feel the presence of a single, powerful consciousness at its heart—a mind of immense age, cruelty, and intellect. The Master of the Order of Unbroken Truth.
You pull your hand back from the scrimshaw, the red glow fading, the whispers ceasing. The star chart remains, a stark and undeniable invitation.
You have your destination. You have the path. The heart of the serpent has been revealed.
“We know our path, is there anything else we should acquire before we begin our campaign?”

You eye Vela’s lightsaber half-jokingly. For a fleeting second, her hand tightens on the hilt, a flicker of pure possessiveness in her eyes. The joke lands, but only just.
She lets out a short, humorless breath. "You cannot 'acquire' this, Kaelen," she says, her voice flat. "It is earned. It is a part of me." She pauses, her gaze sweeping over you, then toward the cockpit where Lin is working. "We have what we need. Our armor is repaired, the ship's weapon systems are fully charged, and my blade is sharp. More gear just adds weight. The battle ahead will be won by speed, precision, and will. No amount of shopping can buy us that."
From the pilot's seat, Lin swivels around. "Vela's right about the combat side," he says, his tone serious. "But the journey itself is a campaign. That route..." He gestures to the blood-red hyperspace lane still glowing on the holotable. "It cuts through the 'Wraith's Shroud' nebula. It's unstable, full of gravitational shears and unmapped stellar bodies. The Nightfall is tough, but this isn't a standard jump. Every spare power cell, every backup component I've stockpiled is going to matter. We are as ready as we can be without a complete shipyard overhaul."
He leans forward, his expression grim. "As for anything else we should acquire... I'd vote for a miracle. Barring that, we have full tanks, full rations, and a map that leads straight to the heart of our enemy. From a logistics standpoint, this is the best we can hope for."
You look from Vela's hardened resolve to Lin's pragmatic caution. They are the twin anchors of your crew—the sword and the shield. They are ready.
You give a final nod, your gaze fixed on the ominous path displayed before you.
"Then we have everything we need," you state, your voice resonating with finality. "Lin, take us to Aethel. Let's not keep the Master waiting."
"Take us to Aethel," you command, your voice cutting through the sterile silence of the bridge. "Let's not keep the Master waiting."
Lin gives a solemn nod, his face illuminated by the crimson glow of the hyperspace route. "Aye, Kaelen." His hands move with practiced confidence over the controls, inputting the impossible coordinates. "Brace yourselves. This is going to be rough."
The starfield on the viewscreen doesn't elongate into the familiar blue-white lines of a standard jump. Instead, it seems to tear open. Reality fractures, and the Nightfall plunges into a roiling, chaotic tunnel of angry crimson and bruised purple, the very fabric of hyperspace warped and unstable. The ship groans in protest, the sound of stressed metal echoing through the hull. This is not a river; it's a storm.
The journey is an ordeal. Alarms blare almost constantly.
"Gravitational shear dead ahead!" Lin shouts, his knuckles white as he wrestles with the flight controls. The ship lurches violently, throwing you against your restraints. "Compensating, but the nav-computer can't keep up! It's like trying to fly through a minefield!"
Vela, unstrapped from her seat, moves through the shuddering bridge with the low, steady grace of a predator. She braces a sparking power conduit with one hand while her other flies across a secondary control panel. "Aft shields are fluctuating! Rerouting power from the port cannons!" Her voice is tight, but there is no panic in it—only focused, immediate action.
You close your eyes, shutting out the chaos of the bridge. You reach out not with your sight, but with the Force. You let go of the placid defense of your Sanctuary and instead use the Force as a probe, a living sensor array. You feel the twisting currents of hyperspace, the invisible eddies and dangerous voids that Lin’s scanners are struggling to map.
"Lin, hard to port in five... four... three... two... now!" you command.
Lin obeys without hesitation, yanking the controls. The Nightfall veers sharply, narrowly avoiding a shimmering distortion that would have torn the ship apart.
"How did you know that was there?" he asks, his voice filled with awe.
"I felt it," you reply simply.
For hours, this becomes the rhythm of your survival: a trinity of purpose. Lin pilots with instinct and genius. Vela keeps the ship from tearing itself apart. And you become the navigator, feeling your way through the storm, your mind and the Force the only reliable map you have.
Then, as you draw closer to your destination, a new threat emerges. It is not physical, but mental. A cold, insidious pressure begins to build at the edges of your consciousness. It's the psychic presence of the Master of Aethel, reaching out across the void.
Lin cries out, his hands flying to his temples. "The... the hull integrity... I see cracks everywhere! We're not going to make it!"
"Lin, stay focused!" Vela barks, but her own face is pale. You can feel the psychic assault battering her as well, whispering old lies from her past, feeding her doubts. You betrayed your true masters. You followed a broken thing. You are nothing without the Sith.
The attack on you is the most profound. A voice, ancient and impossibly powerful, slides into your mind like a shard of ice. Anomaly. Cipher Null. You think you have a will of your own? You are a weapon that has forgotten its purpose. You are a flaw that must be corrected. Come to me, and I will unmake you. I will show you the truth of your design.
The pressure is immense, a crushing weight that seeks to extinguish your sense of self. But you have faced the darkness within before. You have stood in the silence of your own soul and found strength there.
You don't push back with anger or fear. You do the one thing your enemy cannot comprehend. You expand your Sanctuary, not outwards, but inwards. You create a zone of perfect, unshakable peace within your own mind, a nullifying field that dissolves the Master's psychic venom. The silence spreads, flowing from you to your crew.
Lin shakes his head, the phantom cracks on his console disappearing. Vela's jaw unclenches, her eyes clearing. The cold pressure on the bridge recedes, held at bay by the quiet miracle of your power.
Just as the psychic assault fades, the hyperspace reversion alarm screams. With a final, violent shudder, the Nightfall bursts back into real space.
The viewscreen shows a planet shrouded in a perpetual, stormy twilight. Jagged bolts of lightning, violet and green, crawl across its dark clouds. A single, monolithic structure is visible on the dark side of the planet, an obsidian spire that seems to drink the very light from the stars around it, pulsing with a faint, malevolent energy.
You have arrived. Battered, damaged, but unbroken, the Nightfall floats in silent orbit above Aethel, the sanctum of your enemy. The hunt is over. The final battle is about to begin.
"I believe we’ve been invited," you say, the words hanging heavy in the charged atmosphere of the bridge. "If they know what I am, we need to be extremely careful moving forward. We cannot trust my power will save us."
Vela nods, her face a grim mask. The psychic assault has reminded her of the insidious power of a true Sith Master. "He knows your Sanctuary is a nullifying field," she states, her voice low and tense. "He will not engage you on your terms. He'll use the environment, his soldiers, his machines... anything to break you before you can get close. This will not be a duel. It will be a gauntlet."
Lin, wiping sweat from his brow, swivels his chair around. "Careful is an understatement, Kaelen. The trip through the Wraith's Shroud did a number on us. The starboard shield emitters are running at fifty percent, and I've got micro-fractures all along the engine struts. The Nightfall can fight, but she can't take another beating like that." He looks at the stormy planet on the viewscreen with dread. "We have one shot at this. Whatever we do, we can't afford a prolonged battle."
As if summoned by your words, a new light appears on the console. It's not an alarm or a weapon lock. It's a single, clear, encrypted transmission. Lin's eyes go wide. "I'm not even trying to communicate... they're just... sending it."
He brings it up on the main screen. There is no voice, no text. Just a calm, steady navigational vector, a golden line that cuts through the planet's violent atmosphere and points to a single, illuminated landing platform at the very base of the obsidian spire. It's not a threat or a warning. It is a summons. A valet, pointing to a reserved parking spot. The sheer arrogance of it is more chilling than any threat.
"So much for a stealth approach," Lin mutters, his voice strained.
Vela's hand rests on the hilt of her lightsaber. "They are trying to control our movements from the start. Forcing us into a kill box of their choosing."
She turns to you, her eyes burning with intensity. "We do not have to accept. We have the element of surprise on a macro level—they don't know when we will strike. We could find another landing zone, something far from the spire, and make our approach on foot. It would be long and difficult, but it would be on our terms."
"Accept the invitation," you say, your voice cutting through the tension on the bridge. "Weakening ourselves trekking through that wasteland serves no purpose. They want to play on their home ground? Fine. Let's not disappoint them."
Lin gives a sharp, nervous nod, his hands already flying across the controls. "Following their vector. At least I don't have to worry about the turbulence this time."
Vela's expression is one of grim approval. The sheer audacity of walking into the serpent's mouth appeals to her warrior's sensibilities. "They expect us to be predictable," she states, her hand resting on her lightsaber. "Let's be predictably dangerous."
The Nightfall smoothly alters its course, following the golden line down into Aethel's violent, storm-wracked atmosphere. The descent is eerily calm. The lightning that ravages the rest of the planet seems to part around your vessel, held back by some unseen force. The landing platform at the base of the obsidian spire grows larger, a single point of light in a world of oppressive darkness.
As Lin brings the ship in for a perfect landing, the sheer scale of the monastery becomes apparent. It is not merely a building; it is a monument to the dark side, a jagged black mountain of unnatural rock that seems to absorb all light and sound. The air itself feels heavy, saturated with a cold, ancient malice.
"I'm staying with the ship," Lin says, his voice a determined whisper. "I'll keep the engines hot and run constant scans. If anything moves that isn't you, I'll know. I'll be your eye in the sky for as long as I can."
You give him a grateful nod. "Be ready for anything, Lin."
You and Vela head to the exit ramp. You are no longer wearing the finery of a gambler, but your simple, functional combat attire. This is not a game of deception. This is an execution.
The ramp lowers with a heavy thud onto the polished, black surface of the landing platform. The air that rushes in is cold and smells of ozone and wet stone. No welcoming party awaits you. There are no guards, no droids, nothing but the howling wind and the monolithic spire looming over you.
You and Vela walk down the ramp together, your footsteps echoing in the unnatural silence. The moment your boots touch the platform, a single, deep chime, like a funeral bell, resonates from within the spire, and a massive gate at its base begins to grind open, revealing a yawning, dark maw.
You stand at the edge of the ramp, the cold, ozone-scented air of Aethel a stark contrast to the filtered environment of the Nightfall. Before stepping into the proverbial dragon's maw, you pause. Closing your eyes, you tune out the howling wind and the deep, unsettling hum of the spire. You let your senses expand, pushing your perception through the oppressive dark side energy that blankets this world like a shroud.
The Force here is sick, twisted into a weapon. It’s not just an absence of light, but an active, predatory presence. Your mind feels it first as a series of sharp, jagged edges in the psychic landscape—wards. They are like invisible tripwires of pure malice, designed to disorient, confuse, and sow terror in any who are not masters of the dark side.
Beyond that, you sense the spire itself. It is a massive dark side battery, drawing in the raw energy of the planet's perpetual storms and focusing it. It pulses with a slow, ancient rhythm, like a sleeping leviathan. You can feel the cold, calculating intelligence at its heart—the Master—watching you, observing your every move through the very fabric of the Force on this world.
Lowering your senses to the physical realm, you feel the landing platform beneath your feet. It's not just inert stone. A complex network of power conduits runs just beneath the surface, humming with latent energy. They lead to seams in the floor and walls that are all but invisible to the naked eye. This entire area is a carefully constructed kill zone.
You open your eyes and turn to Vela, who has been standing beside you, a silent, patient sentinel.
"It's a fortress of the mind as much as stone," you say, your voice low and steady, easily audible to her over the wind. "The air is laced with psychic wards. They'll try to turn us on each other, feed us lies. Don't trust any thought that feels like a sudden, foreign impulse."
You gesture toward the seemingly empty platform. "This whole platform is wired. Hidden turrets, energy fields... something. They're waiting for us to commit. When we move, they'll spring the trap."
Vela's eyes narrow, scanning the dark, polished stone with new understanding. She gives a curt, decisive nod. "Then we won't give them a clean shot. We'll give them a moving target."
With that, she takes the first step off the ramp, her boots making a sharp, defiant clap on the platform's surface. You follow immediately, the two of you moving in perfect sync, not towards the open gate, but angling to the side, using the bulk of the Nightfall as your initial cover. 
You fall into step with Vela, a perfect mirror to her movements. Her lead is aggressive, angling away from the invitingly open gate and forcing the enemy's hand. As a single, unified force, you move across the polished black stone.
The moment you clear the shadow of the Nightfall, the world erupts.
The deep hum beneath your feet shrieks into a high-pitched whine. Panels in the floor and the surrounding cliff faces retract with pneumatic hisses, revealing a dozen automated blaster turrets. A web of searing red energy lances out, converging on Vela's position. Simultaneously, the psychic wards you sensed flare to life. A wave of pure terror washes over you, whispering of failure, betrayal, and the cold, lonely death that awaits you on this forgotten rock.
But you are ready.
"Turrets! Eleven o'clock and two o'clock high!" Lin's panicked voice yells in your ear comm, confirming what you already know.
You don't flinch. As the blaster fire screams towards Vela, you thrust both hands forward. "Vela, now!"
Instead of a wide, placid field, you shape your Sanctuary into a focused, shimmering shield directly in front of her. The blaster bolts hit the shield not with an explosive crash, but with a silent, fizzling hiss, their energy completely and utterly nullified before they can reach their target. The psychic assault strikes the bubble of peace around your mind and dissolves into nothingness.
Freed from the initial volley, Vela doesn't hesitate. She is a blur of motion. Igniting her crimson blade, she doesn't charge the turrets—she charges the space between them. With your Sanctuary shield moving with her like a second skin, she becomes an unstoppable force. She deflects a stray bolt that gets past your shield, the energy screaming off into the stormy sky. Her lightsaber becomes a whirlwind of destruction, slicing through the first turret's mounting with surgical precision. It topples, sparking uselessly.
"They're targeting you, Kaelen!" Lin shouts. "The turrets are shifting their fire patterns!"
They have recognized the source of the protection. The web of fire retracts from Vela and focuses entirely on you.
"Go!" you yell to Vela, planting your feet. You widen your Sanctuary shield, creating a larger bubble of absolute peace around yourself, absorbing the full, concentrated fury of the remaining turrets. The ground around you is scorched and vaporized by bolts that miss their mark by inches, but within your shield, there is only calm.
This is the synergy you have built. You are the anchor, the immovable object. She is the sword, the unstoppable force.
Vela uses the opening you've given her. With a Force-assisted leap, she lands amidst a cluster of three more turrets, her blade a crimson arc of death. In seconds, they are reduced to smoking slag. She flows from one target to the next, a relentless, efficient predator, dismantling the kill box piece by methodical piece.
In less than a minute, it's over. The last turret falls, and an eerie silence descends once more, broken only by the crackle of burning circuits and the ever-present howl of the wind. The massive gate to the spire remains open, an unblinking, dark eye.
You drop your shield, the strain of absorbing so much energy sending a tremor through your arms. You and Vela stand amidst the wreckage of the Master's welcome party, unscathed. You met their trap not with fear or hesitation, but with perfect, deadly harmony.
You have passed the first test. Now, the sanctum itself awaits.
"Lin, get us everything you can on this Spire," you say, your voice calm but firm over the comm link, even as you catch your breath from the effort of maintaining the shield. "I want alternative exfil options for when things go south."
Over the comm, Lin's voice is a mixture of awe and frantic energy. "On it, Kaelen! The spire is a black hole for most of my sensors—it's shielded against active scanning. But I'm cross-referencing the power conduits you spotted. I might be able to map the internal grid... find a maintenance shaft, a ventilation duct... something. Just keep your comm line open."
You turn to Vela, who is deactivating her lightsaber, the crimson blade retracting with a sharp hiss. Her eyes are fixed on the yawning black gateway ahead. "Shall we continue?"
Vela doesn't answer with words. She simply gives you a sharp, determined nod, her gaze never wavering from the entrance. She is a weapon aimed at the heart of the enemy, and her purpose is singular.
Together, you walk away from the smoking wreckage, your boots crunching on scorched durasteel, and step across the threshold into the spire.
The transition is instantaneous and deeply unsettling. The howling wind and the smell of ozone are cut off as if by a knife. You are plunged into absolute silence and utter darkness. The massive gate grinds shut behind you with a sound of final, booming finality, sealing you in.
For a heartbeat, you are suspended in a void. Then, with a low hum, soft, crimson light emanates from glowing crystals embedded in the walls, revealing the chamber.
You are in a vast, circular hall. The floor is polished obsidian, so perfect it reflects the ceiling like a dark, still lake. In the center of the hall stands a single, life-sized statue carved from some pale, veined stone. It is not of a Sith Lord or an ancient king, but of a hooded and robed figure kneeling in supplication, its face hidden in shadow. The statue radiates a palpable aura of despair and eternal servitude.
The air is cold and dead, carrying no scent. There are no other doors, no visible exits, save for the sealed gate behind you. The only path forward seems to be toward the kneeling statue.
"It's another trap," Vela murmurs, her voice a low whisper in the profound silence. Her hand hovers over her lightsaber.
"Another test," you correct her gently. Your senses are on fire. The dark side energy in this room is not aggressive like it was outside. It is watchful, patient, and intelligent. It is waiting for you to act.
You close your eyes again, shutting out the sight of the kneeling statue and the oppressive crimson light. You turn your senses inward, creating that core of unshakeable peace, and then project your perception outward, not as a probe, but as a passive listening post. You don't try to pierce the darkness; you let it wash over you, analyzing its currents.
The air is thick with a single, dominant emotion: despair. It emanates from the kneeling statue in slow, cold waves. It's an ancient, profound hopelessness, the psychic echo of a will that was not merely defeated but utterly and completely broken. It's the feeling of a soul that has stared into the abyss and surrendered to it entirely. This is the test. The Master wants to see how you will react to this concentrated despair.
You sense two powerful lures, two baited hooks hidden within the emotion.
The first is a temptation to anger. The statue is an icon of submission, an insult to any being with a strong will. The dark side whispers to you, urging you to strike it down, to shatter this symbol of weakness. It wants you to answer despair with rage, an act that would feed the spire and attune you to its dark energy.
The second lure is a temptation to pity. A different path, but just as dangerous. The despair is so profound it begs for release. The Force whispers that you could try to cleanse the statue, to pour your Light, your Sanctuary, into it to soothe the psychic pain. But you sense this is a trap of equal measure—a psychic sinkhole. Pouring your energy into this monument of hopelessness would be like trying to fill a black hole with a thimble of water. It would drain you, weaken you, and leave you vulnerable.
Beneath it all, you feel the hidden mechanism. The statue is a lock. The room is a pressure plate. The correct action is the key. Rage is the wrong key. Pity is the wrong key. Both lead to failure.
The Master isn't testing your power. He's testing your identity. Are you the Sith weapon he believes you to be, lashing out in anger? Or are you a traditional Jedi, bleeding your strength away in a futile act of compassion?
You open your eyes, the full weight of the psychological trap laid bare.
"The statue is a psychic lure," you say to Vela, your voice a low echo in the dead air. "It's drenched in despair. It wants me to either shatter it in anger or try to 'heal' it out of pity."
You look from the kneeling figure to Vela's tense, ready posture.
"Both are traps. One feeds the dark side with rage, the other drains my strength. The Master wants to force me into a box—Sith or Jedi. He wants to see which way I'll break."
You turn your head slightly, your gaze shifting between the kneeling statue and Vela's ready stance. "You two know my power almost as well as I do," you say, your voice a low murmur that carries in the dead air. "Ideas?"
Vela doesn't take her eyes off the statue, but her lips thin into a hard line. "It is a Sith mind game," she whispers back. "They thrive on theatricality. The Master wants you to engage with his art, to prove something. We should refuse. This is a room, a lock. There is a mechanism. We ignore the statue. We check the walls, the floor. We find the override. We do not play his game."
Just then, Lin's voice, tinny and distant, crackles in your ear comm. He has clearly been listening. "Vela's right, Kaelen. From a logic standpoint, if 'Option A' and 'Option B' are both traps, you don't pick one—you find 'Option C'. The statue is a distraction, designed to make you act on emotion. Don't. There has to be a physical bypass. Or... maybe the test isn't about what you do to the statue, but what you do in its presence."
You turn to Vela, your gaze steady. "Vela, work your angle. If I'm not strong enough, you will be my fail-safe."
She gives you a single, sharp nod of understanding. Without another word, she turns away from the statue and begins a methodical sweep of the chamber's perimeter. Her gloved fingers trace the seamless black walls, her eyes searching for any imperfection, any hint of a physical mechanism. She is your anchor to the practical world, your sword in waiting.
Then, you turn back to the statue, a monument of eternal despair. "I will demonstrate to the Master his limited view of the Force does not define me."
You walk forward with calm, deliberate steps, stopping a few feet before the kneeling figure. You don't draw a weapon or raise your hands. Instead, you lower yourself into a meditative posture, mirroring the statue but remaining upright, a pillar of quiet defiance, not submission.
Closing your eyes, you face the storm.
The wave of cold, absolute hopelessness washes over you, a psychic tsunami designed to drown your will. It brings with it images and feelings, tailored to break you. You see the haunted faces of the children from the Dantana enclave, lost and afraid. You feel the ghost of your own abduction, the terror and pain of being a child stolen by monsters. The lure of pity is agonizing, a siren song urging you to pour your power out, to soothe this endless pain with your Sanctuary.
You acknowledge the feeling. You accept the pain. And you let it go.
Then comes the rage. You see the sneering face of Darth Rictus. You feel the burning hatred of the Chimera, your dark counterpart. The despair in the room tries to curdle into fury, whispering that you should have made them suffer more, that you should obliterate this symbol of weakness before you. It wants you to answer pain with violence.
You acknowledge the anger. You accept its fire. And you let it go.
You do not fight the despair. You do not heal it. You do not destroy it. You simply sit within its storm, an island of quiet resolve. You are not a Sith weapon. You are not a Jedi martyr. You are Kaelen. And that is enough.
In the silent chamber, a profound change occurs. The oppressive psychic pressure does not shatter; it simply dissolves. The cold waves of hopelessness cease. The room becomes neutral territory once more.
With a low groan of ancient mechanisms, the kneeling statue begins to descend into the floor. It sinks without a trace into the polished obsidian, revealing not solid ground, but a descending spiral staircase, leading down into the deeper darkness of the spire.
You open your eyes. The path is open.
Vela stops her search, her hand hovering over a barely perceptible seam in the wall. She looks from the now-empty space in the center of the room to you, a flicker of profound respect in her eyes. You passed the Master's test by refusing to play by his rules.
You rise to your feet, the ordeal having settled your spirit rather than draining it. You and Vela meet at the edge of the newly revealed staircase. The air that drifts up from below is colder still, carrying the faint, metallic scent of machinery and the undeniable presence of the enemy you came here to face. You have passed the Master's test of identity. Now, you must face the Master himself.
Without a word, you and Vela begin the descent. The spiral staircase is carved from the same cold, black stone as the spire itself, and it plunges deeper into the planet's heart. The air grows colder, heavier, and the faint, metallic scent of machinery intensifies. The Master's psychic presence is no longer a diffuse, oppressive blanket; it is a focused, analytical beam, like an entomologist studying a specimen under a microscope. He is watching you, learning you.
The stairs open into a massive, circular chamber that is a terrifying fusion of a Sith throne room and a dark-science laboratory. Strange, humming machines—part arcane artifact, part advanced technology—are embedded in the curving walls, connected by thick, glowing power conduits that pulse with crimson light. The ceiling above is a massive dome of reinforced transparisteel, revealing the magnificent, terrifying spectacle of Aethel's perpetual lightning storm. It is like being at the bottom of a dark ocean, watching a tempest rage above.
And there, in the center of the room, on a raised dais connected to the surrounding machinery by a web of humming cables, is the Master.
He is not what you expected. There is no imposing armor, no monstrous physique. He is an elderly human male, physically frail, his body withered by age and his reliance on the spire's technology. He is dressed in the simple, dark robes of a scholar, and his head is bald, save for a few wisps of white hair. Thin, glowing wires run from the command throne he sits upon, connecting to ports on his temples and the back of his neck. His power is not in his body; it is in his mind, and this entire chamber is his exoskeleton. His eyes, ancient and pale blue, lock onto you, and in their depths, you see a chilling, passionless intellect.
His voice, when it comes, is not a broadcast over a speaker, but a calm, conversational thought that materializes directly in your mind, in Lin's, and in Vela's.
"Welcome."
The thought is serene, academic. "I must confess, your progress has been fascinating. You have bypassed my physical security, executed my champion, and resisted my preliminary psychic assays. The design flaw that allows for your self-awareness is more robust than my predecessor's data suggested."
He gestures slightly with one withered hand, a gesture that causes the machinery around the room to hum with a higher frequency.
"Do not mistake my curiosity for approval, Anomaly. You have come here believing you are the hero of some grand epic. A lost boy, returned. A warrior, fighting for his family." His mental voice is laced with a cold, dismissive amusement. "You are none of those things. You are a weapon that has learned to name its own parts. A fascinating, but ultimately flawed, piece of machinery."
He leans forward, his pale eyes seeming to pierce through to your very soul. "You have not come here to defeat me. You have come here to be decommissioned. An anomaly must be understood before it can be corrected, and I shall enjoy taking you apart, piece by piece, to discover what makes you work."
As he finishes his pronouncement, the chamber transforms. Panels in the floor begin to glow with malevolent energy. The humming machinery whines, preparing to unleash whatever dark power it contains.
This is not a duel. It's a dissection.
Vela doesn't wait. With a defiant snarl, she ignites her lightsaber, its crimson blade casting a rebellious glow against the Master's cold, calculated light. "You'll have to get through me first, old man," she spits, her voice a raw, human sound in the sterile, silent chamber.
At that exact moment, Lin's frantic voice cuts through your comm. "Kaelen, I'm in! I finally cracked a fraction of their system! The Master... he isn't just controlling the spire, he is the spire! His life support, the defenses, the power core—it's all him! You can't just fight him, you have to fight the entire room!"
The final confrontation has begun. The frail old man on the throne is an army of one, and you are standing in the heart of his weapon.
A cold, quiet understanding dawns within you. The Master sees you as a flawed weapon, but you see him with a chilling familiarity. You have been where he is. You have felt the consciousness of a fortress merge with your own, felt its ancient systems become your limbs, its weapons your will. He thinks he is the only one who understands this level of union between mind and machine. He is wrong.
"You're not the only one who knows how to become a fortress," you say, your voice calm and clear, cutting through the Master's mental broadcast.
Vela, seeing your intent, takes a defensive position in front of you, her crimson blade held ready, a defiant shield against the coming storm.
You hold out your hands. The air around them shimmers, coalescing into the familiar, reality-nullifying fields of your Sanctuary Gloves. But you don't stop there. You reach deeper into your power, into the absolute silence at the core of your being, and pull.
The air around you warps. Six shimmering, blade-like distortions tear themselves into existence, hovering in a circular pattern behind your shoulders. They are not made of light or energy, but of pure absence. They are slivers of your Sanctuary, honed into impossibly sharp edges of perfect peace, each one a silent, deadly weapon. These Sanctuary Blades hum with a quiet power, moving with a will of their own, extensions of your defensive nature given offensive form.
For the first time since you arrived, the Master's serene, academic composure breaks. His mental voice, once calm and dismissive, is now laced with a sharp edge of surprise and... intrigue.
"Impossible," the thought echoes in the chamber, a crack in his perfect intellectual facade. "This... this is not in the design specifications. A spontaneous evolution. You are not just a broken weapon... you are a new one."
His withered face twists into a grotesque smile, no longer one of amusement, but of avaricious hunger. The curiosity of the scientist has been replaced by the desire of the collector who has just found a priceless, unique specimen.
"Fascinating," he whispers in your mind. "The dissection will be even more rewarding than I imagined."
With a final thought, the entire chamber screams into deadly life. The crimson conduits on the walls pulse violently, and arcs of raw dark side energy erupt from the humming machinery, lancing across the room. The floor panels glow, projecting energy fields designed to trap and incapacitate.
The final battle has begun. You and Vela, a warrior of flesh and a master of the void, stand against a man who has become a god in his own machine, ready to tear him apart from the inside out.
With the last of your reserves, you focus your will on one of the six shimmering blades hovering at your back. It detaches from the defensive circle and streaks across the room with impossible speed, not aimed at an enemy, but at your ally. The blade of pure null-energy merges seamlessly with the bottom of Vela's lightsaber hilt. It extends with a silent hum, a perfect, shimmering counterpart to her own crimson blade of rage.
Vela's eyes widen for a fraction of a second as she feels the shift in balance. Then, instinct takes over. Her grip adjusts, and her duelist's stance flows into the aggressive posture of a double-bladed weapon master. She now wields a weapon that embodies your entire partnership: one side, a blade of pure, destructive passion; the other, a blade of absolute, silent peace.
"Unprecedented," the Master's thought whispers, the academic curiosity now completely consumed by a cold, covetous fire. "You will be my masterpiece."
The chamber unleashes its full fury. The arcs of dark side energy become a storm of directed lightning. The floor panels erupt not with traps, but with columns of raw force designed to crush bone. From hidden alcoves in the walls, articulated mechanical arms tipped with crackling energy pincers lash out.
"Let's move!" you yell, your voice nearly lost in the cacophony.
You lead the advance. Your remaining five Sanctuary Blades form a protective vanguard, darting through the air to intercept the lightning bolts, their silent nature nullifying the crackling energy on contact. You slam your Sanctuary-gloved hands onto the floor panels ahead of you, and the erupting pillars of force dissolve into nothingness before they can form, creating a narrow, safe path forward.
Vela is a whirlwind of crimson and shimmer. She leaps into the fray, her new dual-saber a terrifying pinwheel of death. The crimson blade slices through the mechanical arms, sundering metal and circuits. The Sanctuary blade passes through the arcs of dark side energy, harmlessly dispersing them. She is a perfect fusion of offense and defense, carving a path through the Master's automated army.
"Kaelen, the conduits!" Lin's voice crackles desperately in your ear. "The thickest ones, running from the ceiling into the back of the throne! That's his direct power feed from the storm! It's more than just energy; it's how he's integrated with the spire's core! If you can cut that, you might sever his connection!"
You see it. A massive, pulsating artery of woven cables and esoteric technology, protected by a concentration of defenses.
"Vela! The main conduit! On three!" you shout.
She understands instantly. You both change direction, pushing directly for the dais. The Master, sensing your intent, focuses the spire's entire defensive might on stopping you. A wall of pure kinetic force erupts between you and the throne.
You don't try to go around it. You plant your feet and slam both of your Sanctuary Gloves directly into the shimmering wall. Your power doesn't shatter it; it unmakes it. A hole of absolute nothingness appears in the center of the force field, a silent, gaping wound.
The moment it opens, Vela is through it.
She launches herself into the air, a spinning cyclone of dual-bladed fury, aimed directly at the heart of the Master's power. For the first time, you see a flicker of something new in the old man's pale eyes—not curiosity, not hunger, but a sliver of pure, undiluted fear. He raises a withered hand, and the full, unbridled power of the spire bears down on your friend.
The full, unbridled power of the spire, a tidal wave of pure dark side energy and kinetic force, crashes down on Vela as she hangs suspended at the apex of her leap. The air around her screams and warps under the strain. It is a god's wrath, concentrated on a single mortal body, an absolute power designed to utterly erase her from existence.
You see it coming. You feel the totality of the Master's will focused on her. With a guttural roar that tears from your throat, you pour every last shred of your remaining strength into your power. Your five hovering Sanctuary Blades, your last line of offense and defense, blur into motion. They don't attack the Master; they streak towards Vela, forming a desperate, shimmering cocoon of null-energy around her just as the wave of annihilation hits.
For a single, silent, eternal moment, the blades hold. They absorb the crushing force, nullify the searing dark energy, and sacrifice themselves in the process. One by one, they dissolve into nothingness, their existence given to buy Vela a single heartbeat.
It is enough.
Her path cleared for that crucial instant, Vela completes her attack. Her dual-saber, a pinwheel of silent peace and furious passion, scythes through the air. The crimson blade of her lightsaber incinerates the outer casing of the massive conduit, melting through its arcane armor. The Sanctuary blade, a sliver of pure nothingness, follows a microsecond behind. It does not cut or burn; it unmakes. It strikes the core of the energy flow, and the connection between the Master and his fortress is not just severed—it is deleted from reality.
The feedback is instantaneous and apocalyptic.
The Master's pale eyes go wide with a final, silent scream of pure psychic agony as a billion volts of raw, untamed storm energy reverse flow, surging directly into his mind. His frail body arches back, glowing from within with a blinding crimson light. The command throne explodes in a shower of shrapnel and dark energy, and the Master's physical form is utterly consumed, vaporized in the very heart of the power he sought to command.
The spire dies.
The malevolent crimson light of the chamber flickers and fails, replaced by the chaotic, strobing flashes of emergency power and uncontrolled lightning from the storm above. The hum of the machinery becomes a discordant, groaning death rattle. Massive chunks of the ceiling begin to fall, and the entire structure shudders with deep, resonant booms as its foundations give way.
Vela lands gracefully amidst the chaos, her dual-bladed weapon deactivating as the Sanctuary blade dissolves back into the nothingness from whence it came. She is panting, but alive.
You stagger, the immense effort of your final act of protection leaving you drained and dizzy.
"Kaelen! Vela! The whole place is coming down!" Lin's voice, a beacon of panicked sanity, yells through your comms. "I found a shaft! Thermal exhaust vent on the north side of the chamber! It leads straight outside! Go, now!"
You and Vela lock eyes across the collapsing room. There is no need for words. With a shared nod, you break into a desperate sprint, leaping over sparking cables and dodging falling debris as the heart of the Order of Unbroken Truth tears itself apart around you.
You dive into the exhaust vent just as the throne room implodes, the roar of its destruction chasing you down the dark, metallic tunnel. You emerge onto a windswept ledge, the Nightfall hovering just feet away, its ramp already down, a perfect image of salvation against a backdrop of fire and ruin.
You leap aboard, and the ramp snaps shut behind you, sealing out the storm just as the obsidian spire, the Master's sanctum, finally collapses in on itself, sending a plume of black dust and dark energy miles into the turbulent sky.
On the bridge, there is only the sound of your ragged breaths and the quiet hum of the Nightfall's engines. You watch on the viewscreen as Aethel, the dead world, shrinks behind you. The hunt is over. The Order of Unbroken Truth is broken. Its champion is dead. Its Master is an echo.
For three days, a profound quiet has settled over the Dantana Enclave. It is a silence that is more than a mere absence of sound; it is an absence of pressure. The suffocating, omnipresent will of the Order’s Master is gone, leaving behind an emptiness that feels both liberating and unnervingly vast. The air itself, once thick with menace, now smells only of rain-soaked earth and the faint, clean scent of ozone from the Enclave's ancient systems.
You, Lin, and Vela have used this time to recover. The wounds are more than physical. You can feel the change in your crew, a subtle shift in the bonds that hold you together.
Vela has been a whirlwind of focused energy. When not sharpening her crimson blade or meticulously maintaining her armor, she has been practicing. You’ve watched her move through her Juyo forms in the Enclave’s central chamber, her movements as sharp and precise as ever, but with a new element. Since you gifted her the second, temporary blade of pure Sanctuary energy, she has been adapting her style, her mind instinctively mapping the possibilities of a dual-bladed form. She is a weapon honing herself, but her eyes often drift to you, watchful. The gratitude you showed her, the simple act of a hug, was an input she still hasn't fully processed. For the first time, she is not just a warrior in a command structure; she is part of a pack, and she is uncertain of the protocol.
Lin, true to his nature, has retreated into the hum of technology. He has been running endless diagnostics on the Nightfall, patching the holes in its systems left by your frantic escape, and, more importantly, scrubbing your ghost-like signature from the data streams you touched. He works with a quiet, fierce intensity. Every now and then, he looks up from a console, his gaze sweeping over you and Vela, a silent confirmation that his shield, his expertise, is holding strong around you. The relief on his face is palpable, but so is the exhaustion. He is one man doing the work of a dozen, and the open objective—finding him an assistant droid—feels more pressing than ever.
And you, Kaelen, stand at the heart of it all. The Fortress Meld has receded, but a phantom limb of its consciousness remains. You can feel the Enclave breathing around you, its ancient machinery a gentle thrum in the back of your mind. For the first time since your abduction, there is no one hunting you. No creator pulling your strings, no master seeking to decommission you. The title of "Anomaly" feels truer than ever. You are a free variable in the galactic equation. The silence is your own.
On the evening of the third day, as a soft rain patters against the outer walls of the Enclave, Master Zhar Lestin seeks you out. He finds you in the central chamber, where the great star-map projector now lies dormant. He moves with the quiet grace of a creature of the wild, his presence a calm, steady light in the Force.
He doesn't speak at first, simply standing beside you, following your gaze into the dark, reflective heart of the chamber.
"It is truly quiet," he says, his voice a low, peaceful hum. "The Force here sings its own song again, not one forced upon it by a dark will. This is your doing, Kaelen. You have given this world, and its history, back to itself."
He turns his wise, old eyes to you. "But a gift must be entrusted to a keeper. A fortress without a purpose is a tomb. And a warrior without a war must choose a new path. I can feel the questions stirring in you. You have won your freedom. Now, you face the most difficult challenge of all: what to do with it."
You turn your full attention to the Togruta Master, the quiet hum of the Enclave a familiar presence at the back of your mind. You choose to keep this council between the two of you for now. This is a conversation that needs the weight of history, of the Force, and Zhar Lestin is the only one here who truly understands all three.
"You're right, Master Lestin," you begin, your voice low but clear in the echoing chamber. "It's a peace I haven't known since I was a child, running in these same halls. But it's not my peace to keep. This place... the Enclave... it's a legacy of the Jedi. My path led me back here to cleanse it, not to claim it."
You take a breath, gathering your thoughts. "My crew and I, we're not keepers. We're survivors. Vela, Lin... they follow me. If I were to anchor myself here, I would be anchoring them to a life they didn't choose, in a place that isn't theirs. We can't be the guardians of Dantana."
You look him directly in the eyes, your decision solidifying as you speak it aloud. "I want to ask you to take up that mantle. For the Jedi Order, or what remains of it, to resume its watch. You and the Forgotten are the true soul of this world. This Enclave belongs with you."
Having laid the fate of the fortress at his feet, you move on to your own. "As for my future... it needs to be smaller. Quieter. The galaxy thinks 'Cipher Null' is a ghost and that Darth Rictus was killed by some unknown power. I want to keep it that way. My plan is to take the Nightfall and disappear. For a year, maybe more. Lin is the best slicer I've ever known; if anyone can scrub our names from every Sith Imperial and Republic database, it's him. I want us to be truly free. No creators, no masters, no one hunting us."
You glance towards the hangar where you know the Nightfall waits. "I owe it to them. Lin needs help, a droid to ease his workload. Vela needs... purpose, beyond just being my sword. And I need to give them a life where they aren't constantly looking over their shoulders. Once we're certain we're clear, we find a quiet world in the Outer Rim and just... live. For a while."
A thought, spontaneous and heartfelt, comes to you then. "I know your duty is here... but should you ever desire to see the galaxy again, there will always be a place for you on our ship, Master Zhar."
Zhar Lestin listens with perfect, unnerving stillness. His ancient eyes hold no judgment, only a deep, resounding understanding. When you finish, he nods slowly, a gesture of profound gravity.
"Your wisdom honors the memory of your Master Leona," he says, his voice filled with warmth. "You see the truth not only of yourself, but of those you lead. It is a rare gift."
He gestures to the chamber around you. "I accept. On behalf of the Jedi who came before and the people of this world, I will be the keeper of the Dantana Enclave. We will guard it, study its light, and ensure it remains a sanctuary. Your victory will not be forgotten, but your name will remain unspoken. You have my word."
He considers your plan, a faint, sad smile touching his lips. "To seek peace in a galaxy at war is the most rebellious act of all. It is a worthy goal, Kaelen. A necessary one. And your desires for your crew... they are the heart of a true leader. You do not see them as assets, but as family."
He places a hand on his chest, bowing his head slightly. "I am humbled by your offer. In another life, I might have enjoyed the travels of a wandering scholar. But my place is here, with my people. Dantana is my final watch. But know this: wherever you go, you carry my respect. If you ever need a safe harbor, if you ever need to hear a friendly voice, my comm signal will always be open to you. Dantana will remember."
The decision is made. The Enclave is secure. Your path is set. All that remains is to inform your crew.
Master Zhar Lestin gives you a final, knowing nod before turning to walk towards the archives, already assuming his new duties as keeper. You are left alone in the quiet heart of the fortress. 
You make your way from the Enclave's silent, cavernous halls and back into the familiar, metallic confines of the Nightfall. The ship is your true home now, a sanctuary built not of ancient stone but of plasteel, wiring, and shared history. You head for the galley, a small, utilitarian space that serves as the heart of the ship when you aren't on the bridge.
The scene that greets you is a perfect snapshot of your crew.
Lin is hunched over the small galley table, a datapad propped up against a stack of ration packs. His fingers trace lines of code across the screen, his brow furrowed in concentration. He looks utterly exhausted, the deep shadows under his eyes a testament to the past few days, but there's a stubborn fire in his expression. He's in his element, holding the digital world at bay.
Vela stands by the counter, her armor off, leaving her in a simple, practical black tunic. She’s methodically disassembling her crimson-hilted lightsaber, each component laid out on a clean cloth with surgical precision. Her movements are economical and focused, a form of meditation. She’s maintaining her weapon, her symbol of purpose, but her posture is less rigid than it was days ago. There’s a new stillness to her, a watchfulness that has replaced her constant readiness for a fight.
You don't make a grand entrance. You simply step inside, letting the door hiss shut behind you, and grab a bulb of water from the dispenser. The familiar hum of the ship's life support system fills the comfortable silence. You lean against the opposite counter, taking a long drink before speaking.
"It's done," you say quietly.
Both of them look up, their attention immediately on you. Lin’s fingers pause over his datapad. Vela’s hands stop their meticulous work.
"I spoke with Master Lestin," you continue, meeting their gazes. "The Enclave is his to protect now. He and the Dantana locals will be its keepers. It's not our burden to carry."
Lin visibly sags with relief, a tired smile touching his lips. "Good," he mutters, more to himself than to you. "Her power conduits are ancient. I'd rather not be the one to get a call when a millennium-old fuse finally blows."
Vela remains silent, her expression unreadable, but her eyes are locked on you. The Enclave meant little to her; your decision is what matters. She is waiting for the next directive, the true mission.
You push off the counter and take a seat at the table across from Lin. "Which brings us to what's next." You look between them, the two pillars of your life. "The immediate threat is gone. Rictus is dead, the Master is gone. But their ghosts aren't. There are records. Sith Imperial databases, Sith archives, maybe even some dusty Republic intelligence file. As long as 'Cipher Null' or 'The Anomaly' exists in any system, we're not free. We're just a loose end waiting to be tied up."
You lean forward, your voice dropping with intensity. "So that's our new mission. We disappear. Completely." You turn to your slicer. "Lin, I need you to make us ghosts. Erase every trace that we ever existed. I want to take the next year—more, if we have to—and dedicate it to scrubbing ourselves from the galaxy."
A spark ignites in Lin's tired eyes. This is not just a task; it's the ultimate challenge for a man of his talents. "A total wipe," he breathes, the idea taking root. "From Sith Intelligence black-files, Republic sector patrols, even Hutt traffic logs... that's... ambitious. It's peeling an onion layer by layer while it's still in the ground. But..." A slow, confident grin spreads across his face. "It's not impossible. I can do it."
You nod, then turn your gaze to Vela. "Once we're clear, we find a place. Some forgotten moon in the Outer Rim. And we rest. We build a home." You say the next words directly to her. "Vela, you deserve a life that isn't defined by the next fight. A purpose that comes from peace, not war." Then you look at Lin. "And you, Lin, have earned a thousand assistants. Once we're settled, our first priority is getting you a state-of-the-art utility droid. No more twenty-hour shifts keeping this ship alive by yourself."
Vela finally speaks, her voice a low murmur. "Peace?" The word sounds foreign on her tongue, an abstract concept she's only heard of. "Our enemies will not rest. The Sith Empire is still out there."
"Let them fight their war," you counter gently. "This isn't about them anymore. This is about us. Protecting our 'pack,' as you called it. This is how we win. Not by fighting their battles, but by refusing to be pieces in their game."
She considers this, her dark eyes searching yours. She sees no deception, only conviction. The rigid training of the Sith taught her that value is earned in combat, that purpose is found in a greater, violent cause. You are offering her a different truth: that her value is inherent, and that her purpose can be to protect the quiet moments, not just the chaotic ones. Slowly, deliberately, she nods.
"I understand," she says. "If the path to securing our position is through the shadows, then that is the path I will walk." She begins reassembling her lightsaber, her movements just as precise, but with a new sense of finality. Her loyalty is absolute, no matter the mission.
Lin, already lost in thought, begins tapping furiously at his datapad, his mind racing with the possibilities and the monumental task ahead. "I'll need to build a new set of quantum scramblers," he muses aloud, "and piggyback off the Hutt networks to mask our data trail... oh, this is going to be fun."
The next two years pass in a blur of focused purpose, a quiet, nomadic existence lived on the fringes of the galaxy. It is a time of immense work, profound change, and earned silence.
Year One: The Ghost Protocol
Your departure from Dantana is without ceremony. A final, respectful nod to Master Zhar from the Nightfall's cockpit, and then you are gone, a flicker of light ascending into the clouds before jumping into the vast, anonymous tapestry of hyperspace.
The first year is Lin’s masterpiece. He dubs his grand project "The Ghost Protocol," and it becomes his singular obsession. This is no simple act of deletion; it is a meticulous, terrifyingly complex art form. He guides the Nightfall through forgotten hyperspace routes and the chaotic gravity wells of uncharted nebulae, using the natural interference to mask your ship's energy signature. From these hidden corners of the galaxy, he wages his silent war.
He becomes a digital phantom, a whisper in the machine. He doesn't hack systems; he persuades them. He untangles the digital knots of your past, one thread at a time.
The records of "Cipher Null" within Sith Intelligence are not deleted but corrupted, rewritten into a failed project, a dead end with its assets listed as "expended."


Republic sensor logs of your ship near Dantana are subtly altered, your IFF signature blurred and re-tagged as a common freighter that suffered a sensor ghost malfunction.


Your presences on Nar Shaddaa and The Vex are buried under mountains of fabricated data, your brief, violent appearances attributed to a dozen other short-lived syndicates and bounty hunters who met grisly ends.


This period is not without its tension. On three separate occasions, Sith Imperial long-range patrols deviate from their standard routes, forcing you to power down the Nightfall completely and drift silently in the shadow of a gas giant or deep within an asteroid field, holding your breath as the enemy passes meters from your hull.
During this time, your roles solidify. You, Kaelen, are the anchor. You manage the ship's resources, plot the endless series of jumps Lin requires, and maintain the crew's morale through the sheer force of your calm. You spend hours in meditation, not seeking power, but mastering the peace within your Sanctuary, learning to feel the subtle rhythms of your small family.
Vela is the guardian. She transforms the Nightfall into a fortress. She spends her days in the cargo hold, her body a blur of motion as she relentlessly perfects her new dual-blade fighting style, her practice lightsaber and a training remote standing in for the Sanctuary Blade. She is your unwavering shield, her focus absolute. Yet, you notice a change. She begins to join you and Lin for meals without being prompted, her presence less that of a soldier at ease and more that of a family member finding her place at the table.
Year Two: A Place to Land
As the second year begins, Lin's work shifts from active infiltration to deep, passive monitoring. The most dangerous part is over. Now, you hunt for a home. You cross the Outer Rim, cataloging dozens of uninhabited, uninteresting worlds. You seek a specific kind of anonymity: a place no one would ever fight a war over.
You find it in the forgotten Veridian System. The third planet, which you simply name Veridian, is a world of staggering, untamed life. It is a planet of deep, emerald oceans, continents choked with colossal, bioluminescent jungles, and skies perpetually filled with thick, silver clouds. It has no strategic value, no rare minerals, and no sentient population. It is perfect.
You land the Nightfall in a hidden caldera, a natural fortress ringed by waterfalls and shielded from orbital view by the dense jungle canopy. And then, you begin to build.
Lin, with a newfound, confident energy, oversees the technical setup. He taps the planet's geothermal vents for a clean, inexhaustible power source and establishes a small, self-sufficient homestead. He jury-rigs a network of sensors around the caldera's perimeter, not to detect an invading fleet, but to alert you to the migration patterns of the local fauna.


Vela finds a different kind of purpose. She becomes a pioneer. The same strength she used to cut down Sith Lords is now used to clear land, fell massive trees, and help construct your small, prefabricated habitat. She learns the planet's rhythms, the dangers of its predators, and the locations of its most breathtaking vistas. For the first time, she is not defending a position; she is building one.


You spend this year creating a life. You learn to live off the land, to cultivate native plants, and to read the planet's strange weather patterns. The Nightfall becomes less of a ship and more of a garage, its powerful systems repurposed to support your new home. The bonds between you, forged in fire and fear, are now tempered in peace and shared labor.
The Day of Confirmation
Two years to the day since you left Dantana, the moment arrives.
The three of you are gathered in the main room of the habitat you built together. It’s a functional, comfortable space. A large viewport looks out onto the thundering waterfall that guards your caldera. Rain is streaking down the transparisteel, and the air is filled with the scent of damp earth and the hum of Lin's computers.
For the past seventy-two hours, Lin has been running his final, deepest diagnostic. A silent, galaxy-spanning search for any echo, any ghost, any stray data-packet that mentions Kaelen, Vela Sorn, Lin, Cipher Null, or the Nightfall.
Vela is cleaning a massive, scaled fish at a prep station, her movements efficient and practiced. You are sitting at the main table, observing the quiet domesticity of it all, a feeling of profound peace settling over you.
Lin has been staring at his primary monitor, his face illuminated by cascading lines of code. The final search algorithm concludes. The screen flashes a single, simple message: STATUS: NOMINAL. NO ECHOES DETECTED.
He leans back in his chair, the motion slow, almost reverent. He runs a hand through his hair, lets out a breath you realize he’s been holding for two years, and slowly turns to face you and Vela. The exhaustion is gone from his face, replaced by a look of pure, unadulterated triumph and relief.
"Well," he says, a wide, genuine smile spreading across his face. "I did it."
He gestures to the screen, his voice thick with emotion.
"We're free."
A heavy silence hangs in the room, thick with the weight of Lin’s words. We’re free. Two years of running, of hiding, of holding their breath, all culminating in this single, impossible statement.
Lin is watching you, a grin of pure, exhausted triumph on his face. Vela has turned from her prep station, the knife still in her hand, her expression one of dawning realization. The tension that has lived in her shoulders for as long as you’ve known her seems to finally, fractionally, recede.
A slow smile spreads across your own face, a feeling of pure, unburdened joy bubbling up from a place you thought had long since gone dormant. You stand up, the motion full of a newfound lightness.
"Hold that thought," you say, your voice brimming with energy. "And somebody put that fish on to cook. A moment like this deserves a proper feast."
You walk over to a nondescript plasteel footlocker tucked under a workbench—a piece of storage you hauled from the Nightfall's cargo bay and have never opened since landing on Veridian. You kneel, keying in a security code. The lock hisses open. Reaching inside, past old tools and a spare blaster pack, your fingers close around the cool, smooth glass of a bottle.
You pull it out and set it on the central table with a heavy, satisfying thud. It’s a bottle of aged Corellian brandy, its label faded and its contents the color of dark amber.
"I... acquired this on Nar Shaddaa," you explain, wiping a layer of dust from the glass. "Promised myself I wouldn't open it until a war was over. I suppose this counts."
Lin lets out a genuine, hearty laugh—a sound you haven't heard in years. "Counts? Kaelen, this is the only war that ever mattered."
You find three clean metal cups. As Vela, moving with a new, less hurried grace, begins to expertly prepare the fish for cooking, you pour three generous measures of the brandy. The rich, sweet aroma fills the small habitat, a scent of civilization and celebration that feels alien and wonderful.
You hand a cup to Lin, who takes it with a beaming smile. You offer the other to Vela. She hesitates for a split second, her eyes meeting yours, before she accepts the cup with a quiet nod, her grip firm around the metal.
You raise your cup. The light from the viewport catches the liquid, making it glow.
"To the ghosts," you propose, your voice resonating with emotion. "And to the man who put them to rest." You nod to Lin. "To us."
"To us," Lin echoes, his voice thick.
Vela simply raises her cup in silent agreement.
You drink. The brandy is smooth and fiery, a warmth that spreads through your chest, chasing away the last lingering chill of fear. It tastes like victory.
The night unfolds with a sense of dreamlike peace. You feast on the perfectly cooked fish, its taste heightened by the rich brandy and the sheer relief of the moment. Lin, unburdened for the first time since you met him, becomes a storyteller. He recounts the near-misses of the Ghost Protocol with a mixture of horror and giddy pride—the time a Sith intelligence probe almost sniffed out his backdoor, the week he spent rerouting your entire digital history through a Hutt spice-trading guild's encrypted network. Stories that were once terrifying are now hilarious, the currency of a shared and conquered past.
Vela, for her part, is a quiet but solid presence in the celebration. She listens to Lin's stories, a rare, small smile touching her lips at his animated telling. She speaks little, but you can feel the change in her. Her guard is not just lowered; it's gone. She is simply Vela, a woman in her home, safe with her family.
Later, as the bottle is nearly empty and the remains of the meal are cleared away, the three of you stand before the large viewport. The rain has softened to a gentle patter, and the bioluminescent jungle outside pulses with a soft, ethereal green and blue light.
A weary, contented laugh escapes you. "You know," you say, swirling the last of the brandy in your cup, "after all that... all that work to erase our names from history..."
Lin and Vela turn to look at you, their expressions curious.
"Kaelen. Vela. Lin." You say your names aloud, and then shake your head with a grin of joking frustration. "Those names were on the lists, too. We're going to need new ones anyway."
Lin groans, but he's smiling. "Don't you dare," he says, pointing a finger at you. "My masterpiece is finished. You can call yourself 'Captain Spectacular' for all I care, but I'm keeping my name."
Even Vela huffs a soft sound of amusement. "It is... an inefficient outcome," she concedes, but there is no heat in her words, only the shared warmth of the moment.
The joke hangs in the air, light and freeing. The question of names isn't a matter of survival anymore. It's just a choice. For the first time, you are all free to choose who you want to be. The night winds down not with a bang, but with a quiet, profound sense of peace. The future is here, and it is yours to write.
The peace is absolute. For the first time, sleep is not a respite between threats, but a state of genuine, earned rest. You are adrift in a warm, silent void, the culmination of two years of relentless, silent work.
Then, a voice cuts through the blackness, sharp and cold as the vacuum of space.
“You should have killed me, abomination.”
It’s not a dream. It’s a whisper, laced with venom, right beside you.
Your eyes snap open. The pre-dawn gloom of the habitat is heavy, oppressive. The clean, earthy scent of Veridian is choked by the acrid tang of pure, focused hatred. Standing in the center of the room, silhouetted against the viewport, is the woman you left for dead two years ago.
Inquisitor Vesper.
She is a wreck, a testament to sheer, spiteful survival. Her gray robes are tattered, her face is gaunt and etched with a new, livid scar that pulls at the corner of her mouth. But her eyes burn with the same fanatical fire, a cold fury that has festered for two years in the dark.
Her attention, and her power, are fixed on Lin.
He is crumpled on the floor beside his console, not ten feet from you. His body is seized by a rigid paralysis, a faint tremor running through his limbs. His eyes are wide with agony, a silent scream trapped behind his teeth. He is not just being held; he is being systematically torn apart on a neurological level, a victim of Vesper's focused, torturous application of the Force.
Across the room, Vela is stirring, pushing herself up from her cot. But she’s groggy, her movements sluggish. Her lightsaber sits on the workbench beside her, a lifetime away.
Vesper’s burning gaze finally shifts to you. A cruel, triumphant smile plays on her scarred lips.
"You sleep in my bed," she rasps, her voice a dry crackle. "You eat from my galley. You fly in my ship." She gestures around the habitat, at the life you built. "And you thought you could hide from me in my own shadow?"
Her smile widens. "That's the Nightfall's dirty little secret, Kaelen. Your master slicer is brilliant. He scrubbed your history from the galaxy. But he was looking for ghosts in the network. He never thought to look for the one I hardwired into the ship's keel before it ever left the foundry. A whisper, a heartbeat, a signal only I could hear. For two years, it has been my single obsession. It led me here."
She takes a slow, deliberate step towards Lin, whose body twitches in agony.
"Two years ago, you had a choice. The monster in the cage, or the one at your back. You chose poorly," she snarls. "That was your fatal attachment. Not to a person, but to a prize. You left me alive. A tactical error."
Her lightsaber, a weapon of brutal simplicity, is in her hand. The blade is not yet ignited. She is savoring this, dismantling your peace piece by piece before she dismantles you.
"This is not revenge. Revenge is a passion. This," she says, her voice dropping to a fanatical whisper, "is a correction. A contagion cannot be allowed to spread."
You are at a complete disadvantage. Your shield is being tortured. Your sword is disarmed. The enemy you created through your own choices now stands victorious in your home.
You have a single, heart-stopping moment to react before she kills Lin and turns her full attention to you.
There is no calculation. No weighing of odds. There is only Lin, broken and twitching on the floor.
In the fraction of a second you have, you don't think. You act.
Your hands come up, not in aggression, but in a gesture of pure protection. You reach out with the Force, past Vesper, past the suffocating hatred in the room, and you pour every ounce of your will into a single, desperate purpose. You summon the Sanctuary.
But you don't form it around yourself. You project it.
It's a wrenching, mentally strenuous act, like trying to throw a shield instead of wearing it. A shimmering, semi-translucent sphere of absolute null-energy blossoms into existence, not around you, but directly around Lin. It envelops his convulsing body in a bubble of perfect, silent peace.
The effect is instantaneous and violent. The invisible tendrils of Vesper's dark side power don't just retract—they are severed, annihilated. It’s like cutting the strings of a marionette.
Lin’s body goes limp, the agonizing seizure ceasing in a heartbeat. He collapses fully to the floor, unconscious but free, his chest rising and falling in shallow, ragged breaths inside the protective sphere.
Vesper lets out a guttural snarl of pure frustration. Her leverage is gone. Her torture is ended. The cruel satisfaction on her face evaporates, replaced by a mask of cold, reptilian fury. She was savoring her power over you, and you have denied her.
"Aflaw," she hisses, her voice raw with hatred. "A sentimental, pointless flaw!"
In one fluid motion, her lightsaber is in her hand and ignited. A blade of raw, angry crimson snaps to life, casting bloody shadows across the room. She has lost her toy, so she will destroy the one who took it from her.
She lunges.
Not at the shielded Lin. Not at the now-stirring Vela. She lunges directly at you. All her focus, all her killing intent, is a spear pointed at your heart. You have left yourself completely exposed.
But in that singular focus, she makes an error. She has dismissed the other variable in the room.
Vela is on her feet. She doesn't waste a precious second trying to reach her lightsaber. Her eyes, burning with cold fury, dart around the room, finding an alternative. Her hand shoots out and snatches the heavy, sharp fillet knife she was using to clean the fish just hours before.
As Vesper's crimson blade carves a burning arc through the air toward your undefended chest, Vela explodes into motion, charging from the side, the simple steel knife held low and ready. She has no Force shield, no lightsaber. She is just a blur of righteous fury, aiming to bury a piece of metal in the Inquisitor's side.
Vesper's attack will reach you a half-second before Vela reaches her.
Instinct overrides strategy. Logic screams to evade, to defend. But the sight of Lin, unconscious and vulnerable, and the cold, arrogant fury on Vesper's face ignites something primal within you. This will not be a duel. This will be a brawl. You will not let her walk away from this unscathed.
As Vesper's crimson blade cuts through the air, you don't retreat. You explode forward.
You lunge directly into her attack, a move so counter-intuitive, so suicidally reckless, that for a split second, a flicker of surprise crosses the Inquisitor’s face. It's the only opening you need.
Time seems to warp. You feel a searing, white-hot agony as her lightsaber, aimed for your heart, instead bites deep into your left shoulder and collarbone. The smell of cauterized flesh and burnt fabric fills your senses, and a wave of nauseating pain threatens to swallow your consciousness. You grit your teeth against it, refusing to fall.
Because in that same instant of searing agony, you achieve your goal.
You are inside her guard. Before she can bring her blade back around, your right hand, clenched into a fist and glowing with the barely-contained energy of the Force, slams into her sternum. It’s not a punch meant to break bone; it’s a concussive blast of pure, kinetic force, delivered at point-blank range.
Simultaneously, Vela arrives. With the feral grace of a predator, she drives the simple steel knife forward. Vesper, reeling from your internal blow, instinctively twists. The knife, aimed for her kidney, instead sinks deep into the fleshy part of her thigh.
A choked, inhuman sound rips from Vesper's throat—a harmony of surprise, pain, and rage. The combined, unexpected assault shatters her composure. Her attack is broken. Her focus is gone. She stumbles backward, one hand clutching her chest where your blow landed, the other reflexively going to the hilt of the knife buried in her leg.
The room is electric with the aftermath of the exchange. You are staggering, your left arm hanging uselessly at your side, a smoking, grievous wound burning on your shoulder. But you are standing.
Vesper is wounded, breathing in ragged gasps, her confident superiority replaced by the feral look of a cornered animal.
Vela stands between you and the Inquisitor, a fierce protector, her eyes blazing, ready to press the attack.
The fight has been joined. And blood has been spilled on both sides.
The pain is a white-hot sun exploding behind your eyes. Your vision blurs, and the roar of blood in your ears nearly drowns out the sounds of the fight. Every nerve in your shoulder screams. In the back of your mind, the teachings of the Jedi, of Master Lestin, tell you to release the pain, to find calm.
But another voice cuts through the agony, a memory of Vela in the cargo hold, her body a blur of motion, her voice tight with focus. “Pain is a signal. It tells you that you are alive. And if you are alive, you can fight. Use it. Let it make you sharp.”
You have never understood what she meant. Until now.
You don't release the pain. You seize it. You feed it into the void within you, into the heart of your Sanctuary. You let the agony be the fuel, the raw material for a new, terrible creation.
A raw, guttural roar tears from your throat, a sound of pure, unadulterated defiance. The calm, shimmering energy of your power violently reshapes itself. Instead of a smooth shield, the null-energy erupts from your body, solidifying into a jagged, crystalline armor of shimmering darkness. It's a twisted mockery of your power, a shell of pure negation covered in razor-sharp spikes of solidified nothingness.
Vesper recoils, her eyes wide with shock at this grotesque and unforeseen evolution of your ability. She has never seen you use your power offensively, let alone wear it like a weapon.
Your vision narrows, focusing on Vela. She has the knife, but it's just steel against a Sith Inquisitor. It's not enough.
With your good hand, you reach across your chest, your fingers closing around one of the spikes jutting from your new, horrific armor. It resists, and for a moment, it feels like you are tearing out a part of your own soul. With another agonized cry, you rip it free.
It is a foot-long sliver of shimmering, silent energy, a shard of pure void that drinks the light around it.
"Vela!" you roar.
You don't throw it to her. You throw it at her knife. The spike soars across the small room and, with a sound like shattering glass, impales itself onto the blade. The simple steel knife is instantly transformed. A shimmering corona of the same dark, nullifying energy now envelops the blade, turning the simple weapon into a tool capable of meeting a lightsaber.
The effort nearly costs you everything. Your consciousness flickers, the armor around you wavers, and the searing pain in your shoulder threatens to drag you into blackness. You drop to one knee, your good hand pressed to the floor to keep from collapsing. Your entire being funnels into a single, desperate task: maintaining the Sanctuary Shield around Lin. He is your priority. He is the reason for this fight.
You lift your head, your gaze locking with Vela's. You can do no more. You are a wounded fortress, a living anchor. The rest is up to her.
Vela doesn't hesitate. She doesn't marvel at the new weapon in her hand. Her eyes, cold and sharp as the newly empowered blade, lock onto the wounded and shocked Inquisitor. She understands her role perfectly. With a predator's grace, she shifts her stance, the corrupted knife held ready. 
The duel begins not with a clash of blades, but with a palpable shift in the room's atmosphere. The space between the two women becomes a vacuum, charged with lethal intent. On one side, Vesper, a practitioner of the dark side, her power rooted in anger and aggression, her lightsaber a tool of domination. On the other, Vela, a warrior whose entire being has been forged in the crucible of Sith training, now unchained, her loyalty given to a new cause.
Vesper, recovering her composure, lunges first. Her attack is a furious, brutal flurry of crimson slashes, a standard Sith power assault designed to overwhelm and intimidate. She expects Vela to break, to give ground.
She does not.
Vela meets the assault head-on. She wields the corrupted knife not like a duelist, but like a brawler. She doesn't parry; she deflects. Each time Vesper’s lightsaber comes crashing down, Vela meets it with a sharp, angled block, the Sanctuary-infused blade hissing and screeching as it turns aside the superheated plasma. The null-energy field around her knife doesn't just block the lightsaber; it seems to deaden it, to drink its energy, forcing Vesper to expend more and more power with each strike just to maintain her weapon's integrity.
Sparks fly—not the clean, white sparks of saber on saber, but ugly, violent bursts of red and black energy. It is a battle of two opposing philosophies: Vesper's pure, unrestrained aggression against Vela's cold, pragmatic defense.
Seeing her initial assault failing, Vesper changes tactics. She creates distance, switching to the fluid, acrobatic maneuvers of Ataru, leaping off the walls and furniture, her blade a dizzying, unpredictable whirlwind. She tries to get around Vela, to strike at you or the shielded Lin.
But Vela is a living wall. She moves with an almost supernatural economy of motion, her feet seeming to glide across the floor. She never overextends, never gives an inch of ground she doesn't intend to. Her eyes track Vesper's every move, her expression a mask of intense concentration. She is not just fighting; she is learning, analyzing Vesper’s patterns, her rage, her desperation. The teachings of Juyo, her former style, are still there—the raw aggression, the unpredictability—but they are now tempered by a cold, protective fury.
The fight is a brutal, chaotic dance. A stray swing from Vesper’s saber slices through the galley table, sending splintered wood and metal flying. Vela ducks under a wild slash and retaliates with a low, sweeping kick that forces Vesper to leap back, her footing momentarily unsure.
Then, Vesper sees her opening. As Vela deflects a high strike, the Inquisitor uses the Force to rip a heavy metal chair from its bolts on the floor and hurl it at Vela's head. It’s a desperate, ugly move, a sign of her growing frustration.
Vela has no time to dodge. She drops her defensive stance, bringing the corrupted knife up in a two-handed grip and cleaves the flying chair in two.
But it was a feint.
The instant Vela's attention is diverted, Vesper is there. She lunges forward, her lightsaber aimed not to kill, but to maim. The crimson blade slips past Vela's guard and slashes across her side, carving a deep, cauterized gash along her ribs.
Vela cries out, a sharp intake of breath, and stumbles back, one hand flying to her wounded side. Her defense is broken. Her perfect focus is shattered by the sudden, searing pain.
Vesper smiles, a cruel, triumphant sneer. "You fight for a flaw," she hisses, advancing slowly, her lightsaber held ready for the final, killing blow. "And so you shall die with him."
Vela is on one knee, the corrupted knife held weakly in her hand, her lifeblood sizzling from the wound in her side. She is at Vesper’s mercy. The Inquisitor raises her blade for the final strike.
Seeing Vela fall, seeing the triumphant, cruel smile on Vesper’s face as she raises her blade, shatters the last of your restraint. There is no plan. There is no strategy. There is only a single, desperate, primal scream in your mind: NO.
You abandon the spiked armor, letting it dissolve into nothingness. You abandon the careful balance of maintaining the shield over Lin. You pull on every last reserve of energy you possess, the agony in your shoulder a roaring furnace, and you unleash it all in one, final, desperate gambit.
You throw your hands forward, and a tidal wave of pure, kinetic Force—raw and untamed—slams into Vesper.
It's not a push. It's a physical impact. The Inquisitor is lifted off her feet and hurled backward with bone-jarring force. She crashes through what remains of the galley table and slams into the far wall of the habitat with a sickening crunch of metal and, you hope, bone. Her lightsaber clatters to the floor, extinguished. She slumps to the ground, stunned and broken.
But you know it won't be for long.
The effort costs you almost everything. Your vision goes black, and you feel yourself falling, your consciousness fraying at the edges. But in that void, in the precipice of unconsciousness, you find it. The Sanctuary. The perfect, silent peace at the core of your being.
And you don't just touch it. You dive into it.
You surrender completely, letting go of your pain, your fear, your very sense of self. You allow your consciousness to merge fully with the power that defines you. It is a feeling of absolute transcendence, of becoming one with the calm, silent, all-encompassing void.
Your body begins to levitate.
You rise slowly from your knees, your wounded arm hanging limp, your feet lifting from the floor until you are floating inches above the ground. A soft, ethereal glow, the color of a starless midnight sky, begins to emanate from your skin. Your eyes snap open, no longer the eyes of a man, but two orbs of pure, silent, null-energy.
You are no longer Kaelen, the man. You are the Sanctuary made manifest.
You are aware, with a strange and distant clarity, of the price. This is a state you cannot maintain. You are burning the very fuel of your connection to the Force, trading years of future potential for a few, fleeting moments of absolute power. When this is over, you will be lesser. Diminished. Perhaps forever.
You look at Vela, struggling to rise, her hand pressed to her bleeding side. You look at Lin, still unconscious but safe within the lingering echo of your shield. You look at the life you built here, this pocket of peace in a galaxy of war.
And you know, with a certainty that transcends thought, that the price is worth it.
You turn your glowing eyes towards the far wall, where Vesper is stirring amidst the wreckage. She pushes herself up, bruised and battered, her face a mask of disbelief and dawning horror. She has seen Sith Lords channel their rage, Jedi Masters become conduits of the light. She has never seen anything like this.
You are a void. A silence. An impossibility. And you are coming for her.
You float towards her, your movement effortless and silent. 
Vesper scrambles backward, her face a mask of primal terror. The thing floating towards her is not the flawed, sentimental boy she had been fighting. It is anathema. It is wrong.
With a desperate scream of rage and fear, she lashes out with the Force. A wave of telekinetic force, strong enough to buckle plasteel, washes over you and dissipates into nothing. She hurls phantom visions of pain and terror at your mind; they dissolve like mist against a stone wall. She calls upon the dark side, attempting to choke the very air from your lungs, but the power unravels before it can even touch you. Your Sanctuary, now a part of your very being, nullifies it all effortlessly.
Her power is useless.
In a final, desperate act, she summons her lightsaber to her hand. The crimson blade ignites with a defiant snarl. She lunges, not with skill or strategy, but with the wild abandon of a cornered animal, aiming to plunge the blade deep into your chest.
The blade strikes your glowing form. And it simply... dissolves. The plasma stream disintegrates into harmless particles of light, fizzling out of existence as it makes contact with your skin. The hilt in her hand becomes cold, dead metal.
You do not slow. Your silent, inexorable advance continues until you are floating directly before her.
She tries to strike you with the inert hilt, a pathetic, futile gesture. You lean down, your movement fluid and serene. With one glowing hand, you catch her wrist, your grip gentle but absolute. You push the hand holding the useless lightsaber aside.
With your other hand, you cradle the back of her head, your fingers pressing lightly against her skull. She freezes, her body trembling, her eyes wide with a terror that has finally eclipsed her hatred. She is utterly helpless, held in the grasp of a living void.
You lean in close, your voice no longer your own, but a deep, resonant hum, the sound of perfect, absolute silence given form.
“Enough.”
And then, you focus your will.
You don't attack her. You don't drain her. You absorb.
You feel her connection to the Force, a chaotic, raging tempest of hatred, ambition, and pain. You reach into that storm, and you begin to draw it into yourself. Her rage, her fear, her power—it all flows into your Sanctuary, not to fuel you, but to be neutralized, to be brought to a state of perfect, irreversible zero.
Vesper gasps, her body going rigid. She feels it. A lifetime of connection to the fundamental energy of the universe, the power she has used to dominate, to wound, and to kill, is being systematically erased. It is not a violent tearing; it is a gentle, inexorable, and complete negation. The storm within her quiets. The fire of the dark side is quenched. The voice of the Force, which has screamed in her mind since she was a child, fades into utter silence.
When it is over, you release her.
She slumps to the floor, not unconscious, but empty. Her eyes are no longer burning with fanatical light. They are just... eyes. The eyes of a normal woman, staring into nothing, lost in a silent universe she can no longer comprehend. She can still feel the memory of the Force, like a phantom limb, but the connection is gone. Forever.
You have not killed her. You have given her a fate far worse than death. You have given her peace.
The power recedes. The ethereal glow fades from your skin, the light in your eyes returns to normal. Your feet touch the ground, and the full, crushing weight of your exhaustion and your wounds slams back into you. You collapse to one knee, the world spinning, the first echoes of the permanent damage to your own Force connection already making themselves known.
But you have won. The fight is over. Vesper is broken. Lin is safe. Vela is alive.
Your home is secure.
The last of the incandescent power leaves you, and the silence that follows is deafening. The world rushes back in a dizzying, painful torrent. The searing fire in your shoulder, the galaxy-spanning exhaustion, the chilling new quiet in your own soul where the Force once hummed brightly—it all crashes down on you at once.
You are on your hands and knees, the floor cold against your skin. Black spots dance in your vision. You see Vela, clutching her wounded side, stumbling toward you, her face a mask of pain and frantic concern. You see Lin, still blessedly still, breathing. You see Vesper, a hollow shell of a woman, rocking back and forth in the corner, staring at her own empty hands.
You know you are fading. The life you built here will die with you if you don't act.
With the last vestiges of your strength, you crawl a few feet to Lin’s console. Your fingers are clumsy, your vision blurring in and out of focus. You can't operate the complex systems. But you don't have to.
You place your trembling hand on the console's main panel. You reach for the Force, and find only a faint, distant echo of your former power. It's like shouting into a void. But it's enough. You focus that tiny spark, not into a command, but into a simple, desperate plea. A memory. A comm frequency you committed to heart two years ago.
You push.
On the console, a single line of code flashes, almost too faint to see: TRANSMITTING... SECURE CHANNEL... LESTIN, Z. A tight-beam burst of data—your precise coordinates on this forgotten world—is hurled into the void, a single cry for help across an uncaring galaxy.
"Kaelen!" Vela is beside you, dropping to her knees despite the agony it must cause her. She tries to ease you onto your back, her hands surprisingly gentle.
You look up at her, your partner, your blade. You try to speak, to tell her it will be alright, but the words won't come. You manage only a single, whispered word.
"Zhar..."
And then, the darkness takes you completely. You fall into an abyss deeper and more final than any sleep you have ever known, your last sensation the feeling of Vela’s hand trying to staunch the bleeding from your shoulder.
The scene fades to black, leaving the three of you broken but alive in your ruined home. A single distress call, a ghost of a signal, travels across the vastness of space, its destination a distant world, its sender now silent. Help has been summoned, but the stars are wide and dark, and Dantana is very, very far away.
Time loses all meaning. There are only fragments, disjointed sensations that drift through the deep blackness of your unconscious state. The smell of antiseptic. The low, rhythmic hum of a medical droid. The feeling of a cool hand on your forehead, a touch that feels both familiar and impossibly distant.
When you finally surface, it is to the quiet, sterile white of an unfamiliar medical bay. The air is still and cool. An IV is attached to your arm, slowly dripping a clear fluid into your veins. You try to sit up, and a dull, throbbing ache blossoms in your left shoulder, a stark reminder of the battle. It's a clean pain now, not the searing agony of the burn, but the deep, internal ache of healing muscle and knitted bone.
The door to the medbay slides open, and Master Zhar Lestin steps inside. He looks older than when you last saw him, the lines on his face deeper, but his eyes hold the same ancient, steady calm. He is not wearing his traditional Jedi robes, but the simple, practical attire of a traveler.
"Welcome back, Kaelen," he says, his voice a low, soothing balm. "You have been asleep for some time."
He pulls a chair to your bedside. "My arrival was... timely. You three were in a poor state. It has taken my medical droid, and all of my knowledge of Jedi healing techniques, to bring you back from the brink."
He proceeds to give you a full report, his tone grave but reassuring, outlining the status of your family.
Vela: She is recovering. The lightsaber wound to her side was severe, causing significant internal damage. She has spent the past several days in a bacta tank and is now resting. She will heal completely, but it will take time and patience. Her spirit, Zhar notes with a hint of admiration, remains unbroken. She has been a silent, watchful guardian outside your door since she was allowed to walk.


Vesper: She is gone. Zhar found her locked in one of the Nightfall's empty cargo holds. He describes her as a "hollow vessel," utterly disconnected from the Force, a state he has only ever read about in the most ancient Jedi texts. He felt it was not his place to pass judgment. He left her on a remote, uninhabited but habitable world with a survival kit and a transport beacon she could activate if she chose. Her fate is now her own.


Lin: His situation was the most complex. Vesper's neural assault nearly destroyed him. The pain was so intense it caused catastrophic, cascading seizures in his nervous system. To save his life, Zhar had to take drastic measures. The only way to stop his muscles from tearing themselves apart was to sever the damaged nerve connections in his left leg and replace the limb entirely with a state-of-the-art cybernetic prosthetic. Furthermore, to regulate the chaotic electrical impulses still firing in his brain, a neural interface has been subtly integrated along his spine and into the base of his skull. The procedure, Zhar admits, was agonizing, but it was the only path to survival. Lin is alive, and in many ways, more than he was before. The cybernetics have stabilized him, and his new direct interface with technology will open possibilities he could only have dreamed of.


Finally, he turns his wise eyes to you. "And then there is you, Kaelen," he says softly. "Physically, you will recover. The burn was deep, but clean. It is your connection to the Force that concerns me."
He can feel it. The profound, resonant silence where your power used to be a vibrant song.
"It is not severed," he clarifies, sensing your unspoken fear. "But it is... deeply wounded. You did not just use your power, you became it. You poured your very essence into that single, selfless act. The Sanctuary is still a part of you, but the wellspring from which it draws is now shallow. It will take a great deal of time, focus, and perhaps, new methods, to learn to draw upon it again without paying such a heavy price."
He explains the new reality of your abilities. You can no longer sustain multiple manifestations of your power. The effortless control is gone. To create a shield for another would be to leave yourself defenseless. To form Sanctuary Blades would be a monumental effort, draining you almost instantly. Each use of your power will now be a conscious, draining choice, a cost weighed in focus and stamina.
Zhar leans forward, his expression serious. "In your previous state, you had no need for a lightsaber. Your power was your shield and your sword. Now... you are vulnerable. The galaxy is no safer than it was two years ago. I believe the time has come for you to forge a weapon. A true Jedi's weapon. Not for aggression, but as a tool, a focus. A symbol of who you choose to be, now that you must learn to be strong in a new way."
The implications of his words settle over you. Your invulnerability is gone. The two greatest needs of your crew—finding a droid to finally give Lin the help he desperately needs, and your own need for a weapon to defend them—are now starkly, unavoidably clear. The quiet life is over. A new path begins.
The sterile quiet of the medbay feels heavy as Zhar’s words settle in. The new reality is a stark one. Your power, once an infinite, effortless wellspring, is now a finite, precious resource. You are a warrior who must learn to fight anew, a protector who is now painfully vulnerable.
You look at the Jedi Master, a living link to a past and a power you must now approach from a different angle.
"Your counsel is wise, Master Zhar," you say, your voice raspy from disuse. "On both fronts, I am... adrift. I've never considered needing a weapon before. And Lin..." You pause, the thought of his ordeal and his new reality a fresh wound. "He deserves the best. After all this, he deserves more than just a helper. He needs a partner."
You meet the Togruta's gaze, your questions direct. "Where do I even begin? To build a lightsaber, you need a crystal. Are there still places to find them? And for Lin, what kind of droid could possibly keep up with him?"
Zhar listens, his expression thoughtful. He considers your questions not as problems, but as the first steps on a new journey.
The Heart of the Blade
"A lightsaber is more than a weapon," Zhar begins, his voice taking on a teacher's cadence. "It is a reflection of the builder. Its heart is the kyber crystal, a living thing that chooses its user by resonating with them in the Force. The traditional Jedi worlds where crystals were once plentiful—Ilum, Jedha—are now either under Sith Imperial control or lost to time. To seek a crystal there would be to invite disaster."
He leans forward, a new intensity in his eyes. "But the galaxy is vast, and the Force moves in mysterious ways. There are other paths. Older paths."
He presents you with two distinct options:
The Path of Heritage on Dantana: "On Dantana, within the very Enclave you saved, there are secrets I have not yet plumbed. Ancient Jedi Masters sometimes bestowed 'dead' crystals upon their students—stones whose light had faded. It was the Padawan's task to reawaken the crystal with their own strength in the Force. Given the... unique nature of your power, attempting to awaken a crystal with your Sanctuary might yield a result unlike any seen before. It would be a journey of introspection and immense focus."


The Path of Discovery in the Fringes: "Alternatively," he says, a hint of adventure in his tone, "there are legends. Whispers of kyber deposits in uncharted systems, on worlds untouched by either the Republic or the Sith Empire. These 'wild' crystals are untamed, powerful, and often dangerous. Seeking one out would be a perilous quest, taking you to the forgotten corners of the galaxy. It would be a test of your will and your crew's ability to navigate the unknown."


A Droid for the Ghost in the Machine
Zhar then turns to the matter of Lin's new assistant.
"Your friend is no mere technician," he states with deep respect. "He is an artist whose medium is technology. A simple utility droid would be an insult to his talent. He does not need a servant; he needs a collaborator."
He suggests a specific, and very rare, model:
The T7-Series Astromech Droid: "During the Republic's golden age, the T7 astromech was considered the pinnacle of droid engineering. They are incredibly rare now, most having been decommissioned or destroyed. Unlike modern droids, the T7 was designed with an adaptive, learning heuristic personality matrix. They are known for their fierce loyalty, surprising ingenuity, and a level of operational autonomy that borders on true sentience. A T7 would not just follow Lin's orders; it would anticipate his needs, challenge his assumptions, and become a true extension of his own genius. It would be the perfect partner to manage the Nightfall and assist in the complex data warfare you may yet face."


He stands, his counsel given. "The choice, as always, is yours, Kaelen. Both paths, for the crystal and the droid, are fraught with their own challenges. One path leads inward, to history and introspection. The other leads outward, to danger and discovery. Consider what you and your crew need most right now: a quest to test your new limits, or a quiet journey to rediscover your strength."
You process Zhar's counsel, the two paths branching before you. The thought of an inward journey to find a crystal feels premature. You are wounded, your power a faint echo. To face your inner self now would be to face a void. Your crew, your family, comes first.
"A T7," you say, the decision solidifying as you speak it. "That's what Lin needs. A partner, just as you said." You look up at the Jedi Master, your conviction clear despite the weakness in your body. "The crystal can wait. I'm no use to anyone until our crew is whole and our ship has the support it needs. Before we do anything else, we get the droid. We need all the help we can get."
Zhar Lestin nods, a look of profound approval in his eyes. "A leader's choice. Prioritizing the strength of your unit before your own. Very well. While you recover, I will access the old Jedi archives. Finding a functional T7 unit will be like finding a specific grain of sand in a desert. They were often prizes, gifts, or decommissioned to private collectors. The search will not be easy."
With that, he leaves you to rest.
The next few days are a blur of healing and quiet contemplation. You spend most of your time in the medbay, the hum of the machines a constant reminder of your new reality. The pain in your shoulder slowly subsides, replaced by the stiff, awkward feeling of regenerating muscle. You practice touching the Force, and each time it feels like reaching into a deep, cold well with a frayed rope. The connection is there, but fragile. It will not be a tool you can rely on for some time.
Once you are strong enough to walk the halls of the Nightfall, you seek out your crew.
Your Conversation with Vela
You find her in the ship's small training area. She stands facing the viewport, looking out at the lush, green landscape of Veridian. Her side is still bandaged, and she moves with a slight stiffness, but the fierce strength in her posture is undeniable.
She turns as you enter, her dark eyes assessing your condition. There's a new emotion there, something beyond loyalty. It's a shared vulnerability, a silent acknowledgment of the battle that almost broke you all.
"The Jedi Master says you will heal," she says, her voice low. It's a statement, not a question.
"And you," you counter gently. "He said the same of you."
An uncomfortable silence hangs between you, the silence of two warriors who almost watched each other die.
"What you did," she says, finally breaking the quiet, "merging with your power... it was..." She searches for the word, a concept outside her Sith lexicon. "...selfless. The old Inquisitors taught that power was a tool for the self. To be hoarded. You used yours to protect."
"I used it to protect my family," you correct her. "You, me, Lin. That's all that matters."
You tell her of your decision to pursue the T7 droid for Lin first, before seeking a crystal for yourself. You explain your weakened state, your need to rely on other skills for now.
She listens, her expression unreadable. When you finish, she gives a single, sharp nod. "This is the correct tactical decision," she says, her voice regaining its familiar pragmatism. "Lin's operational effectiveness is paramount to our security. Your new limitations mean we must be smarter, more prepared. I will be your shield. This does not change."
She turns back to the viewport, her resolve absolute. Her trust in your leadership is unshaken. In fact, it seems to have deepened.
Your Conversation with Lin
You find Lin on the bridge, and the sight stops you in your tracks. He is sitting in his command chair, but he's not just at the console—he's part of it. A thin, fiber-optic cable runs from a port at the base of his skull directly into the ship's mainframe. His eyes are closed, but the data on the screen before him is scrolling at an impossible speed.
His new leg, a sleek piece of matte-black cybernetics, is propped up, intricate wiring visible where it meets his hip. He looks different. Thinner, perhaps, but wired with a new, electric intensity.
As you approach, his eyes snap open, and the data-stream on the screen halts. He disconnects the cable with a faint hiss.
"Kaelen," he says, a tired but genuine smile on his face. "Good to see you on your feet."
"I could say the same to you," you reply, your gaze drifting to his new leg.
He follows your gaze, a complex mix of emotions on his face—trauma, pain, and a flicker of something new. "It's... an adjustment," he admits. "Vesper's parting gift. But Zhar... he didn't just rebuild me. He upgraded me." He taps the port at the base of his skull. "I don't just hack the Nightfall anymore. I can feel her. Every power conduit, every sensor relay. It's... a lot. And it's exhausting."
This is your opening. You tell him about Master Zhar's counsel, about the legendary T7-series astromech. You describe it not as a tool or an assistant, but as a potential partner, a co-pilot for his mind that could help him manage the immense new data flow and take the strain of ship maintenance off his shoulders.
As you speak, a light returns to Lin's eyes, a spark of his old, brilliant enthusiasm. The exhaustion seems to lift, replaced by a look of pure, wondrous possibility.
"A T7..." he breathes, the name spoken with reverence. "I thought they were all myths. The processing power, the adaptive heuristics... Kaelen, a droid like that wouldn't just be helpful. It would be revolutionary. With a partner like that..." He trails off, his mind already racing, calculating the endless potential.
You have given him more than a goal. You have given him hope.
A day later, the three of you gather on the bridge. You, Vela, and Lin. A battered, scarred, but unbroken unit. Master Zhar joins you, a datapad in his hand.
"My search was fruitful," the Jedi Master announces. "I have located a promising lead. A recently unearthed bill of sale from a pre-war collector on Nar Shaddaa lists a T7 unit as part of a larger collection. That collection was sold to a wealthy magistrate on the planet Corulag just before the war began. It is likely the droid is still there, tucked away in a private hangar, forgotten."
He pulls up a map of the Core Worlds. "Corulag is deep in Republic space," he warns. "Security will be tight. This will require a delicate touch. A subtle approach."
The objective is clear. The target is identified. The path forward is set. You look at your crew, at their determined faces. It's time to make a plan.
Your words cut through the quiet professionalism of the bridge, igniting a spark of purpose in your crew. The recovery is over. The mission has begun.
"Let's get to work," you command, your voice steady and clear.
You turn first to your slicer. "Lin, get us ready to go as soon as possible. I want your personal assessment while we're on the way. Give us approach vectors and escape options for our inevitable exit parade and tell me how you would play this."
Lin's response is immediate. A fire replaces the weariness in his eyes as he plugs his neural interface cable into the console. The ship's systems light up around him, data streaming across his monitor. "Already on it," he confirms, a confident smirk on his face. "Corulag is Core World smug, not fortress-grade. Their security will be protocol-heavy and predictable. I'll have a full workup before we drop out of hyperspace."
Next, you face your shield, your blade. "Vela, make sure we're geared up and have whatever resources we need to purchase, steal, or extract this droid. I'll also need you to refresh my memory on how to fight without my power." You meet her gaze, the admission of your new vulnerability a sign of ultimate trust. "I can save us once as a last resort. I'd prefer to stay in play."
Vela gives a single, sharp nod, her focus absolute. "Understood," she says, her voice low and intense. "I will audit our supplies and armory. As for your training," she adds, a flicker of the harsh instructor she once was showing through, "it begins now. You will learn to rely on your body, your wits, and a blade. The cargo hold will be our classroom."
Finally, you turn to the Jedi Master, your guide and savior. "Thank you, Master Zhar," you say, the words filled with a deep, genuine gratitude. "You are a good friend."
Zhar Lestin places a hand over his heart in a gesture of mutual respect. "The honor is mine, Kaelen. I will remain here, on Veridian. This world will be your safe harbor should you need it. May the Force be with you."
With its new orders, the crew of the Nightfall moves with a quiet, synchronized efficiency. Lin's hands fly across his console, coaxing the ship's engines back to life. The familiar, powerful hum of the hyperdrive charging fills the bridge, a sound of promise and forward momentum. Vela turns and strides from the bridge, her mind already cataloging weapons, armor, and the new training regimen she will put you through.
You take your place in the command chair, watching the lush, green canopy of Veridian disappear from the viewport as the Nightfall ascends into the cloudy sky. Your shoulder aches, a constant reminder of your new limits. But for the first time since the battle, you feel a sense of purpose, not of loss. 
The hum of the hyperspace lanes becomes the backdrop to your new life. The infinite, swirling vortex of blue and white outside the viewport is a constant reminder of the journey ahead, but your immediate reality has shrunk to the cold, metallic confines of the Nightfall's cargo hold.
Training with Vela: The Lesson of Steel
Vela is a relentless instructor. She starts not with a weapon, but with your own body. She forces you through grueling physical conditioning routines, designed to rebuild the strength lost in the medbay and push you past your perceived limits. There is no trace of the quiet, wounded woman from the habitat. Here, in her element, she is the incarnation of Sith discipline.
"Your power made you complacent," she states coolly on the first day, circling you as you gasp for breath. "You relied on a shield of energy. Now, your body must be your shield."
She teaches you basic hand-to-hand combat, her movements economical and brutal. She shows you how to block, how to parry, how to use an opponent's momentum against them. Every time you instinctively try to reach for the Force to augment a move, she seems to sense it, rapping you sharply on the arm or leg.
"No," she commands. "Do not use a crutch you no longer possess. Rely on your muscles. Rely on your bones."
After several days, once she is satisfied with your physical progress, she introduces a blade. It's not a lightsaber, but a weighted training vibrosword. It feels heavy and clumsy in your hand.
Your first spars are a humbling disaster. You are awkward, slow, your instincts all wrong. She disarms you, trips you, and puts her practice blade to your throat a dozen times in the first hour. She is ruthless, exploiting every opening, punishing every mistake.
"You fight like a sorcerer," she critiques, standing over you after a particularly swift defeat. "You think in terms of power and effect. You must learn to think like a duelist. Feints. Parries. Footwork. The space between you and your opponent is a weapon. Control it."
Slowly, painfully, you begin to learn. The agony in your shoulder becomes a teacher, forcing you to adopt a one-handed style, to rely on speed and agility rather than strength. You learn to watch her eyes, her feet, the subtle shift of her shoulders. You start to anticipate, to react not with a wave of power, but with a simple, desperate block.
During a break, as you're both catching your breath, she offers a rare piece of insight. "When I fought the Inquisitor," she says, her voice quiet, "I did not win because I was stronger. I won because I knew my purpose. I was protecting you and Lin. Vesper was fighting for an idea. I was fighting for my pack." She looks at you, her gaze intense. "Find your anchor. Let it guide your blade."
It's the most crucial lesson she teaches you. You stop trying to be a Jedi or a Sith. You stop trying to replicate the power you lost. You just fight. You fight to protect the two people who are your entire world. Your movements become sharper, your defense more solid. You are still no match for her, but you are no longer helpless. You are learning to be a warrior all over again, from the ground up.
Lin's Assessment: The Digital Battlefield
After a particularly grueling session with Vela, you limp to the bridge, your body aching. Lin is jacked into the console, his new leg resting on a low stool, his eyes scanning a complex holographic map of Corulag.
"Just in time," he says without turning. "Welcome to the snake pit."
He gestures to the hologram. It shows a sprawling, pristine metropolis. "Corulag is a core world aristocrat's paradise. Clean, orderly, and wrapped up tight in Republic security. We can't just fly in guns blazing. Any unsanctioned approach will have us swarmed by Republic judicial fighters before we even hit the atmosphere."
He manipulates the map, zooming in on a massive, opulent spire. "This is the estate of Magistrate Valerius. Our target. According to the records Zhar pulled, the collection containing the T7 unit was moved to his private hangar here."
Lin outlines his multi-pronged assessment:
Approach Vectors: "We have one viable option for insertion: stealth. We'll need to piggyback on the energy signature of a licensed cargo hauler making a designated landing. I can slice their transponder and create a 'ghost' signal that will mask us on their approach. It's risky. If their captain runs an unscheduled diagnostic, we're caught."


The Heist: "The hangar is a separate, high-security structure. Biometric scanners, pressure plates, sonic fences—the works. But," a confident grin spreads across his face, "it's all centrally controlled by the estate's main security hub. If I can physically access a terminal inside the main residence, I can bypass the hangar's defenses completely. It's an all-or-nothing play. We'll need a distraction to get me inside."


Escape Options: "This is the ugly part. Once we have the droid, stealth is out the window. It'll be a hot extraction. I've mapped three potential escape routes through the city's transport levels, but all of them converge on a single vector to break atmosphere. We'll have a welcoming party. The Nightfall will need to be ready for a fight."


He leans back, disconnecting from the console. "So, that's my play. Vela creates a distraction at the main gate—a power surge, a small explosion, something to draw the guards away from the residence. While they're occupied, you and I slip in through a service entrance. I find a terminal, you watch my back. I get control, we grab the droid, and we run like hell."
He looks at you, his expression serious. "It's a clean plan, but the margins are razor-thin. If any one part fails, the whole thing comes down on our heads."
You absorb the plan, the intricate dance of risk and precision it requires. The old Kaelen, the one who could walk through walls of blaster fire, is gone. In his place is a leader who must rely on the strength of his team.
"Then we do what we do best," you say, a newfound calm settling over you. "Hold it together."
You nod at Lin, acknowledging his meticulous work. "Solid plan, Lin."
Then, you turn your attention to Vela. She stands with her arms crossed, her expression neutral as she listens. You see not just the duelist, but the former Sith acolyte, a woman trained in the subtle and brutal arts of the Force.
"Vela," you say, your tone shifting, "I may be weakened, but you are more than just a sword or shield. Your connection to the Force is formidable."
You lean forward, locking her gaze. "If on our approach the captain of that freighter gets any weird ideas about unscheduled diagnostics, I need you to convince him otherwise." The implication is clear. A subtle touch of the mind, a nudge of persuasion to make him dismiss the sensor ghost as a minor glitch. "Your connection is stronger than mine right now. I'm trusting you with our insertion."
Vela's eyes narrow slightly, a flicker of understanding, and perhaps, pride. You are not just giving her an order; you are acknowledging a strength in her that goes beyond her blade.
"The distraction will be my payment for your gentleness with his mind," you continue, a wry smile touching your lips. "Make it big, make it loud. I want every security guard on that estate running toward the front gate, wondering if a meteor just struck it. Then rendezvous with us at the designated location."
Vela's faint smile in return is sharp as a razor's edge. "A big, loud distraction," she confirms, the words tasting of promise. "I can provide that."
The plan is set. The roles are assigned. The crew of the Nightfall, reforged in fire and pain, is ready for its first test. Lin turns back to his console, plotting the final intercept course. Vela heads back to the armory, her mind already calculating the precise explosive yield needed for a "big, loud" event. You take a deep breath, the familiar ache in your shoulder a steadying reminder of the stakes. The quiet life is over. The heist is on.
The Nightfall drops out of hyperspace into the brilliant glare of Corulag's star. The planet below is a pristine jewel of civilization, its orbital traffic lanes buzzing with orderly, sanitized commerce. There is no grit here, no shadow of the Outer Rim's chaos. It is the heart of the Republic's power, and you are a virus preparing to infect the system.
"Closing on the target freighter, the Stellar Wind," Lin announces, his voice tight with focus. He's jacked in, his eyes closed, seeing the world as pure data. "Signature lock established. Engaging ghost protocol... now."
You feel a subtle tremor as the Nightfall adjusts its course, tucking itself into the blind spot of the massive cargo hauler like a remora on a shark. On the main screen, your ship's icon vanishes, subsumed by the freighter's energy signature. You are invisible.
"Easy does it, Lin," you murmur, your hands gripping the arms of your command chair.
"Just hold on," he breathes. "The tricky part is coming..."
As if on cue, a new voice crackles over the comm, patched through by Lin from the Stellar Wind's bridge. "Control, this is Stellar Wind. We're showing a minor power fluctuation in our aft shields. Probably just a sensor ghost, but running a level-three diagnostic to be safe."
Your blood runs cold. A level-three diagnostic would find you.
Before you can even speak, Vela, standing silently behind the pilot's chair, closes her eyes. She raises a hand slightly, her fingers twitching. She isn't reaching for a weapon or preparing for a fight. She is casting a delicate, invisible line into the mind of a man light-years away.
On the comm, the captain's voice returns, a little fuzzy, a little confused. "Uh, belay that, Control. False alarm. Reading's gone. Just... space dust. Stellar Wind out."
Vela opens her eyes and gives you a slow, deliberate nod. The line is cut. The danger has passed. Lin lets out a breath he didn't realize he was holding, and a wave of relief washes over the bridge.
The rest of the descent is flawless. Lin detaches from the freighter's signature as it enters its final landing vector, guiding the Nightfall to a silent touchdown in a manicured arboretum on the edge of the magistrate's sprawling estate. The landing ramp lowers with a soft hiss onto perfectly trimmed grass.
The three of you stand at the edge of the ramp, the warm, humid air of Corulag thick with the scent of alien flowers. The estate looms before you, a monument to wealth and power.
"Comms check," you say into your headpiece.
"Loud and clear," Lin responds, checking the charge on a handheld slicing tool.
"Ready," Vela says. She is holding a small, metallic disc, no bigger than her palm. A precisely calibrated explosive charge.
"Alright," you say, looking between them. "You know the plan. Good luck."
Vela melts into the shadows of the ornate trees, heading towards the estate's main gate. You and Lin, cloaked in the twilight gloom, begin your own approach toward a service entrance on the far side of the main residence. You move slowly, your body aching, every step a conscious effort.
You are halfway to your objective when the night erupts.
It's not just an explosion. It's a statement. A brilliant white flash illuminates the entire estate, followed a split second later by a deafening BOOM that shakes the very ground. The main gate, a structure of reinforced steel and soaring artistry, is instantly transformed into a twisted, molten ruin. Car alarms begin to shriek across the compound, and in the distance, you hear the frantic shouts of guards.
"That's 'big and loud'," Lin mutters, a look of awe on his face.
"That's Vela," you reply. The distraction is perfect. Every security guard on the property is now sprinting in the opposite direction.
You reach the service entrance, a simple, unassuming door. Lin immediately kneels, pressing his slicer to the electronic lock. The light on his tool blinks from red to green in under five seconds.
"I'm in," he whispers.
He pushes the door open, revealing a dark, quiet corridor. The muffled sound of alarms is a distant, rhythmic pulse. 
You slip through the door after Lin, the sudden cool of the residence a stark contrast to the humid night air. The corridor is sterile and utilitarian, lined with maintenance panels and silent service droids in their charging alcoves. The distant, rhythmic shriek of the alarms is the only sound, a constant reminder of the clock ticking on Vela's distraction.
You move in a practiced crouch, your hand resting on the hilt of the training sword at your belt—a poor substitute for a real weapon, but a comforting weight nonetheless. Lin moves ahead of you, his steps silent despite his cybernetic leg. He holds a datapad, its screen displaying a scrolling blueprint of the estate he'd acquired. He is no longer just a slicer; he is a navigator in a hostile, digital sea.
The initial adrenaline of the infiltration begins to fade, replaced by a tense, focused quiet. It’s in this silence, broken only by the hum of the building's life support, that you decide to speak, your voice a low whisper.
"How's the leg holding up?" you ask. It’s a simple question, but it’s the first time you’ve been alone with him since his... upgrade.
Lin pauses for a fraction of a second, his eyes still glued to the datapad. "Better than the old one would be right now," he murmurs, his tone a mix of gallows humor and genuine assessment. "It's... responsive. The feedback is still a little... tingly. But it's solid." He glances back at you, a flicker of vulnerability in his eyes. "It's the other part that's weird." He taps the base of his skull. "Feeling the building's network... it's like a low-grade headache I can read."
"Can you read anything useful?" you press, your gaze sweeping the corridor ahead.
"Oh yeah," he says, a hint of his usual confident spark returning. "Security is in chaos. They're pulling all internal guards to the perimeter breach. The central hub is five rooms ahead, just off the main atrium. Minimal staff. But they're getting ready to trigger a full lockdown protocol. We've got maybe three minutes before every door on this level seals."
You round a corner into a wider, more opulent hallway decorated with expensive-looking tapestries. The distant sound of the alarm seems louder here.
"Two years we spent becoming ghosts," you reflect quietly, more to yourself than to him. "And here we are, kicking down the front door of a Republic magistrate. Seems counter-intuitive."
Lin allows himself a small, wry smile. "We were ghosts so we could choose our own battles," he counters, his logic as sharp as ever. "We're not running anymore, Kaelen. We're hunting. Besides," he adds, his eyes gleaming as he looks at the datapad, "this is more fun. This... this is art."
He stops abruptly, holding up a hand. He points to the blueprint on his screen, then to a section of the wall ahead. "Pressure plate. Standard issue. Connects directly to the lockdown trigger." He looks at the ceiling. "And a camera. Also standard. Easy to loop, but not if the plate gets triggered."
He looks back at you, a question in his eyes. He can handle the camera, but the pressure plate covers the entire width of the hall.
"Give me a minute on the camera," he whispers, already starting to tap at his datapad to interface with the local security net. "Any bright ideas on the floor?"
The path forward is blocked. The lockdown is imminent. Your new, limited abilities might not be enough. It's the first real test of your new self.
"Camera loop is cycling," Lin whispers, his focus absolute. "You've got a ten-second clean window, starting now. Whatever you're going to do, do it."
You kneel, tuning out the frantic rhythm of the alarms and Lin’s tapping. You close your eyes, shutting down your primary sense to enhance the others. The teachings of both Zhar and Vela merge in your mind. You can't summon a wave of power, but you can listen. You can feel.
You stretch out with your senses, with the faint, fragile thread of your Force connection. It's no longer a roar; it’s a whisper, an echo. You push past the thrum of the building's power conduits and the frantic energy of the guards outside. You focus on the space immediately ahead, sifting through the noise for a signal.
Slowly, the hallway resolves itself in your mind's eye not as a physical space, but as a web of interconnected systems and subtle flaws. Through your unique perception, three distinct possibilities emerge from the chaos, each with its own risk.
"Camera is looped. Clock's ticking, Kaelen," Lin whispers, his voice tight with tension.
You open your eyes, your decision made in an instant. There's no time for doubt. You trust the echo.
"Trust me," you say to Lin, your voice low but firm.
You don't give him time to question it. You rise from your crouch, your body coiling like a spring. You fix your gaze on the spot you identified in your mind's eye—an innocuous floor tile about ten feet away, indistinguishable from the rest. To anyone else, it would be a leap into disaster. To you, it's the only path.
You take a deep, calming breath, pushing away the ache in your shoulder and the phantom pains of Vela's training. You jump.
For a terrifying second, you are airborne over the live pressure plate. The alarms seem to scream louder. Time slows to a crawl. Then your boot comes down, hitting the floor with a soft, solid thud.
Nothing happens.
You landed perfectly on the safe tile. You can feel the cold of the service conduit beneath your feet, a stark contrast to the low-level energy humming from the rest of the floor. You don't hesitate. You immediately crouch and leap again, clearing the rest of the pressure plate and landing silently on the other side.
You turn back to see Lin staring, his mouth slightly agape, a look of pure, dumbfounded amazement on his face.
"Okay," he breathes, shaking his head as if to clear it. "Remind me to never play cards with you."
He quickly follows, using the same two-leap maneuver, his cybernetic leg planting with a quiet, solid click on the safe tile before he springs across to join you.
"Atrium is just through this door," he says, his focus snapping back to the mission. "Security hub is on the far side. Let's move."
You nod, pushing open the next door and stepping into the next phase of the heist. The quiet, tense atmosphere of the corridor gives way to the vast, open space of the magistrate's grand atrium.
The door slides open into breathtaking opulence. You emerge from the cramped service corridor into a cavernous, three-story atrium. A massive, floor-to-ceiling window reveals a stunning panorama of Corulag’s glittering skyline. Waterfalls cascade down polished marble walls into serene rock pools, and holographic sculptures of alien wildlife drift lazily through the air. The shrill alarm from outside is a distant, muffled annoyance here, lost in the grandeur.
"Show off," Lin mutters, his eyes wide as he takes in the ostentatious display of wealth.
Across the vast, polished floor, you see your objective: a single, reinforced door with a glowing red security panel. The central hub. Between you and the door stand two figures—the minimal staff Lin mentioned. They are not the brutish security guards you'd expect, but two slender, corporate-looking security technicians in crisp, gray uniforms. They stand with their backs to you, their attention fixed on a large holographic display showing the chaos at the main gate.
"They're trying to override Vela's lockdown interference," Lin whispers, interpreting the data streams on his datapad. "They're distracted, but they'll see us the second we step out from behind this pillar."
You are exposed. The technicians are alert, and the security door is your only way forward. Any overt move will bring the full force of the estate's remaining security down upon you.
Lin follows your gaze to the two technicians, then back to you. He sees the glint in your eye, the slight, mischievous grin playing on your lips, and he knows exactly what you're thinking. A slow smile spreads across his own face. It’s a look of shared history, of pulling off impossible scams in cantinas on the other side of the galaxy.
"Injured civilian?" he whispers back, his voice alight with the thrill of the con. "Kaelen, I thought you'd never ask."
He doesn't need any further instruction. He knows the play.
You take a deep, steadying breath, letting your posture slump. You clutch your wounded shoulder, allowing a genuine wave of its dull, throbbing pain to surface, twisting your features into a convincing grimace. You force a look of wide-eyed panic and confusion onto your face.
"Alright," you mutter to Lin. "On my go. Sell it."
You stumble out from behind the cover of the massive pillar, lurching into the open space of the atrium. You let out a pained groan, loud enough to be heard over the hum of the waterfalls.
"Help..." you gasp, taking a few unsteady steps toward the security hub. "Help me... the explosion..."
It works perfectly. Both technicians spin around, their professional focus instantly shattered by the unexpected sight of a wounded man stumbling toward them. Their faces register shock, then concern.
"Sir! Stay right there!" the taller one calls out, his hand instinctively going to the comm unit on his belt, not his sidearm.
"What in the blazes? How did he get in here?" the other one mutters, already taking a step forward, his training to render aid overriding his security protocols.
This is the moment. As the second technician moves toward you, his guard completely down, Lin slides out from behind the pillar. He moves with a predator's silence, a dark shape against the glittering backdrop of the atrium.
The technician who stepped forward is focused entirely on you, his mind processing the unexpected casualty. He doesn't see Lin until it's too late. Lin's hand, holding a heavy metal multi-tool, flashes out in a single, precise arc, striking the technician cleanly at the base of his skull. The man crumples to the floor without a sound, unconscious.
The remaining technician, the taller one, just has time to register his partner falling. His eyes widen in alarm, his mouth opening to shout a warning.
But you are already there. You close the final few feet in a desperate lunge, your good hand reaching out and clamping over his mouth, stifling his alarm. With your other arm, despite the searing pain, you hook his legs, and using his own momentum, you pull him off balance. He hits the polished floor with a heavy thud, the impact knocking the wind out of him. Before he can recover, Lin is on him, pressing a nerve cluster in his neck with practiced efficiency. The technician goes limp.
Silence returns to the atrium, broken only by your own ragged breathing and the distant, fading alarms. Two unconscious bodies lie at your feet. The path to the security hub is clear.
"Nice catch," Lin says, already moving toward the security panel on the reinforced door.
"You too," you pant, leaning against the wall, a fresh wave of pain radiating from your shoulder. "Now get that door open before their friends come looking for them."
“How long do we have?”
Lin doesn't even look up from the console. His fingers fly across the holographic interface, his neural link giving him an intimate, intuitive understanding of the building's security architecture. Lines of code scroll past his eyes at a dizzying rate.
"Less than we'd like," he replies, his voice a low, focused hum. "The system's trying to compensate for the downed technicians. It's flagging them as 'unresponsive' and is automatically escalating the alert. I'm holding it back, but it's like wrestling a gundark."
He grunts with effort as he bypasses another layer of encryption. The heavy reinforced door to the security hub slides open with a satisfying hiss.
"I'm in," he announces, stepping into the small, darkened room. It's filled with servers and glowing monitors, the cool air thick with the smell of ozone. He immediately plugs his datapad into the primary server rack.
"How long, Lin?" you repeat, keeping watch over the still-unconscious technicians, your senses straining for any sign of approaching guards.
"To get the droid?" he asks, his attention completely absorbed by the torrent of data flowing into his datapad. "I can disable the hangar's external defenses from here, no problem. That'll take thirty seconds. But to keep the entire estate's security net from coming down on our heads when we walk out of here with a priceless piece of hardware... that's a different story."
He finally looks at you, his expression grim.
"From the moment I give the 'go' command and the hangar doors unlock, we have ninety seconds. Ninety seconds to get from here to the hangar, secure the T7 unit, and get to the Nightfall. After that, every alarm in a ten-block radius is going to light up, the Republic Security Force will be mobilized, and our escape window slams shut. No pressure."
A tense grin spreads across your face, a flicker of the old thrill-seeking impulse you thought had been burned out of you.
"This is where the fun begins," you say, the words a low, adrenaline-fueled promise.
Lin huffs a short, sharp laugh, his fingers never slowing. "Just stay loose. Vela's on her way to the rendezvous point. I'm opening the hangar doors... now."
On his datapad, a schematic of the hangar flashes from red to green. A heavy thud echoes from somewhere deep within the estate as magnetic locks disengage. The clock has started.
"Go!" Lin yells, unplugging his datapad.
You don't need to be told twice. You burst out of the atrium, moving with a desperate, painful urgency. The opulent halls are a blur of polished marble and expensive art. You follow Lin, who navigates the labyrinthine corridors with an unerring instinct, his datapad lighting the way.
You reach a heavy service door that Lin kicks open, revealing the cavernous, dimly lit hangar. The air smells of fuel and ionized air. Gleaming, ridiculously expensive speeders and luxury shuttles are parked in neat rows. And there, tucked away in a corner under a dust cover, is a shape that doesn't belong. It's small, stout, and cylindrical.
At the same moment, Vela drops silently from a maintenance catwalk in the rafters, landing in a perfect crouch. She gives you a sharp nod, her eyes already scanning for threats. The rendezvous is complete.
"Sixty seconds!" Lin shouts, already running toward the covered droid.
He rips the dust cover away. And there it is. A T7-series astromech. Its chassis is a unique combination of dark gray and faded orange plating. It's covered in dust and powered down, but it appears to be in perfect condition. It is a relic of a bygone era of craftsmanship.
"It's beautiful," Lin breathes, his hands hovering over the droid's chassis as if it were a holy object.
"Get it moving!" you urge, your gaze fixed on the massive hangar doors leading to the outside.
Lin pulls a power conduit from his pack and jams it into the droid's primary charging port. "Come on, wake up," he mutters, keying commands into his datapad.
The droid's single photoreceptor flickers to life, a soft, curious blue. It emits a series of questioning, melodic beeps.
"Thirty seconds!" Vela barks, her head snapping toward the hangar entrance as she hears the distant but rapidly approaching sound of mag-boots on plasteel.
The T7 unit chirps again, this time a more urgent, questioning tone as it takes in the scene. Lin gives it a final command.
"Alright, buddy," Lin says, patting the droid's dome. "Time to go! Follow me!"
The droid lets out an affirmative, two-tone whistle and its wheel struts extend. Just as it begins to move, the main entrance to the hangar slides open, revealing a squad of six heavily armed estate security guards.
"There they are! Open fire!" a guard yells.
A hail of red blaster bolts fills the air. 
The hangar erupts into a storm of controlled chaos. The air sizzles with the snap-hiss of blaster fire. Red bolts ricochet off luxury speeders and the hangar walls, casting the scene in a deadly strobe light.
"Time to go!" you yell, your voice clear despite the din. "Lin, clear a path! Vela, cover him!"
There's no time for complex tactics, only for movement and trust. Vela instantly becomes a blur of motion, shoving a heavy tool cabinet into the path of the advancing guards to create a makeshift barricade. The move buys a precious second.
Lin turns to the newly-activated T7 unit, whose blue photoreceptor is swiveling rapidly, taking in the chaos with a series of alarmed, questioning chirps. Instead of grabbing the droid, Lin kneels down, his voice calm and reassuring despite the blaster fire.
"Hey there, partner," he says, patting the droid's dome gently. "Things are a little loud right now, but we're the good guys, I promise. We're getting you out of here. Just stick close to me, alright?"
The T7 lets out a short, two-tone beep of understanding, its photoreceptor blinking. It seems to sense the sincerity in Lin's voice. As Lin makes a break for the Nightfall, the little droid's motor whirs to life, and it races alongside him, its loyalty already given.
You and Vela provide covering fire. You unholster your blaster pistol, the simple weapon feeling alien in your hand. Your aim is shaky, your focus split between the enemy and the searing pain in your shoulder. Vela, on the other hand, is a whirlwind of lethal precision. She uses the opulent speeders as cover, popping up to fire off perfectly aimed shots that send guards scrambling before disappearing again.
As Lin and the T7 clear the hangar door and make it onto the open grass, two guards break off, flanking you and Vela. One of them gets a clear shot. A blaster bolt screams past your head, so close you feel the heat of it on your cheek.
The T7, now in the open, suddenly swivels its domed head. It emits a determined series of whistles and extends a small plasma torch from a recessed panel. With astonishing precision, it fires a short, intense burst of heat at the locking mechanism of a nearby fuel line. The line bursts, spraying flammable liquid across the hangar floor right in the path of the advancing guards.
"Nice work, partner!" Lin yells with a manic grin as he keeps running. The droid chirps a proud, affirmative response.
The guards are forced to halt, trapped behind a wall of potential fire. The droid's quick, ingenious thinking has just saved you valuable time. But your problems are far from over.
As you and Vela finally break from the hangar, the sky above you lights up. Two Republic judiciary patrol ships, sleek and heavily armed, scream overhead, their searchlights cutting through the twilight. The estate's alarms have reached the local authorities.
"Time's up!" you yell, sprinting across the lawn, the grass slick with evening dew.
The ramp of the Nightfall is just fifty feet away. Lin and the T7 are almost there. You and Vela are right behind them. It looks like you might just make it.
That's when a new threat emerges. From a second-story balcony of the main residence, a massive figure leaps. It's the Magistrate's personal bodyguard, a four-armed, armor-clad Besalisk warrior. He lands with a ground-shaking thud, his heavy electro-staff crackling with energy. He plants himself firmly between your retreating crew and the safety of the Nightfall. He is a mountain of muscle and armor, and he stands as the final, formidable obstacle.
Lin and the T7 scramble up the ramp, the little droid letting out a worried series of beeps as it sees the new threat. Vela skids to a halt, her blaster pistol up, but the Besalisk's armor is clearly rated to handle small arms fire. He ignores her, his gaze fixing on you as the biggest threat. The patrol ships are circling back for a strafing run. The guards are finding a way around the fuel spill.
Time has run out.
There is no hesitation. There is no other choice. This is not a fight that can be won by a single hero or a single power. It is a test of the bond forged in the fires of the past two years.
"Vela, with me!" you roar over the sound of the approaching patrol ships. "We take him down together!"
A flicker of fierce understanding passes between you. This is the culmination of every painful lesson in the cargo hold. This is the trial.
You both charge.
The Besalisk bodyguard lets out a guttural bellow, a challenge to the storm descending upon him. He wields his electro-staff not as a single weapon, but as four, his multiple arms creating a near-impenetrable wall of crackling, white-hot energy.
The battle is a maelstrom of desperate action. You and Vela move like two parts of a single mind. She lays down suppressing fire with her blaster, forcing the Besalisk to keep his defenses tight, creating tiny openings. You exploit them, ducking under a sweeping strike to land a blow on his armored leg with your training sword, the impact doing little more than annoying him but breaking his rhythm.
But the bodyguard's strength is overwhelming. He is a mountain of pure, brutal force. His swings are not just attacks; they are tidal waves of power that shake the ground and send shudders up your arms with every desperate parry.
In a sharp, furious exchange, you see an opening. The Besalisk overcommits to a downward smash aimed at Vela. You lunge forward, aiming to strike the unarmored joint at his elbow. But he is faster than his size suggests. He twists, his primary attack a feint, and brings the butt of his electro-staff around in a vicious, horizontal arc.
You try to throw yourself back, but you are too slow. The crackling end of the staff grazes your side, burning through your tunic and searing a fresh, agonizing wound along your ribs. A cry of pain is torn from your lips as your strength vanishes, the shock of the electrical charge and the burn nearly causing you to black out. You stumble backward, your vision swimming.
"Kaelen!" Vela's voice cuts through the pain.
She abandons her tactical cover, placing herself directly between you and the advancing Besalisk. She fights with a cold, protective fury now, her blaster firing in a precise, controlled rhythm that forces the massive warrior to give ground, step by agonizing step. She is no longer just attacking; she is a living shield, buying you the most precious commodity in the universe: time.
"Go!" she snarls, never taking her eyes off the enemy.
You don't argue. Clutching your burning side, you limp the final few feet to the Nightfall, stumbling up the ramp. "Lin, lift off! Now!" you gasp.
The ramp begins to rise as Vela, firing her last few shots, makes a running leap onto it just as it seals shut. The Nightfall lurches violently as Lin pushes the engines to their absolute limit, ascending directly into the path of a patrol ship's strafing run. The ship shudders as blaster fire impacts the shields, but you are away. You are free.
On the bridge, as Lin plots a frantic hyperspace jump, you collapse into a chair, the adrenaline fading to reveal the fierce, throbbing pain in your side. Vela is there, checking your wound, her face grim. Lin’s new droid partner rolls up to you, emitting a series of low, worried beeps.
You escaped. You have the droid. But as you look at the faces of your crew and feel the fresh, searing pain in your side, the cruel truth lays itself bare. Your training with Vela helped, but it was not enough. Your bond held, but it almost broke. Without the full power of the Sanctuary, you are vulnerable. You are a liability.
The frantic escape from Corulag gives way to the quiet hum of the Nightfall retreating to the only safe harbor you know: Veridian. The journey is a somber one, the adrenaline of the heist replaced by the grim reality of your wounds.
Healing and Debriefing
The following weeks are dedicated to recovery. The Nightfall's small medbay once again becomes a place of healing, though this time, the mood is different. It's not the shocked aftermath of Vesper's attack, but a period of deliberate, focused recuperation.
Your new wound is a brutal lesson in your own mortality. The scorched flesh along your ribs is a constant, throbbing reminder that without the full measure of your Sanctuary power, you are made of flesh and bone, and both can be easily broken. Vela, herself recovering from the gash on her side, oversees your physical therapy with a quiet, firm demeanor. The training is less about combat and more about relearning your body's limits.
The debriefs on the bridge become a daily ritual. The three of you, along with your new companion, analyze every second of the heist.
Lin is ecstatic with the mission's success, but deeply troubled by the close calls. He replays the security footage, breaking down your fight with the Besalisk frame by frame, analyzing weaknesses in the armor and fighting style.


Vela is pragmatic. "We were tactically sound, but physically outmatched," she states, her assessment blunt and accurate. "The bodyguard was a singular, powerful obstacle. We encountered a squad of them, and we would have failed."


You are humbled. "I was a liability at the end," you admit, the words tasting like ash. "My injury slowed us down. We can't afford that again."


The New Partner
Amidst the recovery and analysis, the crew gets to know its newest member. The T7 unit, whom Lin affectionately begins to call "Tee-Seven," proves to be far more than a simple astromech. Its personality matrix, old and adaptive, quickly blossoms. It communicates through a complex language of beeps, whistles, and whirs that Lin begins to translate with uncanny fluency.
Tee-Seven is curious, loyal, and surprisingly brave. It forms an immediate, inseparable bond with Lin, often rolling beside him as he works, its single blue eye watching his every move. It assists him with diagnostics, running complex calculations that ease the strain on Lin's neural interface. For you and Vela, it shows a cautious respect, often emitting a soft, questioning chirp when you enter a room, as if taking your emotional temperature. It quickly becomes an indispensable part of the crew's dynamic, a cheerful, competent presence that brightens the ship's atmosphere.
A New Heading
The conversation inevitably turns to your next move: the need for a lightsaber. With Zhar's words about Ilum and other lost Jedi worlds fresh in your mind, you discuss where to even begin the search for a kyber crystal.
It is during one of these discussions on the bridge that Tee-Seven suddenly rolls to the main holotable. It extends a scomp link and, with a series of determined beeps, projects a shimmering, three-dimensional star chart into the center of the room. It is a section of the Unknown Regions, a place even Republic star charts mark as "unexplored."
"Whoa, partner, what is this?" Lin asks, leaning in.
Tee-Seven lets out a flurry of complex, excited whistles. "He says this is from his original memory banks," Lin translates, his eyes wide. "From his first owner, a Jedi explorer from before the Great War. It's a private star-chart, Kaelen. A map to a place the Jedi kept secret."
The droid manipulates the map, zooming in on a single, insignificant-looking star system. One planet is highlighted. It doesn't have a name, only a designation: "The Forge."
"He says his master called it 'The Forge'," Lin continues, his voice filled with awe. "It wasn't a world where crystals grew naturally, like Ilum. It was a place... a geological anomaly. A world where the Force was so raw and concentrated that a Jedi with enough will and knowledge could... create a crystal. Forge one from the planet's living heart."
Tee-Seven turns its blue photoreceptor to you and emits a single, soft, questioning beep. The message is clear. It is offering you a path. Not to find a piece of your past, but to forge a new future. The path of discovery Zhar spoke of is now laid bare before you, revealed by the very prize you fought so hard to obtain.
The holomap projected by Tee-Seven hangs in the air, a silent invitation to a place beyond the edge of the known galaxy. "The Forge." The name itself feels ancient and powerful. This isn't just a location; it's a promise.
You look from the glowing map to the faces of your crew. Vela, her arms crossed, her expression intense and ready. Lin, his eyes alight with the thrill of true, unprecedented discovery. And Tee-Seven, its blue photoreceptor fixed on you, awaiting a command. The pain in your side is a dull, constant ache, but for the first time since the fight on Veridian, it is overshadowed by a burgeoning sense of hope.
"A place where a Jedi could forge a crystal," you repeat, the words feeling heavy with significance. "That's not just a path, it's... a test." You meet Lin's gaze. "Can you plot a course from this data?"
Lin grins, a wide, enthusiastic smile that transforms his face. "Can I plot a course? Kaelen, this is the cleanest astrogation data I've ever seen. It's a direct route, no convoluted hyperspace lanes, no Sith Imperial checkpoints. It's a straight shot into the unknown."
"Then what are we waiting for?" you say, your voice resonating with newfound resolve. "Set the course, Lin. Let's go see about a Forge."
The decision is made. The mood on the bridge shifts from one of quiet recovery to one of eager anticipation. Lin and Tee-Seven work in perfect harmony, the slicer calling out coordinates while the droid inputs them, their combined efforts a seamless dance of man and machine. Vela heads to the armory, not to prepare for a heist, but to ensure the ship is ready for the rigors of a long journey into uncharted territory.
The hyperspace journey to The Forge unfolds not in hours, but in days. The silent, blue-white tunnel outside the viewport becomes a constant, meditative presence. This extended period of travel, free from the imminent threat of attack or the pressure of a heist, becomes a crucible for your crew, a time of healing, learning, and profound bonding.
Day 1–4: Foundations and Fundamentals
The first few days are focused on rebuilding your foundations.
Training with Vela: Your mornings are spent in the cargo hold with Vela. The sessions are less about combat and more about philosophy. She teaches you the core tenets of the Sith warrior code, stripped of its dogma. "The Sith teach that passion gives strength," she explains one morning, after you've completed a grueling set of endurance exercises. "But they are fools. They let their passion control them. True strength comes from channeling passion. Your love for your crew," she says, her gaze unwavering, "is the most potent passion I have ever witnessed. It is not a weakness. It is a furnace. Let it temper your blade." You begin to understand that fighting is not just about technique, but about the will behind the strike.


Learning from Lin: Your afternoons are spent on the bridge with Lin and Tee-Seven. Lin, now more comfortable with his new abilities, begins to teach you the basics of his art. He doesn't just show you how to slice; he shows you how to see. "Every system has a rhythm," he explains, pointing to a schematic of the Nightfall's power grid. "A flow. You used to feel it with the Force. I see it as data. But it's the same thing. Look for the patterns, the gaps, the moments where the system exhales. That's where you strike." He gives you simple hacking puzzles on a datapad, training your perception to see the digital world as he does. Tee-Seven often rolls over, projecting helpful diagrams and letting out encouraging beeps when you successfully bypass a firewall.


Evening Decompression: Evenings are for the crew as a whole. You gather in the galley, sharing meals. The conversation is easy, natural. Lin tells stories of his youth in the Sith Imperial slicer academies, Vela offers rare, brief glimpses into the brutalist architecture and spartan life on Korriban, and you find yourself speaking of your childhood on Dantana, of memories you thought were long buried.


Day 5–8: Reciprocity and Growth
As the journey continues, the dynamic shifts from teaching to exchange.
Teaching Vela: You find Vela one afternoon observing your quiet meditation. She watches with a professional curiosity. You invite her to join you, not to connect with the Force, but to practice the mental discipline of finding a center. "The Jedi seek peace by releasing emotion," you explain. "The Sith seek power by embracing it. I think they're both wrong. You can acknowledge an emotion—anger, fear, loyalty—without letting it control you. Hold it. Understand it. Then choose what to do with it." It is a concept completely alien to her training, but she is a diligent student. You can see her wrestling with it, her brow furrowed in concentration as she tries to find the quiet space between rage and serenity.


Challenging Lin: Your sessions with Lin evolve. You start to apply your natural Force perception to his digital puzzles. You can't overpower them, but you can sometimes "feel" the solution, sensing the path of least resistance through a firewall or the emotional state of a programmer through the code they wrote. It fascinates Lin. "It's like you're cheating," he says with a laugh, "but you're showing me a new way to think about security. It's not just a machine; it's a reflection of the builder."


Tee-Seven's Stories: Tee-Seven becomes the ship's historian. In the evenings, it projects old holographic logs from its memory banks. You see images of its first master, the Jedi explorer, standing on the edge of volcanic craters and mapping strange nebulas. The droid tells stories of discovering new species and navigating asteroid fields, its beeps and whistles translated by Lin into tales of adventure from a more hopeful age.


Day 9–10: Synthesis and Arrival
In the final days of the journey, everything begins to synthesize.
During a sparring session with Vela, you successfully disarm her for the first time. It's not through strength or a lucky blow, but by anticipating her move, a feat of perception that is a seamless blend of her teachings and your own innate senses. She looks surprised, then a slow, genuine smile of pride touches her lips.
Later, while working with Lin, you successfully bypass a military-grade encryption he designed, not by slicing, but by finding a single, flawed line of code left by its "creator," a subtle emotional tell you sensed through the Force.
You are becoming something new. Not a Jedi, not a Sith, not just the "Anomaly." You are the leader of this crew, a synthesis of all their strengths.
On the morning of the tenth day, the familiar blue tunnel of hyperspace finally dissolves. The Nightfall drifts into normal space, the light of a strange, vibrant, violet-hued star flooding the cockpit. Before you hangs a world unlike any you have ever seen. It is a planet of swirling, molten continents, islands of black, volcanic glass, and oceans of shimmering, liquid metal. The very air seems to crackle with a raw, untamed energy that you can feel even through the ship's hull. It's a primal, chaotic power that calls to the wounded part of your soul.
"Whoa," Lin breathes, his voice full of awe.
Tee-Seven lets out a single, triumphant beep.
"Welcome," Lin translates, his eyes fixed on the spectacle before you, "to The Forge."
For a long moment, you are utterly speechless. The sight of The Forge is overwhelming, a sensory assault that resonates with the deepest parts of your being. It's not just a planet; it's a living, breathing storm of raw creation. You feel its chaotic energy like a physical pressure against the Nightfall's hull, a wild, untamed song that both terrifies and enthralls you. It makes the Dark Side presence you felt in the Dantana Enclave feel like a flickering candle in comparison to this raging inferno of pure, neutral power.
Vela steps up beside your command chair, her hand resting instinctively on the h.i.l.t of her blaster, her expression one of deep, primal caution. "This place," she says, her voice a low murmur, "is strong."
You finally shake yourself from your stupor, the raw power of the planet leaving an electric tingle on your skin. You tear your eyes away from the viewport, your mind struggling to process the sheer magnitude of what you're witnessing.
"Lin..." you manage, your voice slightly hoarse. "Assessment?"
Lin, who had been staring at the main screen with a look of slack-jawed wonder, snaps back to reality. He plugs his neural interface cable into the console, and Tee-Seven rolls forward, projecting a secondary holographic display next to the main screen. The two of them work in silent, perfect sync.
"Okay... okay, running scans now," Lin says, his fingers flying across the console. "This is... wow. Atmospheric composition is technically breathable but laced with heavy metals and silicate particles. We'll need breathers for any extended EVA. Tectonic activity is off the charts. The entire crust is in a state of constant, slow flux."
Tee-Seven emits a series of rapid-fire chirps, adding its own sensor data to the assessment.
"Tee-Seven's confirming," Lin translates. "Long-range sensors show no signs of technology. No structures, no ships, no energy signatures other than the planet itself. We're completely alone out here."
He brings up a topographical map, a shifting, chaotic landscape of volcanic mountain ranges and shimmering, metallic seas. "The energy readings are... everywhere," he says, struggling to find the right words. "It's like the entire planet is a massive kyber crystal. But it's unfocused, chaotic. Tee-Seven's logs from his first master say that the process isn't about finding a crystal. It's about finding a focal point. A place where the planet's energy is naturally amplified. A 'conduit,' the log calls it."
He zooms in on a massive, continent-sized volcano, its caldera wide enough to swallow a small moon. A single, intense energy reading emanates from its center.
"There," Lin says, his voice hushed with reverence. "According to Tee-Seven's map, that's our destination. The heart of The Forge. The Jedi who came here had to journey to the center of that volcano. That's where the ritual takes place."
The path is clear. It leads directly into the heart of the most volatile, powerful, and untamed world you have ever seen.
You pull your gaze away from the hypnotic, terrifying beauty of the planet and turn to the small droid who brought you here. The trust you place in him is immediate and total; he is the keeper of this forgotten knowledge, a link to the past you must now navigate.
"Alright, buddy," you say, your voice resonating with sincerity. "It's your show, so I'll defer to your judgment. Is this a journey I should make alone, or do we journey together?"
Tee-Seven swivels its blue photoreceptor from the chaotic world outside to you. It lets out a series of low, thoughtful tones—not the rapid-fire data bursts of before, but something more measured, more philosophical.
Lin, listening intently, translates. "He says the logs from his Jedi master are clear on one point: the Jedi who came here undertook the final trial within the volcano alone. It was a personal test of their connection to the Force."
A knot tightens in your stomach. The thought of facing that overwhelming power by yourself, in your current state, is a daunting one.
But then, Tee-Seven rolls a little closer to you and emits another, softer series of chirps, his photoreceptor glowing with what you can only interpret as warmth.
Lin smiles. "But he says your journey is different. You are not here to test your strength; you are here to forge it." Lin's eyes meet yours, conveying the droid's wisdom. "He says this is a journey of personal growth, and your bond with your crew... that is your greatest strength. You should not cast it aside."
The droid's counsel is wise, a perfect blend of respecting the ancient ritual and understanding your unique reality. You feel a wave of gratitude for the little droid's insight. With his recommendation clear, you turn to the final arbiter, your partner and your shield.
"Vela?" The single word carries the weight of the final decision.
She has been listening intently, her arms crossed as she studies the swirling vortex of the planet on the main screen. She turns her gaze to you, her expression firm, her eyes leaving no room for argument.
"I do not know the rituals of the Jedi," she states, her voice as solid as bedrock. "But I know that world is a death trap. And I know you are not at full strength." She takes a step closer, her protective instinct a palpable force in the cockpit. "You faced Vesper with us. You faced the heist with us. You will face this with us. Where you go, we go."
She looks from you to Lin and back again, her loyalty absolute and unconditional. "That is the only plan I will accept."
Her words, combined with the droid's wisdom, settle the matter completely. There is no other way. You are a crew. A pack. A family. You will face The Forge as you have faced everything else: together.
A feeling of profound relief and resolve washes over you. "Lin," you command, your voice ringing with renewed purpose. "Find us a stable landing zone. As close to that volcano as you can safely get us."
You look at your crew, at the three figures who are your entire universe. "We go together."
With the decision made, the crew springs into action with a renewed, unified purpose. On the bridge, Lin's hands dance across the console, Tee-Seven rolling beside him in a flurry of efficient beeps and whirs. Together, they chart a perilous course to a remote plateau near the base of the colossal volcano, calibrating the ship's deflector shields to withstand the intense electromagnetic interference radiating from the planet's surface. The Nightfall hums with a vibrant energy, as if sensing the significance of this destination.
While they navigate, you and Vela prepare for the journey ahead. In the cargo hold, she meticulously sharpens a heavy-duty vibrosword, her movements precise and focused, her determination a palpable force. You join her, not to spar, but to ready the equipment you'll need—environmental suits, climbing gear, and ration packs suited for the volatile landscape. Every piece of equipment you check is a tacit acknowledgment of the dangers you are choosing to face together.
The descent through the planet's atmosphere is a trial in itself. The Nightfall shudders and groans as it's buffeted by violent thermal updrafts. Outside the viewport, lightning the color of amethyst dances across molten horizons, casting flickering shadows over rivers of liquid metal and vast plains of black, volcanic glass. The tension in the cockpit is thick, each member of the crew silent in their own thoughts, keenly aware of the monumental task before them.
Lin's skill as a pilot is all that keeps the ship from being torn apart. With Tee-Seven feeding him constant telemetry adjustments, he expertly navigates the chaotic air currents. Touchdown is rough, jarring the ship with a resonant thud that vibrates through the deck plates, but it is controlled. The Nightfall settles on a wide, flat plateau of obsidian-like rock, its engines whining down into a respectful silence.
The landing ramp lowers with a hiss, opening onto a scene of raw, untamed creation. The vast volcanic landscape stretches out before you, alive with crackling energy. The air itself seems to hum. In the distance, the titanic volcano that is your destination looms, its peak wreathed in a perpetual storm cloud, a silent challenge against the violet sky. 
The four of you stand at the edge of the ramp, staring out at the awe-inspiring, terrifying landscape. The air, thick with the scent of ozone and sulfur, is surprisingly cool despite the rivers of lava that flow in the distance. A low, constant hum vibrates through the soles of your boots—the planet itself, singing its song of raw power.
"Okay," Lin says, pulling a datapad from his pack. "Breathers on. The particulate count in the air is high enough to cause serious lung damage over time." He, you, and Vela clip on compact rebreather masks that cover your noses and mouths. Tee-Seven, immune to such concerns, lets out a cheerful, metallic chirp.
"According to the logs," Lin continues, studying the map Tee-Seven provided, "the entrance isn't at the base. It's a cave system about halfway up the southern face of the volcano. The Jedi who came before had to climb."
He points toward a series of jagged, ascending rock formations that look like the broken teeth of some colossal beast. That is your path. It's a treacherous, multi-day climb over sharp, volcanic rock and unstable terrain.
"The journey is part of the trial," you murmur, recalling Zhar's words.
"Looks like the trial involves a lot of cardio," Lin quips, though his eyes betray a hint of nervousness as he eyes the steep ascent.
Vela, ever the pragmatist, scans the rock face, her gaze analytical. "The rock looks brittle. We will need to test every handhold. We will rope ourselves together. I will take the lead." Her pronouncement is not a suggestion; it is a statement of fact. Her strength and agility make her the natural choice to lead the climb.
You nod in agreement. "I'll take the rear. Lin, you and Tee-Seven stay in the middle. We protect the asset," you say, giving the little droid a respectful nod. Tee-Seven responds with a proud, affirmative beep.
With the plan set, the four of you step off the ramp and onto the black, glassy soil of The Forge. The journey has truly begun. The ascent is arduous, even more difficult than it appeared from the ground. The volcanic rock is sharp as razors, and loose scree often gives way underfoot, sending cascades of pebbles rattling down into the chasms below.
Vela moves with a dancer's grace, her every movement confident and sure as she tests each handhold before calling down to the rest of you. Lin, despite his cybernetic leg, struggles with the uneven terrain, his movements often clumsy. But Tee-Seven is a marvel. The little droid uses a combination of its powerful wheel struts and a series of extendable grappling hooks to navigate the cliffs with an agility that defies its shape, often securing a line for Lin or clearing a patch of loose rock.
As you climb, the raw energy of the planet intensifies. It's a constant, low-level hum in the back of your mind, a pressure that is both exhilarating and deeply draining. Your own weakened connection to the Force feels like a tiny flicker in a hurricane, and the effort to keep it shielded from the overwhelming power of the planet leaves you feeling perpetually exhausted.
After two days of grueling, monotonous climbing, the terrain shifts. The steep, open rock faces give way to a narrow, winding ledge that cuts across a sheer cliff. The path is barely wide enough for two people to stand abreast, with a stomach-churning drop on one side and the cold, hard rock of the volcano on the other. It is the only way forward.
Vela, in the lead as always, holds up a hand, bringing the small caravan to a halt. "Something's not right," she whispers over the comms, her voice tight.
You peer around her and see the problem. About fifty meters ahead, the narrow ledge widens into a small, sheltered alcove. The alcove is filled with what look like large, crystalline cocoons, shimmering with a faint, internal light. It's a nest.
As you watch, one of the creatures emerges. It is a reptilian predator, about the size of a large wolf. Its body is covered in scales of jagged, obsidian-like crystal that perfectly camouflage it against the rock face. It moves with a low, slinking grace, its four powerful legs ending in wicked, curved claws that seem to grip the rock with impossible ease. Its head is a wedge of sharp angles, and its eyes glow with a faint, predatory intelligence. Another one joins it, and then a third. They are sleek, powerful, and utterly at home in this hostile environment. They are not overtly aggressive, but they have positioned themselves directly across the narrowest part of the ledge, guarding their nest. Their message is clear: this path is closed.
You are trapped. Turning back would mean sacrificing days of progress. But moving forward means confronting a pack of native predators in their own territory, on a narrow ledge thousands of feet in the air where a single misstep means death.
"I count three of them," you say quietly into the comm, analyzing the situation. "There could be more in the nest."
"They're territorial," Vela observes, her hand resting on her blaster. "A direct assault would be foolish. We are on their ground."
Lin, situated safely behind Vela, looks pale. "I'm not seeing any other way around on the map," he says, his voice strained. "This is the only path."
Tee-Seven, anchored securely to the rock face with its grappling hooks, lets out a low, worried warble. The creatures turn their heads in unison at the sound, their glowing eyes fixing on your party. One of them lets out a low, guttural hiss that sounds like scraping glass.
You make the decision, not with a commander's bark, but with a quiet, firm resolve that travels down the safety line connecting you all.
"Everyone, quiet," you say over the comm, your voice a low murmur. "No sudden moves. We're going to try and sneak past." You meet Vela's cautious gaze. "We show them we are not a threat to them or their nest. We're just passing through."
Vela hesitates for a fraction of a second, her warrior instincts likely screaming that this is a mistake. But she trusts your judgment. She gives a single, sharp nod of acknowledgment. "Slow and steady," she affirms.
You take a deep breath, centering yourself. "If our only way forward is through," you whisper, more to yourself than to the others, "then we try to do it respectfully. Trust in the Force."
You let the faint whisper of your Force connection guide you, not to project power, but to simply feel. You open yourself to the creatures, not to influence them, but to broadcast a single, clear intent: Peace. We mean no harm. We are just walking.
Vela begins to move, her steps impossibly slow and deliberate. She keeps her body low, her hands visible and away from her weapons. She moves along the absolute outer edge of the narrow ledge, giving the nest as wide a berth as possible.
You follow suit, your movements mirroring hers. You can feel Lin's nervous, shallow breathing behind you, but to his credit, he moves with a newfound, careful silence. Tee-Seven, anchored to the rock face, retracts its noisy grappling hooks and uses its magnetized wheels to inch along the cliff with an eerie lack of sound.
The crystalline predators watch your slow, deliberate procession. Their heads tilt in unison, their glowing eyes tracking your every move. The low, scraping hiss continues, a constant, low-level threat display. They are tense, poised, ready to spring at the slightest provocation. One of them takes a single step forward, its claws making a sharp click on the rock.
Your heart pounds in your chest. The air is thick with a primal tension. Every instinct screams to draw a weapon, to prepare for the inevitable attack. But you hold fast to your chosen path, projecting nothing but calm, respectful intent. You are a visitor in their home. A traveler on their road.
You draw level with the nest. You are now at the closest point, a mere ten feet separating you from the alpha predator. You can see the intricate, beautiful, and terrifying detail of its crystalline scales, the faint pulse of heat from its body. It stares directly at you, its gaze seeming to pierce right through you, weighing your intent.
You meet its gaze without flinching, holding firm to your peaceful projection. We are not a threat.
For a long, heart-stopping moment, the creature remains perfectly still. The fate of your entire party hangs in this silent, tense standoff. Then, slowly, deliberately, the creature blinks its nictitating membrane. It lets out a final, low hiss, and takes a single step backward, clearing the path. The other two follow its lead, melting back into the shadows of the alcove, their eyes still on you, but their posture no longer one of immediate threat.
They have accepted your plea. They are letting you pass.
A wave of profound relief washes over you, so intense it almost makes you dizzy. You continue your slow, respectful passage past the nest. No one speaks. No one looks back. You move with the deliberate pace of a pilgrim leaving a holy site.
Only when you have put a safe fifty meters between yourselves and the nest do you finally pause, slumping against the rock face, your knees weak. You look back at your crew. Lin is pale but smiling faintly. Vela gives you a look of grudging, profound respect. You have faced a deadly threat not with violence, but with wisdom. It is a victory more profound than any battle. The path ahead is clear.
You stay there for a long moment, your backs pressed against the cool, hard rock, the four of you catching your collective breath. The tension of the encounter slowly bleeds away, replaced by a quiet sense of awe and accomplishment. No blasters were fired, no blades were drawn, yet you faced a lethal threat and emerged unscathed.
"Okay," Lin finally breathes out, his voice shaky but relieved. "That was... new."
Vela looks back down the ledge toward the now-hidden nest, her expression thoughtful. "To show no aggression in the face of a clear threat... it is not the Sith way. Nor is it the way of a cornered animal." She turns her gaze to you, a new level of understanding in her eyes. "It is a third path. A brave one."
You simply nod, too drained for a lengthy explanation. The encounter took more out of you than a physical fight would have. Projecting that unwavering sense of calm while your heart was trying to beat its way out of your chest was an exercise in mental and spiritual fortitude that has left you feeling hollowed out.
Tee-Seven rolls up beside you and emits a soft, comforting series of cooing beeps, gently nudging your leg with its dome. The small gesture of support from the droid is surprisingly grounding.
"Alright," you say, pushing yourself off the wall. "Let's not overstay our welcome."
With renewed purpose, you continue the climb. The encounter with the crystal predators seems to have been the planet's final test before the entrance. The path grows steeper but more stable, the loose scree giving way to solid, well-formed rock. The air grows warmer, and the low hum of the planet's energy becomes more focused, more intense. It's no longer a background noise; it feels like you are approaching the source of the song.
After another hour of strenuous climbing, Vela, still in the lead, calls out. "I see it."
You pull yourself up over a final ledge and there it is. Exactly as Tee-Seven's logs described. It's not a grand, ornate entrance, but a simple, dark fissure in the side of the volcano. A cave mouth, about twenty feet high, from which a palpable wave of heat and raw energy emanates. The air around the entrance shimmers, distorted by the sheer power radiating from within.
This is the doorway to The Forge.
"Let's get out of this weather," you say, your voice firm against the howling wind. "We continue forward."
You lead the way, stepping through the shimmering curtain of heat and into the mouth of the volcano. The transition is instantaneous and profound. The raging storm outside is cut off, replaced by a deep, resonant silence broken only by the rhythmic, booming heartbeat of the mountain.
The air inside is thick, warm, and charged with a static energy that makes the hair on your arms stand on end. The tunnel slopes gently downward, its walls smooth and glassy, glowing with a faint, internal luminescence from veins of what looks like superheated crystal. Faint, elegant runes are carved into the rock, ancient Jedi script that speaks of focus, will, and creation.
Tee-Seven's photoreceptor acts as a roving spotlight, its beam cutting through the gloom. Lin walks beside the droid, his datapad out, though he's not scanning for threats but rather mapping the tunnel's intricate energy patterns. Vela brings up the rear, her hand never straying far from her weapon, her senses on high alert. Every footstep echoes in the vast, quiet space, feeling less like an intrusion and more like a pilgrimage.
After what feels like an hour of descent, the narrow tunnel opens dramatically into a vast, breathtaking cavern. The chamber is immense, its ceiling lost in the darkness above. The walls are not rock, but a solid mass of interlocking, semi-translucent crystals, each one pulsing with a soft, ethereal light in time with the mountain's heartbeat. In the center of the cavern stands a single, circular altar of smooth, black stone, scarred and worn from ages of use but still radiating an aura of deep reverence. This is it. The Forge.
The moment you all step into the chamber, the energy intensifies tenfold. It's no longer a hum; it's a psychic roar, a wave of pure, untamed Force that washes over you.
And it brings visions.
The world around you doesn't disappear, but it is overlaid with powerful, seductive illusions tailored to each of you, born from your deepest fears and desires.
For you, Kaelen, the pain in your shoulder and side vanishes. You feel the full, unrestrained power of your Sanctuary roaring back to life, wrapping you in an armor of invincibility. A version of yourself, glowing and god-like, stands before you. "This is what you are," it whispers in your mind. "This weakness is a choice. Embrace your true nature. You can protect them completely, but they must serve your power. They must be your instruments."


You see Vela freeze, her eyes wide, staring at a space only she can see. Before her stands a phantom of a powerful Sith Lord, his hand outstretched. You can't hear the words, but you feel the psychic echo of his offer: a command, a fleet, the power and respect she was raised to crave. An end to being a subordinate, a chance to become a master.


Lin stumbles, his hand flying to his neural port. His eyes glaze over as he sees a vision of a perfect, orderly galaxy. No war, no chaos, no loss. A universe governed by pure, incorruptible logic, with him as its architect. A voice offers him the chance to shed the messy, painful emotions of the flesh and ascend, to become a true ghost in a perfect machine.


Your crew is under assault, not by a physical enemy, but by the siren song of their own deepest desires. The Forge is testing you all. It is offering you power, but demanding your souls in exchange. As the leader, as the one who brought them here, you feel the psychic weight of their struggles as acutely as your own. You must act, but your power is a flickering candle in this hurricane.
The visions lash out, seductive and cruel, each one a perfect, poisoned key designed to unlock the deepest chambers of your crew's hearts. You see Vela's posture shift, a subtle straightening that speaks to the allure of command. You see Lin's head tilt, his expression smoothing into one of serene, cold calculation. And you feel the phantom god-version of yourself whispering in your own ear, promising an end to all pain, all fear, at the simple cost of your soul.
You reject it all.
"No," you breathe, the word a bubble of defiance in the psychic storm. You will not choose between them. You will not save one and sacrifice another. This is why you came here. Our bond will protect us, or it will destroy us.
You close your eyes and turn inward, past the pain in your shoulder, past the phantom vision of your own divinity. You search for the faint, flickering ember of your Sanctuary power. It is a tiny, fragile thing in this raging inferno. You know that to use it, to try and force it into a shield, would be like trying to dam a river with a handful of sand.
So you don't build a wall. You forge a chain.
You reach out with that tiny spark, not as a shield, but as a connection. A single, shimmering thread of your will stretches out from you and touches Vela. You don't try to fight her vision; you simply offer a memory. The memory of her standing between you and the Besalisk on Corulag, a fierce guardian. The memory of her quiet, grudging respect after you faced the crystal predators. You offer her the memory of pack.
Then, you stretch out another thread to Lin. You offer him the memory of your first meeting, of valuing him not for his skills but for his spirit. The memory of him laughing in the galley, of his triumphant, exhausted smile when he declared you all free. You offer him the memory of family.
Finally, with the last of your will, you pull. You draw those two threads, those two anchors, back to yourself, weaving them together with your own core desire: to protect them, to keep this fragile, broken family whole.
For a glorious, fleeting moment, it works.
A shimmering, invisible bond forms between the three of you. A shared mental space built not on power, but on loyalty, trust, and shared history. You can feel their presence in your mind, a familiar warmth against the cold psychic assault of the planet.
But the Forge is ancient and its power is immense. The psychic storm does not break against your bond; it slams into it. The effort to maintain the link strains every fiber of your being. Your diminishing power is a frayed rope in a hurricane. Shards of the planet's power, sharp and cruel, break through the cracks in your concentration.
You feel Vela falter. The phantom Sith Lord's commands are no longer a seductive whisper but a sharp, undeniable order that catches in her mind. Her stance becomes uneven, her hand twitching toward her weapon, her loyalty warring with a lifetime of ingrained obedience. She is still there, but the vision has a hook in her.
You feel Lin's thoughts grow disjointed, caught between the cold, beautiful perfection of a logical universe and the messy, chaotic warmth of his loyalty to you. He clutches his head, a low moan escaping his lips as his mind is pulled in two different directions at once. The link is holding, but it is fractured.
The strain is too much. With a final, desperate pulse, the Sanctuary link shatters. The psychic backlash hits you like a physical blow. You collapse to your knees, a cry of agony torn from your lips. Your vision blurs, the world dissolving into a gray, painful haze. Your head feels like it's splitting apart, and the last of your energy drains from you, leaving you empty and terribly vulnerable on the cold stone floor.
The trial has not been won. It has just begun. Through the haze of your pain, you see Vela and Lin, still struggling, still caught in the web of their own minds. You are all hanging by a thread, and you, the anchor, have just been broken.
You are on the ground, the cold stone of The Forge leaching the last of your warmth. The psychic roar of the planet is a physical weight, and the aftershock of your failed Sanctuary link has left you mentally and spiritually shattered. Through the gray haze of your pain, you see your crew, your family, lost in the prison of their own minds. Vela is rigid, her knuckles white as she grips a weapon that isn't there, caught between her loyalty to you and the phantom commands of a dead order. Lin is curled on the ground, clutching his head, caught between the beautiful lie of a perfect universe and the messy truth of his own heart.
You are broken. Your power is spent. But you are their leader. You must act. 
The psychic backlash has left you on your knees, a nail of ice driven through your skull. The chamber's oppressive energy roars in your mind, and through a gray haze of pain, you see Vela and Lin lost in the storm, their spirits moments from being swept away. The bond you tried to forge is broken. Your power is gone. All that remains is will.
Summoning a reserve of strength you did not know you possessed, you drag yourself to your feet. Every muscle screams in protest. The fresh wound on your side tears, sending a jolt of white-hot agony through you. But your eyes are locked on Vela's rigid form, on the subtle tremor in her hand as she grips a phantom weapon, her mind a battlefield between a dead past and an uncertain future.
Each agonizing step you take toward her is a defiant scream against the psychic tempest. The visions claw at you, whispering of the god you could be, the power you could reclaim. You ignore them. They are lies. The truth is the woman standing before you.
You reach her and, with the last of your strength, you wrap your arms around her in a fierce, grounding embrace. It isn't an attack or a display of power; it is an anchor of pure, desperate physical reality against the storm of illusion. You press your forehead against hers, the cool metal of her circlet a stark contrast to the feverish heat of your own skin.
Your voice is a ragged whisper, lost in the psychic roar, but you know she hears you. "Vela. Remember the pack. Remember us." You pour every ounce of your shared history into the words. "Remember who you chose to be."
A violent shudder wracks her body. The phantom Sith Lord's hold on her trembles, assaulted not by power, but by a truth it cannot comprehend. The memory of your trust, of Lin's friendship, of Tee-Seven's loyalty—it is a light the shadows cannot extinguish. In your mind's eye, you see the illusion crack.
With a sharp, gasping breath, Vela's arms, which had been rigid at her sides, circle around you, her grip fierce, possessive. It is a promise, an oath, a declaration that shatters the phantom's whisper. The psychic storm in the chamber falters, its focus disrupted by this unexpected act of unity.
You pull back just enough to look her in the eyes. The shadows are still there, but they are retreating, her own indomitable will rising to meet them. "We are more than these ghosts," you say, your voice gaining strength. "Together, we are the pack. Together, we are the storm."
Her eyes, fierce and clear, lock onto yours. The last vestiges of the Sith acolyte burn away, leaving only the protector, reborn and absolute. The illusion breaks completely.
Behind you, a soft, hesitant cough breaks the tension. You both turn. Lin is pushing himself up, his eyes clearing from the cold, distant logic of the vision. He looks from you to Vela, a look of dawning understanding on his face. Seeing your bond hold, seeing you refuse to abandon each other, was the anchor he needed to pull himself from the beautiful lie. Tee-Seven rolls forward and lets out a series of joyful, triumphant trills, sensing the victory.
The psychic assault of The Forge has not ceased, but it no longer has purchase. It washes over your small group, unable to penetrate the quiet, unshakeable sanctuary of your bond. The Forge has tested you with its power, and you have answered with your unity. You have not just survived the trial; you have conquered it.
As the last echoes of the psychic storm fade into the cavern's resonant hum, you become acutely aware that your arms are still wrapped firmly around Vela. The embrace, born of desperation and a need to anchor her to reality, now lingers in the quiet aftermath. A heat wholly unrelated to the volcano rises in your cheeks, and you feel a flush of embarrassment spread across your face in the cavern's eerie, crystalline glow.
Vela seems to notice at the same moment. She stiffens for a fraction of a second before her expression, once a mask of fierce concentration, softens into something you've rarely seen: a flicker of genuine, wry amusement. With a subtle step, she loosens your grasp, creating a small, necessary space between you.
There is a brief, charged silence, heavy but not uncomfortable. No one speaks, as if all three of you recognize that what just passed between you was beyond words.
Lin, ever the one to break tension, clears his throat loudly. "So," he says, his voice attempting a casual tone that doesn't quite land. "Are we... done with the group hug portion of the trial? Because Tee-Seven is picking up some very interesting energy readings from that big, black table."
You clear your own throat, taking another step back and trying to shake off the last vestiges of the moment. "Right," you say, your voice steadier than you feel. "The altar."
The three of you, a battle-tested and newly strengthened unit, turn your full attention to the center of the chamber. The altar is a simple, unadorned disc of obsidian-like stone. It seems to absorb the pulsing light of the cavern, making it a point of absolute stillness in the vibrant, energetic space. You can feel a new kind of power emanating from it—not the chaotic, overwhelming assault of before, but a quiet, expectant hum. It is waiting.
"The Jedi logs Tee-Seven has," Lin says, his voice now low and serious, "they describe this as the final step. The altar is a focusing conduit. It will amplify the planet's energy, but it will also amplify the user's will. It's where the Jedi master would pour his own spirit into the raw heart of the planet to create the crystal."
He looks at you, his meaning clear. This is your moment.
Vela steps to your side, her presence a solid, reassuring weight. "You will not be alone," she says, her voice a quiet promise. "We will stand guard. We will be your shield while you do what you must."
You look at the altar, then at your crew. Lin, the loyal heart. Tee-Seven, the surprising font of wisdom. And Vela, your unshakeable sword and shield. They have faced every trial with you. They have pulled you back from the brink. Now, they are offering to be the wall that protects you during your most vulnerable moment.
Taking a deep breath and steeling your resolve, you nod. It is time. You walk forward, alone, toward the ancient, waiting altar, ready to face the final trial of The Forge.
You step forward slowly, each footfall a solemn echo in the great crystalline chamber. The air is heavy, not just with heat and charged particles, but with the palpable weight of ancient power and expectation. The altar draws you in like a beacon, its obsidian surface slick and cold to the touch. As you approach, the pulsing glow from the crystalline walls seems to dim, focusing all the cavern's latent energy onto this singular point. The rhythmic booming that has been the mountain’s heartbeat swells into a deep, resonant pulse that you feel in your chest, each beat syncing with the rapid thrum of your own heart. It's as if the Forge is recognizing you, challenging you, and preparing to respond.
You take a long breath, the mineral-rich scent of the air grounding you. Behind you, Lin and Vela stand vigil, their expressions a mix of reverence and fierce determination. Tee-Seven emits a soft, encouraging beep from the shadows. They are your shield, granting you this moment.
The ancient Jedi text from Tee-Seven’s memory banks was clear: to create the crystal, you must pour a piece of your own spirit into the forge. You must meld your essence with the volatile, raw power of this volcanic heart, shaping it with your will and intent. This act will forever alter your connection to the Force. The crystal you create will be a reflection of the part of yourself you choose to offer.
You close your eyes, feeling the mounting heat, the pulsing energy, and the silent watchfulness of your crew. Before you lies a moment that will define not just the weapon you forge, but the very nature of the path you will follow.
You place your hands upon the cool, smooth stone of the altar. It hums beneath your palms, ready to receive your offering. The planet asks you a silent question: Who are you?
You stand before the ancient altar, the weight of centuries pressing down as the pulsing energy of The Forge swirls around you like a living tempest. The planet has tested you with illusions, and you have answered with unity. Now, it asks its final, silent question: Who are you?
You close your eyes, shutting out the pulsing light of the cavern to look inward. You will not offer it a single piece of yourself. You will offer it everything.
First, you reach deep past the pain, past the training, past the labels of Jedi, Sith, and Anomaly. You find the raw, unyielding core of your being: the will to survive. It is not a noble or elegant thing. It is a jagged, iron-hard shard of spirit, forged in the fires of a Sith laboratory and honed by every desperate breath you have ever taken. You offer this first, laying the raw, untamed essence of the survivor upon the altar.
The Forge roars in response, its chaotic energy drawn to the familiar resonance of raw survival. But you are not finished.
Next, you reach for your bonds, the brilliant, unwavering lights of your crew. You feel your loyalty to Lin—a steady, warm flame of gratitude and brotherhood. You feel your connection to Vela—a fierce, protective inferno built on mutual respect and shared battle. You even feel your fondness for Tee-Seven—a bright, cheerful spark of newfound friendship. You gather these feelings, these anchors of your heart, and weave them like shimmering threads around the jagged iron of your will. The raw desire to survive is transformed, amplified, and given purpose. It is no longer just the will to live; it is the will to live for them.
Finally, with the two offerings fused into a single, potent whole, you call upon the last, flickering ember of your unique gift. You gather what remains of your Sanctuary power. It is not the overwhelming null-field it once was, but a fragile, precious thing. You do not add it to the offering. Instead, you use it to shroud your fused will, wrapping the core of your spirit in a thin, shimmering veil of pure, silent negation. It is an armor and a signature.
You place this complete offering—your will, bound by love, and shrouded in Sanctuary—onto the altar. You give the Forge everything you are.
The altar responds. The deep, rhythmic booming of the mountain ceases, replaced by a single, impossibly pure, resonant hum. The obsidian surface beneath your hands glows, first with a dark, iron-colored light from the will within, then it is shot through with shimmering threads of gold and crimson light from your bonds, and the entire thing is enveloped in a soft, light-absorbing aura of deepest indigo.
Slowly, from the heart of the stone, a crystal begins to form. It does not grow; it coalesces, pulled from the energy of the planet and the essence of your spirit. It is unlike any kyber crystal ever seen. At its core is a heart of smoky, almost black quartz, representing the survivor's iron will. Swirling within and around this dark heart are veins of brilliant, warm gold and fierce crimson, the colors of your bonds with Lin and Vela. And the entire crystal gives off a faint, almost imperceptible aura of deep indigo that seems to drink the light around it, a perfect miniature echo of your Sanctuary.
The hum fades. The light subsides. There, resting on the altar, is the crystal. It is radiant, complex, and unstable, pulsing with a quiet energy that beats in time with your own heart. It is undeniably yours.
You reach out with a trembling hand and pick it up. It is heavy, warm, and feels like coming home. The exhaustion hits you then, a profound, bone-deep weariness that makes you stagger.
"Kaelen."
Vela's voice cuts through the haze. You open your eyes to see your crew gathering around the altar, their faces shining with a mixture of pride, relief, and sheer awe. Lin stares at the crystal in your hand as if it's the most beautiful piece of technology he has ever seen. Tee-Seven lets out a long, soft, triumphant series of whistles.
The journey back down the volcano is a stark contrast to the arduous climb. The raw, oppressive energy of The Forge seems to have quieted, its psychic roar softened to a respectful hum now that its trial is complete. Or perhaps it is you who has changed. The crystal in your pocket feels like a lodestone, a point of personal gravity that anchors you against the planet's power. The descent is swift, your steps sure and your hearts light.
Back in the sterile, familiar confines of the Nightfall's workshop, the true task begins. The crystal sits on a clean, black cloth on the workbench, its internal light pulsing gently, a silent testament to the journey you have all just endured. Lin, Vela, and Tee-Seven gather around, their expressions a mix of curiosity and reverence.
Lin has already laid out a collection of scavenged and pristine lightsaber components on the workbench—emitters, focusing lenses, power cells, activation studs, and various casings. They are the raw materials, the inert pieces that you must now assemble into a hilt, a housing worthy of the unique crystal you have created.
This is the final step, and it is a deeply personal one. A lightsaber is a reflection of its builder, not just in its crystal but in its very form and function. Every choice you make will define how you wield your newfound strength.
As you gaze at the array of components, several questions arise, their answers shaping the weapon that will become your constant companion.
With your choices made, a quiet reverence settles over the workshop. This is no longer a technical assembly; it is a sacred ritual. Lin, Vela, and Tee-Seven take a respectful step back, giving you space, their presence a silent, protective circle around you.
You do not begin by touching the components. Instead, you move to the center of the room, sit, and close your eyes. You sink into a deep state of meditation, the same focused calm you found in the heart of The Forge's storm. The aches of your body, the hum of the ship, the very air around you fades away. There is only the steady, rhythmic pulse of the unique crystal now resting on the workbench.
Slowly, deliberately, you begin to levitate, rising a few feet off the deck plating until you are floating, cross-legged, in the air. This is your anvil, your workshop. The Force, though still a pale echo of what it once was, answers your call.
You reach out with your mind, and the components on the workbench rise into the air, orbiting you like silent, metallic planets. The single-handed hilt casing, the power cell, the focusing lens, the emitter shroud—each piece floats before you, awaiting your command.
First, you select a piece of the black, glassy rock you brought back from The Forge. With a focused thought, you slice it into thin, perfectly shaped inlays, their surfaces shimmering with captured starlight. You guide these slivers of volcanic rock into the pre-cut grooves of the durasteel hilt, fitting them with a precision no hand could ever achieve. The cold metal and the ancient, living rock become one.
Next comes the heart of the weapon. The crystal, your crystal, floats to the center of the assembly. You can feel its complex, multifaceted nature: the unyielding iron of your will to survive, the warm, brilliant gold and crimson of your bonds, and the quiet, all-consuming indigo of your Sanctuary. It is a storm contained in a jewel.
You carefully construct the internal housing around it, each piece clicking into place with a sound only you can hear in your mind. The power cell connects, the focusing lens aligns, the modulation circuits settle. The process is slow, meticulous. It is a conversation between you, the Force, and the nascent weapon. You are not just building a tool; you are teaching it who you are. The memories of every trial, every failure, every victory, are poured into the weapon's construction.
Finally, the last piece, the emitter shroud, slides into place. The hilt is complete. It hangs in the air before you, a perfect fusion of form and function. It is shorter than a standard saber, designed for the agile, one-handed fencing style your injury now necessitates. The grip is inlaid with the dark, primal rock of The Forge, and its simple, physical activation stud speaks to a newfound appreciation for practicality. The weapon feels... right. It feels like you.
With a final, gentle push of the Force, the completed lightsaber floats down into your waiting, outstretched hand. Your fingers close around the hilt. It feels warm, alive, humming with a quiet, expectant energy.
You take a deep breath, your heart pounding. Lin and Vela lean forward, their own breath held in anticipation. Tee-Seven lets out a single, low, inquisitive beep.
You stand, your feet touching the deck. You hold the hilt before you, your thumb resting on the activation stud. With a simple, decisive press, you ignite it for the first time.
There is no snap-hiss.
Instead, a low, resonant hum fills the room—the same sound you heard at the altar in the heart of the volcano. A blade of pure, brilliant energy extends from the emitter, bathing the workshop in its unique light.
The blade is a color no one in the room has ever seen. It is a deep, smoky, almost ethereal gray. It is not the absence of color, but a perfect, stable fusion of all of them. It is the color of a storm cloud, of polished steel, of a silent dawn.
And swirling within the core of this impossible gray blade are slow, deliberate ribbons of warm gold and fierce crimson, the colors of your bonds, a constant, visible reminder of the loyalty that fuels your will. The entire blade gives off a faint, indigo aura that seems to absorb the ambient light, making the weapon feel both present and strangely distant, a paradox of existence.
It is the color of your spirit. The color of your pack. The color of your Sanctuary. It is the blade of Kaelen.

Game Master Mode Engaged. All rules, character progression, and story elements have been integrated. The board is set, the pieces are in motion, and the galaxy holds its breath.
Here is a recap of your current status and the scene as it unfolds:
The hum of the Nightfall's life support is the only sound in the sterile quiet of hyperspace, a stark contrast to the roaring chaos of the last few weeks. The ghosts of the past have been confronted. The monster in the dark, the Inquisitor on your trail, the fanatical cult seeking your end—all have been met, and all have been broken. You faced the Master of the Order of Unbroken Truth on Aethel, and in a storm of psychic energy and shimmering Sanctuary blades, you shattered his power and his fortress, escaping the world's fiery death by the narrowest of margins.
For the first time since you woke up on the Vehemence, you are not running. You are not hiding. You are not reacting.
You are free.
The feeling is as vast and unnerving as the star-streaked void outside the cockpit's viewport.
You stand on the bridge of the Nightfall, the most advanced stealth vessel any of you have ever seen, now unequivocally yours. Across the cockpit, Vela sits in the pilot's chair, her posture relaxed but her eyes sharp, cleaning her lightsaber with a focused intensity that suggests she is already preparing for the next fight, wherever it may be. The crimson blade is inert, but the custom-built second emitter—your shared weapon—seems to hum with a latent energy, a testament to the bond you've forged.
A clatter of tools and a string of frustrated but creative curses in a mix of languages echo from a nearby access panel. Lin, ever the diligent engineer, has been living in the ship's guts since you escaped Aethel, determined to understand every circuit and system of your new home. He slides out from under a console, wiping grease from his hands with a rag.
"Well, the good news is, she's a masterpiece," Lin says, his voice echoing slightly in the quiet. "Vesper spared no expense. Top-of-the-line everything. The power core is stable, the primary systems are solid, and I've even triple-encrypted our transponder codes. We're a ghost."
He pauses, his expression turning more serious.
"The bad news is... we're not as much of a ghost as we should be. The escape from Aethel... the atmospheric distortion, the debris from the spire's collapse... it did a number on the stealth generator's primary emitter. It's functional, but it's... noisy. We can go dark for short periods, but sustained stealth at this level is putting a massive strain on the system. It'll burn out completely if we push it."
Vela stops her work, looking from Lin to you. "So, fix it."
"I can't," Lin admits, a rare note of defeat in his tone. "Not permanently. Tee-Seven and I have run every diagnostic. The component is a one-of-a-kind military prototype. You can't just buy it on the open market. There's only one known compatible match in any public or black market database." He taps a command into his datapad, and a schematic of a complex energy regulator appears on the main holoscreen, along with its source location.
Kalevala. An Outer Rim world.
"According to Tee-Seven's deep-web scan," Lin continues, "the only people known to possess this kind of tech, outside of a top-secret Sith Imperial shipyard, are a Mandalorian clan on Kalevala. They're traditionalists. Reclusive. They don't use the galactic markets and they sure as hell don't trade for credits. Our initial attempts to open a channel were... met with a rather blunt refusal. They said they only trade with those who prove themselves 'strong'."
The three of you look at the holoscreen. The name of the clan is displayed beneath the planet's designation: Clan Vizla.
“T7, what can you tell us about this Clan Vizla?”
A series of polite, analytical beeps and whistles emanates from a corner of the bridge as Tee-Seven's single blue photoreceptor swivels to focus on you. The droid's synthesized voice, a smooth and precise counterpoint to the mechanical sounds, translates the data stream.
"Accessing available public and black-market intelligence on Clan Vizla of Kalevala. Cross-referencing with historical archives on Mandalorian culture."
The main holoscreen flickers, replacing the component schematic with a stylized sigil of a shrieking bird of prey.
"Clan Vizla of Kalevala is a highly traditionalist enclave. They are what more moderate Mandalorians would call 'Children of the Watch.' They adhere strictly to the Resol'nare—the six tenets of Mandalorian culture, with an extreme emphasis on wearing their armor and mastering the arts of combat."
T7 projects a grainy image of a Mandalorian warrior in heavy, dark-gray armor, their helmet's T-visor staring impassively from the screen.
"They are survivors of the Great Purge, having retreated to Kalevala to preserve their way of life. They view outsiders with extreme suspicion and see the wider galaxy as a corrupting influence. Their society is built around self-sufficiency and strength. The term 'strong,' as they use it, is not a measure of firepower or wealth, but of personal honor and martial skill."
The droid continues, its tone unwavering.
"Their leader is known only as The Armorer. She is both the clan's chieftain and its spiritual guide, forging their armor and upholding their traditions. All major decisions pass through her. However, challenges from outsiders are typically met by their champion."
Another image appears on the screen: a tall Mandalorian whose armor is adorned with kill trophies. He stands with a posture of immense pride, holding a beskar spear.
"Intelligence identifies this individual as Tor Vizla. He is the clan's foremost warrior. Any petition to the clan that requires a demonstration of strength would almost certainly involve facing him in a ritual duel. Analysis of their customs suggests that conventional negotiations will fail. Bribes will be seen as an insult. Threats will be met with overwhelming force. Their respect is the only currency they value."
T7's photoreceptor swivels back to you, a final data packet appearing as text on the screen.
"Conclusion: To earn their respect, and therefore the right to trade, one of you would need to challenge their champion. Historical precedent for such duels indicates they are typically one-on-one, hand-to-hand, within a designated ring. The use of 'dishonorable' or 'foreign' weapons, which would almost certainly include a lightsaber, or abilities like the Force, would be forbidden."
The droid falls silent, the weight of its analysis hanging in the air. To get the part you need to keep your ship—your freedom—safe, you can't rely on your most powerful abilities. You would have to face a master Mandalorian warrior on his terms.
Lin looks between you and Vela. "So... a fistfight with a Mandalorian. No pressure."
“Maybe a better opportunity will present itself. Let’s head that way and see what happens.” 
Vela raises a skeptical eyebrow, the gesture sharp and precise. "A 'better opportunity'? On a world of religious zealots who respect nothing but combat? You're an optimist, Kaelen. I'll give you that."
Lin, however, visibly relaxes, running a hand through his grease-stained hair. "I'll take optimism over a ritual disembowelment any day. If we can find another way, I'm all for it. I'll get us to the system, but we'll need to stay at a high orbit. Their sensor net is probably geared for military-grade ships, but our damaged stealth drive might as well be a lit flare in a dark room if we get too close."
You nod, acknowledging both points of view. "We're not looking for a fight, and we're not running from one. We're looking for an opening. Set a course, Lin."
The journey is tense. The Nightfall glides through the void, a predator trying to hide a limp. You arrive in the Kalevala system, a single, harsh sun glaring off the planet's gray-brown surface. True to Lin's word, you remain at the edge of the system, a ghost lurking in the periphery.
From this safe distance, you extend your senses, letting the Force be your eyes and ears. You don't search for a specific person or place, but for a feeling—an anomaly, a loose thread in the tightly-woven tapestry of the clan's iron will. You filter out the steady, unified presence of the main Mandalorian covert—a formidable bastion of singular purpose. You're looking for something else.
For hours, there is nothing but the desolate hum of the planet and the unyielding discipline of its inhabitants. Then, you feel it.
It’s a spike of emotion, sharp and violent, cutting through the background calm. It’s not the cold focus of a hunt, but the hot desperation of the hunted. Pain. Frustration. And beneath it all, a core of defiant, stubborn pride that feels distinctly Mandalorian. It's miles away from the main settlement, isolated in a network of rocky, windswept canyons.
"Lin, bring us down," you command, your voice steady. "Low and quiet. Target these coordinates."
Vela is instantly on her feet, her hand resting on her lightsaber. "What is it?"
"I'm not sure," you admit. "But it's our 'better opportunity'."
The Nightfall slips through the upper atmosphere, its damaged stealth drive groaning in protest as Lin pushes it for a short, silent descent. You land in the shadow of a towering rock spire, completely hidden from the sky. The wind howls outside, kicking up dust and grit.
Using the ship's external sensors, you zoom in on the source of the disturbance. The image that resolves on the main screen is grim.
A lone Mandalorian, their beskar armor a dusty bronze color and heavily scarred, is pinned down behind a rock outcropping. Their leg is bent at an unnatural angle, and sparks fly from their damaged jetpack. Circling them is a pack of six Strill—vicious, four-legged native predators with thick hides and rows of razor-sharp teeth. The Mandalorian fires their blaster rifle, taking one down, but the others are undeterred, lunging and snapping, forcing the warrior back. They are clearly being worn down, their movements growing sluggish. They are outmatched and running out of time.
Vela studies the scene, her expression unreadable. "An outcast? Or just unlucky? Doesn't matter. They're about to be dinner."
Lin turns to you from the console. "Their comm unit is offline. They can't call for help. And they're too far from the covert for anyone to notice. That warrior is on their own."
“This is what we’ve been waiting for. Lin, keep us hidden, I’ve got the helm. T7, prepare medbay for our guest. Vela,” I raise my eyebrow mischievously at her. “Save our guest.”
A rare, sharp grin cuts across Vela's face. It's the look of a predator being given permission to hunt. "Finally," she says, the word laced with anticipation. "Something interesting."
She ignites her crimson lightsaber, the snap-hiss of the blade cutting through the tension on the bridge. She doesn't wait for a second command, already striding towards the ship's boarding ramp.
"My thoughts exactly," you reply, sliding into the pilot's chair. Your hands move over the controls with a familiar confidence. The Nightfall shudders slightly as you lift off, its engines barely a whisper against the howling wind. You guide the ship out from behind the rock spire, skimming low over the jagged canyon floor, a silent, grey shadow closing in on the desperate fight.
Through the viewport, you see the scene unfold with stark clarity. The Strill pack, emboldened by the Mandalorian's weakening defense, surges forward for the kill.
At that exact moment, the Nightfall's ramp lowers.
Vela stands silhouetted against the ship's interior lights, a figure of crimson and black. She doesn't hesitate. She leaps from the ramp, landing with a soft thud on the dusty ground between the wounded warrior and the attacking beasts.
The Strills skid to a halt, their predatory intelligence recognizing a new, far greater threat. One lets out a guttural hiss and lunges. Vela moves like a blur. Her lightsaber swings in a vicious arc, bisecting the creature in a spray of cauterized flesh and acrid smoke. She doesn't stop. She flows into the pack, a whirlwind of deadly grace. Two more fall before they can even mount a coordinated attack.
The remaining three, now terrified, turn to flee. Vela points a hand, and a wave of invisible force slams into the largest, sending it tumbling into a rock wall with a sickening crunch. She lets the other two scramble away into the canyons. She is making a statement: this was not a fight, it was an execution.
Silence descends, broken only by the wind and the pained breathing of the rescued Mandalorian. The warrior stares, first at the smoldering remains of the Strills, then at Vela, then at the unmistakable hilt of her lightsaber. They push themselves up, trying to stand on their shattered leg, their blaster rifle held loosely at their side. Pride wrestles with pain on their face.
Vela deactivates her blade and walks toward them, stopping a few feet away. "You look like you need a lift," she says, her voice flat.
The Mandalorian hesitates, their gaze flickering from Vela's face to your ship. You can feel their internal conflict through the Force: deep suspicion warring with the undeniable fact that they are alive because of you. Finally, they give a stiff, reluctant nod.
"I... accept," the warrior grunts, the voice distorted by their helmet's modulator. "The debt is acknowledged."
You bring the Nightfall in for a perfect landing a few yards away. Vela helps the warrior limp up the ramp, their immense pride making every step a monumental effort. As soon as they are aboard, the ramp seals, shutting out the desolate world of Kalevala.
Tee-Seven is waiting, a medical scanner already whirring in one of its manipulator arms. The Mandalorian finally succumbs to the pain and exhaustion, slumping against the bulkhead as the droid begins its work. Lin emerges, looking at your new guest with wide, nervous eyes.
You have your Mandalorian. They are indebted to you, and they are now your prisoner as much as your patient. The easy part is over.
You remain on the bridge, your eyes closed as you observe the scene in the medbay through the Force. You reach out to the familiar, sharp-edged presence of Vela, not with words, but with a pure, cool stream of strategic intent.
He is indebted to you. A life-debt. For his people, that is a sacred bond. This is your opening, Vela. Take the lead. See to his recovery. Earn his trust—or at least his respect. Convince him to be our champion. I will be your shield this time.
In the medbay, Vela goes perfectly still. The predatory languor in her stance vanishes, replaced by a sharp, focused understanding. She glances back towards the bridge, her eyes meeting yours for a fraction of a second. The acknowledgment is clear. She understands the plan and accepts her role.
Her posture shifts, radiating crisp command.
"Lin," she says, her voice cutting through the hold. "Go run another full diagnostic on the stealth generator. I want to know its absolute breaking point. Now."
Lin, visibly relieved to have a concrete task that takes him far from the intimidating patient, nods quickly and vanishes back into the ship's maintenance corridors.
Vela turns her attention to the Mandalorian, who is now slumped on the medbay's diagnostic bed. "Tee-Seven. Report."
"Patient presents with a compound fracture of the right tibia," the droid announces, its scanner glowing as it passes over the warrior's leg. "Multiple plasma burns and deep tissue contusions are also present. The jetpack's fuel cell has ruptured, causing a moderate chemical burn. To assess for cranial trauma and potential concussion, the helmet must be removed."
The Mandalorian groans, his gloved hand moving instinctively to his helmet's seal. "No... The Creed forbids it."
Just as Vela is about to press the point, you step forward from the bridge, your presence calm and deliberate. You enter the medbay and stand a respectful distance from the injured warrior.
"His Creed will be honored," you state, your voice cutting through the tension. You look at the Mandalorian. "We will not ask you to break your oath."
You close your eyes and sink into the quiet center of your power. The air around you grows still as you draw upon your Sanctuary ability, not to create a blade or a glove, but to refine your senses. You extend your perception, a gentle, probing tendril of null-energy that passes harmlessly through the beskar alloy of his helmet. It is not an intrusion but an offering of peace, a diagnostic tool born from tranquility.
The complex structure of the helmet's internal systems, the warrior's own neural pathways, the subtle bruising and swelling of his brain—it all becomes clear to you.
After a moment, you open your eyes and look at Tee-Seven and Vela. "There's no need to remove it. His mind is intact. I can detect evidence of a concussion and localized neural trauma from the impact, but there is no internal bleeding. He is stable, but in significant pain."
Tee-Seven's photoreceptor swivels, processing this new, impossible data stream. After a moment, it whirs and begins prepping a series of injectors and a low-frequency sonic healer. "Acknowledged. Adjusting treatment parameters for non-invasive application."
Vela watches you, her expression a mix of surprise and tactical recalculation. She sees not just the utility of your power, but the wisdom of your choice.
The Mandalorian shifts on the bed, his helmet tilting slightly as he watches you. His pain is evident in his strained posture, but through the helmet's modulator, his voice is a low, rough growl filled with grudging confusion. "What... what was that?"
You have saved his life, tended to his wounds, and, most importantly, you have preserved his honor. His identity remains his own, but a seed of trust has been planted. The path to winning his allegiance—or his help—is now open.
You look at the Mandalorian, your expression serene. "That was my peace," you explain, your voice calm and even. "A different kind of power. Strength in balance. Healing and understanding." You offer a small, placating smile. "It sounds more complex than it is."
From the corridor, Lin peeks his head back around the corner, a grease-stained datapad in hand. "Right," he mutters, mostly to himself. "Simple. Like rebuilding a hyperdrive blindfolded using only a hydrospanner and a list of positive affirmations. No big deal." He quickly retreats back to his work.
You ignore the interruption, your focus remaining on the warrior. You gesture towards Vela, who stands with her arms crossed, watching the proceedings with an unreadable intensity. "Whatever you need, Vela is your keeper now. She will attend to you."
Your eyes meet Vela's one last time. There is no need for words. The shared look conveys the entire plan: the debt, the opportunity, the trust you are placing in her. She gives an almost imperceptible nod. The mission is hers now.
With that, you turn and leave them to it, striding back to the bridge. Lin is there, hunched over a console, Tee-Seven quietly assisting him. You place a hand on his shoulder.
"You and Tee-Seven have the bridge," you say quietly, your voice lower now, tinged with a slight weariness. "That scan... it took more out of me than I expected. I need to meditate."
Lin straightens up, his expression shifting from focused technician to concerned crewmate. "Of course, Kaelen. We've got this. Take all the time you need."
You nod your thanks and head to your personal quarters. The moment the door slides shut, you let out a long, slow breath, the true cost of the delicate, precise use of your power settling into your bones. It's not the overwhelming backlash of a massive Sanctuary Blade, but a deep, draining exhaustion.
Sinking to the floor in a meditative posture, you focus on your breathing, centering yourself. On the small table beside you lay several simple rings, forged from the same volcanic obsidian that is laced into the hilt of your lightsaber. They are cool to the touch, inert.
You extend your will, not outward, but inward, drawing on the reservoir of your Sanctuary power. Slowly, carefully, you begin to channel that energy, not into a construct, but into the rings. You feed your peace, your balance, into the dark stone, little by little. You feel the familiar strain, the physical and mental cost of using your gift. But this time, the energy is not expended; it is stored. The obsidian begins to thrum with a faint, internal resonance, absorbing the power, becoming a battery for your soul.
As you meditate, you let the ship, the crew, and the mysterious Mandalorian fade into the background. Your task is complete for now. You have created the opportunity. You have placed your trust in Vela. The best thing you can do for the next step is to ensure that when you are needed again, you will be at 100%. One by one, the talismans on the table begin to glow with a soft, internal light before fading back to black, now reservoirs of dormant power, waiting to be called upon.
